Thank you!Yep, I mean she was teaching at a law school all the way back in 1974, before Bill became the governor of Arkansas in the '80s, and way before she was First Lady in the '90s. And that was 20 years ago!Hey dipshit, the fact that we have to live in a society with people who have attitudes like yours is *why* our attempted suicide rates are higher. 

In Thailand, where being transgender is not seen as a negative thing nor a big deal, there's no difference in rates.I won a Taylor electric guitar once from Fazio's Music in St Louis!

https://pbs.twimg.com/media/Bbd-NqBCYAEBaD0.jpg

https://twitter.com/daniellemuscato/status/411936664206852096You can read dog minds? You should get a TV show or something.I used to work at an animal shelter and it was part of my job to train the dogs to, among other things, be chill around cats. What about his body language makes you think his intent wasn't to hurt the kitten, and that he was simply "goofy"?What country do you live in?

In the US, most people consider college necessary for a "real" job. It is pretty much impossible to find a job with health insurance unless you went to college. Many people, if not most people, do not end up working in a job directly related to what they studied in college. Undergraduate degrees are really more about learning how to be an adult, how to do intellectual work, and how to live on your own than they are about learning anything specific to one job or field. Generally speaking if you want to do something very specific that requires that kind of specialized knowledge, it is necessary to go to graduate school - if you want to be a lawyer, a doctor, an engineer, a social worker, a nurse, even a teacher of a specific subject. Most people I know who only have undergraduate degrees do not work in the field they studied in school, or they do not work in "real" jobs (in other words, they work in jobs that don't require degrees at all, and they make a very low wage, are paid by the hour, and don't receive benefits).

I think basic income will have predictable effects on education. I think people will not worry about finding a job immediately after college in order to start paying back their student loans and pay their rent. We will also see fewer people taking on even more student debt to go to graduate school when that's not really what they want or need (in my country, if you go to graduate school, you can defer your student loans from your undergrad degree). As a result we have a lot of people who are overeducated for their jobs, or who have degrees in unrelated fields.

I think that with basic income, it will help people take the time to find jobs that are better suited to them and that they enjoy more, the same reason we have unemployment benefits. It is a bad thing when someone takes the first job they can possibly find just because they have urgent bills to pay. It's not good for them psychologically or financially, and it's not good for society in the long run.

Another thing that would help is tax-funded college educations, instead of making students take out loans to pay for college, but they go hand-in-hand, I think. In my country we already use tax funding to pay for K-12 school, but for whatever reason we have decided that 12 is the cutoff and that after that, the student must pay for their education. That has never made sense to me, but it's the way it is here.Yes. It's called African American Vernacular English (AAVE) and it's an equally valid dialect of English to any other. Other examples of English dialects include British English, Canadian English, Australian English, American English, etc.Your comment is racist, geneeva71. Think about what you just wrote. You said that the AAVE, the dialect spoken by African Americans, is on par with not taking elementary education seriously.

It's a dialect. It has its own grammar rules. It's not simply ignorance of "proper" English (that's an incredibly racist and classist thing to say). It is entirely possible to code switch (switch dialects) between speaking AAVE and speaking other English dialects depending on your audience, and many AAVE speakers do this regularly, depending on whether they are talking to other AAVE speakers or speakers of other English dialects. It *is* their native tongue within their culture. It's not a lack of an ability "to talk properly."

That implies that you think AAVE is simply not proper English, and that your dialect is superior. That's the most racist thing in this entire thread.&gt; you also can't ignore the fact that languages have prestige dialects- dialects that, for whatever reason, have positive societal connotations. On the flip side of that, there are dialects that have very negative connotations. An example would be the Cockney British dialect. In America, the Southern dialect and AAVE both carry very heavy negative associations.

Only if you're classist. That's what I'm saying. I don't think there's anything negative about speaking AAVE nor having a Cockney accent. If you're being negatively judged for having a Southern accent, you're hanging around the wrong people. There's nothing wrong with a Southern accent, either.Why assume he is homeless just because he has some kind of mental deficiency or mental illness? Do we even know he has some kind of mental deficiency or mental illness and isn't just a Class A creeper? I mean clearly something is wrong with his social skills and understanding (or at least respect) of consent, but let's not reinforce stereotypes about homelessness or special needs people if neither has been shown to actually apply in this case.It's hard to take this seriously when it's riddled with typos and grammatical errors.Not being a bigot =/= being an ally.Also, uh, see Point #1. The book this talk is based on was published in 1988. The video is obviously not from 2014 or even the last 20 years - 2014 is simply the date this particular file was uploaded to YouTube.

Futher, this is not a documentary; this is a video of a lecture given at American University by Noam Chomsky about political indoctrination and democracy. The uploader doesn't seem to be affiliated with American University and I suspect doesn't have permission to upload this.

How can you even call this a documentary? It's a recording of a single lecture.***If you can afford to donate more upfront rather than spreading it out***, a greater dollar amount in the beginning will help Bernie's campaign more than small donations spread out over time.

It is nice and all to have a PR bragging point of lots of donations, but what he really needs is lots of ACTUAL DOLLARS in order to compete with Hillary's corporate donors. Bernie has already bested her in terms of reaching 1 million donors first and it seems that that he's also beating her in terms of number of individual donors (650k for Bernie; Hillary's team decided not to release their number of donors this time around, which probably means it was less than Bernie's and they don't want to draw attention to that).God dammit. I recently sold my first guitar, had it for 15 years, because I'm unemployed. 

Before I clicked on this thread, I thought to myself, "Man, I hope nobody said 'My first guitar.'"

Top post is "first guitar." Argh!Right but I mean the fact that her team didn't announce them in a mass email or to the press shows that they are not proud of them. They released her total donations in dollars to the press, but not the number of donors.I'd say a person who doesn't particularly care and treats you like anyone else is just a decent, normal person. 

An ally is, specifically and explicitly, an *activist* for LGBTQ rights who is not, themselves, LGBTQ.No. It is a substantive adjective in this case. That means it's an adjective that's acting as a noun (or more accurately, it is substituting for a noun). Your sentence has an implied noun phrase "twelve o'clock" but is only using the adjective "twelve" instead of the whole thing.

A common example of a substantive adjectives is "meek" here:

"The meek [people] shall inherit the Earth."This isn't a dad joke. The point of dad jokes is that they use puns and plays on words so that children can understand them without a knowledge of cultural references and history, and they have to be clean, firstly because that kind of joke is inappropriate for kids and secondly because kids won't get it.I enjoyed the joke, it's just not a "dad joke." It's a regular pun. Dad jokes are a special category of puns that are both clean and don't make use of cultural references.In 2004 I moved to Philadelphia. I only knew two people in the entire city: my aunt and her boyfriend, although I hadn't met the boyfriend yet. They both had to work the night I got there, though, so I wasn't able to hang out with them yet.

My internet wasn't hooked up yet and I didn't feel like unpacking, so I thought I'd drive my car around the city and explore. After maybe half an hour of driving, I gave up on poking around because it was starting to snow really badly. I decided to head home.

I saw a guy walking with his hands stuffed in his pockets and his head down, who was clearly cold and underdressed for the snow. I'm from a smallish town in the Midwest and had never lived in a big city before (the population of metro Philly is about 6 million people). I didn't know you aren't supposed to just randomly offer rides to people in those situations, but naive little me pulled over and asked the guy if he needed a ride to wherever he was going, since I had absolutely nothing else to do. He was heading home from work. I drove him the 6 or 8 blocks or so to his home, which was kinda on the way to my new house anyway.

The next night I had dinner with my aunt and her boyfriend. It turns out that the guy I'd given a ride to was actually her boyfriend.You've clearly never been to Europe.No, that's not True. He has joked about it since the '80s but 2015 was the first time he filed the FEC paperwork.Capsaicin, the chemical in peppers that makes them taste spicy, is activated by water. Water is absolutely the worst thing you could bring someone who is eating something spicy.

Capsaicin is chemically neutralized with dairy fats. The best thing to combat spiciness is something like heavy cream, whole milk, half and half, or as is usually the case in Mexican etc restaurants, sour cream.

If you can't find any dairy fat, the next best thing is just drying out your mouth by holding your mouth open and breathing through it, so that your saliva evaporates (the water in your saliva activates the chemical).

But yeah, don't bring people water in those cases. The ice in ice water may provide artificial, temporary relief by numbing their taste buds, but they will have to continually suck on ice cubes for that to work.

A better idea is to bring them a side dish of sour cream, or hell, even *actual* sliced bread (with butter).

Edited to add:

If you ever get hit in the face with pepper spray or Mace, for the love of god, don't cry. It's the same chemical that's in peppers. The best thing you can do is sit in front of a fan with air blowing into your face. If you can't find a fan, hold your eyes open to dry them out. How long afterwards?Well water on its own is clear.

Ocean water varies depending on where you're getting it from because it has all sorts of crap in it.

Usually it's greenish brown, though. But I wouldn't say it's *wrong* to call it blue. When you look at it from the top of a cliff, or from an airplane window, it is in fact blue. It's just not blue if you get some and put it in a bucket.

I mean, at night, it's black. It's not *wrong* to call it black at night. It depends on your vantage point.That's what an urban legend *is.*You're a blogger, Wikipedia contributor, YouTube personality, etc?The Person of the Year is awarded to whoever has the biggest influence on history. It explicitly is value neutral.Sure, but I think a much more useful - and True - title would have made it clear that this is an urban legend. That's the exact opposite of what your title says right now.&gt;All posts must make an attempt at humor.Here's a version you can actually read, for those having trouble with the dark image:

http://i.imgur.com/YOFIyUk.jpgSource:

Debate transcript
http://www.nytimes.com/2015/10/14/us/politics/democratic-debate-transcript.html

Results in text format:

- Lincoln Chaffee: 282 words, "I" mentions: 16
- Jim Webb: 352 words, "I" mentions: 10
- Martin O'Malley: 384 words, "I" mentions: 10
- Hillary Clinton: 435 words, "I" mentions: 14
- Bernie Sanders: 261 words, "I" mentions: 1

P.S.

Bernie's sole mention was in this context:
"I think most Americans understand that our country today faces a series of unprecedented crises."Here's another way to visualize the same information. This is charted as a percentage of total words in each 2-minute opening statement that were "I," "I'm," or "I've:

http://i.imgur.com/xMcPlIW.pngGood call. Martin O'Malley said "My" once:

"My name is Martin O\u2019Malley, former Mayor of Baltimore, former governor of Maryland, a life long democrat, and most importantly, a husband, and a father."

and Bernie Sanders said "me" once:

"It seems to me that instead of building more jails and providing more incarceration, maybe \u2014 just maybe \u2014 we should be putting money into education and jobs for our kids."

as did Hillary:

"But for me, this is about bringing our country together again."Time.com's poll got a similar result.Actually I'd argue that's not quite True. Most voters are 45 or older:

http://www.pewresearch.org/files/2014/11/FT_2014.Midterm.Exit_.Poll_.Ages_.png

Source:
http://www.pewresearch.org/fact-tank/2014/11/05/as-gop-celebrates-win-no-sign-of-narrowing-gender-age-gaps/I can but it would take awhile. I'm not sure how useful that would be actually: Counting the "I" mentions is actually likely not the ideal measure of how much someone talks about themselves versus the issues, because there are a lot of ways to use the word "I" and still talk about the issue as the core point of your sentence or phrase. A better (but much more subjective) measure would be to count each statement point-by-point, but that would take a really long time. Also you'd have to figure in how much screen time each candidate had if you wanted an accurate representation of the ratio, rather than just absolute mentions, which means you'd have to watch a recording of the debate rather than use a transcript, or do it by word count, which is even more subjective. I completely agree, however the more you look at context, the more subjective your measure gets.Sure. What it really means is that a Sanders win would require a better youth turnout than in the '14 midterms or in the 2012 election. He has said so himself on the campaign trail as well. A lot of his policies disproportionately matter to and affect young people so it makes sense that 1) they are more fired up in support of him and 2) they will turn out in better numbers than in the midterms. Examples of these policies include universal health care, tuition free public colleges, Black Lives Matter, and many others.I disagree. I wrote about why a month ago and he's actually doing even better since then, having picked up two active political endorsements, breaking the record for passing the 1 million donations mark, and increasing his donations from 1st quarter by 70% (while Hillary's are down by 40% from Q1):

www.midmoforbernie.org/can-bernie-win-the-democratic-nomination/The only time any of the candidates referred to themselves in the third person in their opening statements was when Jim Webb said:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."To clarify I was counting mentions of "I," "I'm, and "I've," not necessarily "I-messages," which are "assertion about the feelings, beliefs, values etc. of the person speaking." There may be some uses of "I" that are not assertions about feelings, beliefs, or values, but rather about the issues, depending on context.Yes. This chart does not take context into account. For example, Bernie Sanders' sole mention of "I" was in this context:

&gt;"I think most Americans understand that our country today faces a series of unprecedented crises."I saw that, but it was too late. Oops :P I only looked at opening statements for this chart.

The only candidate who talked about themselves in the third person during their opening statement was Jim Webb, who did so once. Here is the context:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."Good point, thank you for your comment.As another Redditor pointed out, I also didn't take into account "me" or "my," which would count for 1 more for O'Malley, 1 more for Clinton, and 1 more for Sanders.This chart is explicitly only looking at each candidate's 2-minute opening statement.This chart is explicitly only looking at each candidate's 2-minute opening statement.Yes, the labels are reversed by mistake. I apologize.Is that for the whole debate? Did you count "I'm" and "I've" as well? Someone else also suggested "me" and "my" as well as mentions of oneself in the third person.

Thanks for your comment.No. This chart is only looking at each candidate's 2-minute opening statement.The labels are flipped. Sorry about that.Sanders didn't refer to himself in the third person during his 2-minute opening statement, which is the only wording analyzed for this chart.

Of the other candidates, Jim Webb was the only one who referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement. Here's the context:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."This chart is only looking at each candidate's 2-minute opening statement.It's Reddit!This chart only looked at each candidate's opening statement. During their opening statements, only one of the candidates referred to himself in the third person (Jim Webb). That was not counted in this chart though, because it wasn't an "I" mention.I'll take that into account for future submissions here. Thanks for your feedback.This chart is only looking at each candidate's opening statement. The only candidate who referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement was Jim Webb. Here is the context:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."This chart is only looking at each candidate's opening statement. The only candidate who referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement was Jim Webb. Here is the context:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."This chart is only looking at each candidate's opening statement. The only candidate who referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement was Jim Webb. Here is the context:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."I'll take your suggestions into account for future submissions. Thank you.I agree. Please draw your own conclusions about the meaning of this data. It would have been better if I didn't say "as a measure of how much they talked about themselves versus the issues" because this is not an ideal way to measure that, especially considering it's absolute mentions rather than taking context into account, AND although each candidate had the same two minutes, their word counts varied by some 40%.This chart is only looking at each candidate's opening statement. The only candidate who referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement was Jim Webb. Here is the context:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."I agree actually, I talked about this in some other comments here. Context matters, and also this doesn't take into account differences in word count, although each candidate did have the same 2 minutes to speak. The word counts varied by something like 40% between Clinton (who said the most words in her opening statement) and Sanders (who said the fewest). This chart is only looking at each candidate's opening statement. The only candidate who referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement was Jim Webb. Here is the context:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."This chart is only looking at each candidate's opening statement. The only candidate who referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement was Jim Webb. Here is the context:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."I agree; if you take into account "me" and "my," then O'Malley gets +1, Clinton gets +1, and Bernie gets +1.

If you take into account third person mentions, then Webb also gets +1.

Keep in mind that this chart is only looking at each candidate's opening statement. The only candidate who referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement was Jim Webb. Here is the context:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."

Other shortcomings of this chart:

- It only accounts for absolute mentions, not a ratio of "I" words to total words spoken during their opening statements. Although each candidate had the same 2 minutes, they weren't abruptly cut off at 2 minutes, and some candidates didn't use all of their time. In fact the word count varied by about 40% between Sanders (who said the fewest words) and Clinton (who said the most).
- It doesn't take into account context. It's very possible to talk about an issue using "I" and to talk about yourself not using "I."This chart is only looking at each candidate's opening statement. The only candidate who referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement was Jim Webb. Here is the context:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."If you take into account "me" and "my," then O'Malley gets +1, Clinton gets +1, and Sanders gets +1.

If you take into account third person mentions, then Webb gets +1.

Keep in mind that this chart is only looking at each candidate's opening statement. The only candidate who referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement was Jim Webb. Here is the context:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."This chart is only looking at each candidate's opening statement. The only candidate who referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement was Jim Webb. Here is the context:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."I agree. Taking context into account, although subjective, would give a more accurate picture if you're trying to see how much someone talks about themselves versus the issues. For example, most people would agree that saying something you believe is talking about yourself. It's explicitly an "I-statement." Saying you are committed to something is also a values statement, another explicit "I-statement." So do those count as talking about themselves or talking about the issues? 

There are shortcomings whether you count absolute mentions or context. This chart counts absolute mentions.

More info on "I-statements":
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/I-messageThis chart is only looking at each candidate's opening statement. The only candidate who referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement was Jim Webb. Here is the context:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."This chart is only looking at each candidate's opening statement. The only candidate who referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement was Jim Webb. Here is the context:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."Unfortunately I don't; I used an online bar graph tool and would have to recreate it. It would be faster to just photoshop them into place.This chart is only looking at each candidate's opening statement. The only candidate who referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement was Jim Webb. Here is the context:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."I also posted that chart in the comments but it got buried. Here's another link. I apologize that the axes are again reversed, but the hard numbers are there:

http://i.imgur.com/xMcPlIW.pngI'm not a paid shill. I have volunteered for my city's local volunteer group that supports Bernie Sanders. That group is not officially part of the Bernie Sanders campaign and none of us are paid. 

I agree that there are shortcomings in the way the data are presented here. Mostly that it doesn't take context into account, but the usefulness of counting "I" statements as a measure of talking about oneself versus the issues is for you to judge. I simply counted the absolute numbers and posted them. The takeaway is up to you. Feel free to criticize the methodology but please don't assert things as fact that are False, eg that I'm a shill, and that you would have no way of knowing, anyway.

Thanks.Actually both parts of that are False. Keep in mind that this chart only examines each candidate's opening statement. Sanders didn't refer to himself in the third person at all during his opening statement. As far as your "only person" part, one other candidate actually did refer to himself in the third person during his opening statement, and that candidate was Jim Webb. Here is the context: 

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."she/herPossibly. Part of the problem with taking "context" into account is that it's subjective. For example, Bernie Sanders' sole mention of "I" was in this context:

&gt;"I think most Americans understand that our country today faces a series of unprecedented crises."

Is that a statement about what he thinks - and therefore a statement about himself? It would appear so.

Or is it a statement about the issues - specifically that America is facing a series of crises?

There's no clear answer, and that's why I opted for absolute mentions of "I" rather than getting into the mess of context.

One thing that might have helped, though, is looking at the RATIO of "I" statements to total words, since as I said, although each candidate had the same 2 minutes, they weren't abruptly cut off at 2 minutes, and some candidates didn't use all of their time. In fact the word count varied by about 40% between Sanders (who said the fewest words) and Clinton (who said the most).

If you want to look at the percentage of use of the word "I" (or "I'm" or "I've") versus other words, here is that chart:

http://i.imgur.com/xMcPlIW.png

Note that this doesn't take into account "me" or "my," nor third-person mentions of oneself. 

If you take into account "me" and "my" then O'Malley, Clinton, and Sanders each get +1 on the absolute chart.

If you take into account references to oneself in the third person, then Webb gets +1.This chart is only looking at each candidate's opening statement. The only person who referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement was Jim Webb, who did so once, in this context:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."Having volunteered for some cause doesn't equal being a shill. The fact that I've never been paid for it\u2014that's what a volunteer means\u2014explicitly means that I *can't* be a shill. I was not asked to do this by anyone and I wouldn't abuse Reddit's rules in that way even if I had been. You are accusing me of being dishonest about who I am and why I'm here on Reddit, and I don't take that lightly. You are wrong, and now you're trying to be sarcastic to mock me for it. I value my integrity.

There's not much point in arguing about it, though. I have told you who I am and the fact that I'm not getting paid. Do we have a rule now that you can't make Reddit posts about politics unless you're an undecided voter? Really? Because that is news to me, if so.This chart only examines each candidate's opening statement. Only one candidate referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement (Jim Webb). Here is the context for that:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."Actually it would hardly change at all. This chart only examines each candidate's opening statement. Only one candidate referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement (Jim Webb). Here is the context for that:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."This chart only examines each candidate's opening statement. Only one candidate referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement (Jim Webb). Here is the context for that:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."I know, but I noticed after I posted it. Thanks though. I'll pay closer attention to that in the future.The transcript is in my first comment, per /r/dataisbeautiful rules, but it got buried. Here's another link:

http://www.nytimes.com/2015/10/14/us/politics/democratic-debate-transcript.htmlThis chart only examines each candidate's opening statement. Only one candidate referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement (Jim Webb). Here is the context for that:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."This chart only examines each candidate's opening statement. Only one candidate referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement (Jim Webb). Here is the context for that:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."This chart only examines each candidate's opening statement. Only one candidate referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement (Jim Webb). Here is the context for that:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."Yes, they are, but what does that have to do with the title of the post? You can't even see the axes until you click on the title.Cute but actually False. Jim Webb talked about himself in the third person in his opening statement:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."

Also this chart is only looking at opening statements, and so it would be zero across the board except for Webb with 1.This chart is only looking at the candidates' opening statements. While not represented in this chart, the only candidate who talked about himself in the third person during his opening statement was Jim Webb:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."Yes, there are significant shortcomings and I appreciate the feedback I've gotten in the comments (well, most of it - some of the comments have been hateful and have even attacked the fact that I'm transgender, which has absolutely nothing to do with this submission).

Aside from the visualization itself, and the error with the axes, it doesn't take into account "me" or "my" or third person references to oneself.

If you take into account "me" and "my," then O'Malley gets +1, Clinton gets +1, and Bernie gets +1.

If you take into account third person mentions, then Webb also gets +1.

Keep in mind that this chart is only looking at each candidate's opening statement. The only candidate who referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement was Jim Webb. Here is the context:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."

Other shortcomings of this chart:

- It only accounts for absolute mentions, not a ratio of "I" words to total words spoken during their opening statements. Although each candidate had the same 2 minutes, they weren't abruptly cut off at 2 minutes, and some candidates didn't use all of their time. In fact the word count varied by about 40% between Sanders (who said the fewest words) and Clinton (who said the most).
- It doesn't take into account context. It's very possible to talk about an issue using "I" and to talk about yourself not using "I."

I will keep the constructive criticism in mind for future submissions.This chart only examined the candidates' opening statements. Third-person references were not included, but if they were, only Jim Webb's mentions would be affected. He is the only candidate who referred to himself in the third person during the opening statements. Here is the context of his mention:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."This chart only looked at the candidates' opening statements. Only one candidate spoke about himself in the third person during his opening statement and that was Jim Webb. Since it was not an "I" mention it is not included in this chart, however, if you wanted to include those mentions, it would only affect Webb's score here.

This is the context for his third person mention:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."This chart only looked at the candidates' opening statements. Only one candidate spoke about himself in the third person during his opening statement and that was Jim Webb. Since it was not an "I" mention it is not included in this chart, however, if you wanted to include those mentions, it would only affect Webb's score here.

This is the context for his third person mention:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."I also posted per word as a comment but it got buried. Here is a chart showing the percentage of total words spoken that were "I" words:

http://i.imgur.com/xMcPlIW.pngThis chart is only looking at each candidates' opening statement, as it says in the post title and at the title in the top of the chart itself.Welcome to Reddit.Keep in mind that this chart is only looking at each candidate's opening statement. The only candidate who referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement was Jim Webb. Here is the context:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."Lots of people did the same thing; no worries.Diamond Trem is seriously underrated. It's one of my favorites. I love the Double Barrel too although I ended up going with a Sweet Tea instead.Haha. I mean that it's my favorite trem, and that trem as an effect is underrated. You rarely see tremolo on pedalboards but it's probably my most-used sound. I keep mine pretty much always on.People make fun of this but actually that's pretty sound advice. If all my gear were stolen on tour and I had to go to a Guitar Center and start from scratch on a budget, I'd probably get an Epiphone Les Paul, a Mexican Tele, a drive pedal, a tuner, and a pair of Blues Jrs until my shit was recovered.This is another reason that I like digital modeling gear. It's 100% consistent night to night and the soundguy only needs to tweak the EQ for the room. It doesn't sound different based on humidity or temperature and all you need is 1 cable to run into the snake for your cab-simulated direct tone that's ready for the sound guy. No messing around with different mics or placement, no worries about signal-to-noise-ratio or a noise floor, no feedback or ambient issues. It's the same sound night-to-night and cuts down on soundcheck time a *lot.*

You should never skip soundcheck if for no other reason than that something might be broken and not work at all, over and above just not sounding good.The difference between an accident and an accidental is whether you do it once or 4 times :DI keep mine set as a "shark" '60s type sound. I keep the depth on mine set a lot shallower than Andy is using here, but it's the same principle. Subtlety is what it's all about. The intro of this video is pretty much what I mean except as I said, more subtle than this:

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=PtY7gYzt7EI&gt; Another thing is play through your mistakes

One of my Berklee profs, Jim Stinnett, used to say "Be a bus. What do buses do? Buses go forward." Just keep going.My main amp is a 1-channel, crystal-clear amp that doesn't break up even at full tilt, so the only way I can get drive from it is with pedals, which is why I went for the Sweet Tea. I usually play with two amps (a dirty amp and a clean amp) and switch between them, but when I want to just use the one, it's nice to be able to get a True clean, a gritty/bluesy sound, and a rock sound all with a single pedal.

Do you ever use both sides at once? I imagine probably not if a TS is too much drive for you.I'm a 5'5" chick. If I can play bar chords on my 26" long-scale classical guitar, unless you have some kind of physiological fine motor control or dexterity issues, I'm sure you can play a standard-sized acoustic guitar. I've been playing a full-sized guitar since I was 12.

My guess is that practice, correct technique, and good posture will help!Acoustic guitars, pianos, etc.

Aged wood sounds a lot better than new wood. Acoustic guitar design and grand piano design has not significantly changed in many decades. Also, there are some woods and other materials that are illegal because of conservation now, for example Brazilian rosewood, which is an *exceptional* tonewood for acoustic guitars, but very rare on new instruments. It's illegal to use ivory on piano keys nowadays, etc.

A Steinway grand piano from the 1920s or a Martin acoustic guitar from the 1960s is generally considered a finer instrument than anything you can buy in a store.Wow, that's an incredibly long scale for an electric guitar. That's longer than most long-scale classicals. In fact outside of baritones or 7-strings I think that is the longest scale I've ever heard of on a standard guitar.Gotchya, that makes more sense!1. Sometimes you think you've written a great song and your bandmates/your producer/the public tells you it sucks. Sometimes you write filler songs that turn out to be popular. There's no rule that says you have to stop working on a song once you record it, nor a rule that says a song has to be done before you start performing it. A lot of bands play their songs in ever-evolving ways over the years, changing up the tempo or adding verses or changing keys etc, especially jam-style bands. Some bands play songs differently literally every time they perform them, especially jazz and funk-type bands. There are no rules. At the pro level for pop music, there are formulas for how to write catchy songs. Record labels even do focus groups and telephone surveys to decide which demos to produce. There are actually a relatively small number of people who write and produce most of the big radio hits you will hear on a top-40 station. They find a formula that works and stick with it. [Here's an example of the formula used for pop country](http://www.npr.org/2015/01/09/376145745/you-know-exactly-what-these-six-country-songs-have-in-common). These days (for pop music at least) it's not so much art as just following orders.
2. By building a following. Ages ago, a record label would send out A&amp;R guys to find talented singers or musicians and recruit them. They would hand them the keys to a Cadillac and say, "Hey, want to be famous?" and sign them and then take them shopping for clothes and then hire a songwriter to write songs for them and then pay to take them to the studio and then market them from there. That hasn't been the way it works in decades. Nowadays, labels basically let you do all the work and then when you're at the point where you're already making money and successful on your own through YouTube or through good ol'-fashioned touring, they will sign you to a distribution deal with licensing and more albums etc. Bigger labels have no interest until you can draw 500+ people to your shows on your own, with your own one-band/indie label. Then they will buy your label from you and take your act worldwide or help with online distribution and licensing etc. But really, if you are at the point where you're drawing 500 people to your shows, you don't need a label. A label will lock you into a recording deal, they keep your masters, they decide whether to market you or not and how much to spend. Keep in mind that their goal is to make money. They would not be interested in you unless they thought that could profit off of you MORE than they will ever spend on you, and the second they think they won't make money, you're done. And you can't take your songs and go somewhere else because they own them, and your band name, etc. A lot of new artists think that a $10k advance and a 6-album deal is great but think about what that means: That means that you have to pay back that $10k before you get anything at all, and that you can't renegotiate your deal for 6 more albums. Considering that really, with records, you're not going to break even unless a record goes gold, most of these deals never go anywhere as far as any kind of long-term career for the musicians. The days of bands getting signed and going on the road and making a career of it are gone. These days if you want to make a living as a musician, you're better off doing the multiple-streams-of-income thing as a sideman, a teacher, a session player, etc etc etc. Something else to keep in mind is that overnight success usually takes about 10 years, and that even the best bands, if they do everything right, will lose money on their first few albums. Music is like sports - 1 in a million people who try to make a living doing it actually make huge amounts of money and can make a career out of it; the *vast* majority make peanuts doing it for a couple of years, give up, and then have to go get a real job. It's not about skill, although skill helps. A lot of it is who you know, being in the right place at the right time, having a look and a sound that is "in" at the moment, and working your ass off. Remember - multiple streams of income. I know plenty of Grammy winners who teach on the side or do sessions because they don't make enough money to live on otherwise. It's just how it works.What's your budget? And, do you care if it's a Fender or are other brands okay?

There are lots of great Tele-style guitars out there. A '50s Tele and a '72 RI are *very* different guitars, as far as Teles go. I don't really know how to even approach answering this. You need to know how to voice any chord.

I can list some of the most commonly used ones, I guess. But if you know basic chord theory, then it's no more difficult to "know" a second inversion G# major minor 7 add 13 than it is to "know" a G major. This is pretty basic stuff.

Most common chords for most types of music that uses traditional chords (folk, pop, country, campfire songs, blues, etc), aside from "power" chords, are probably G, C, D, E, A, Am, F, B7, C7, etc. Okay, the next step is deciding what kind of Tele you want. The '50s style ones have bigger necks, rounder fretboards with a gloss finish, smaller frets, single coils, different wiring, and a number of other differences from the '70s Teles and the modern ones.

Do you actually want a '50s style one but with a humbucker in the neck, or do you want a newer design? A lot of people think the '50s ones are actually pretty uncomfortable to play.

There are also Teles with three pickups so you can get single coil or humbucker tones, like a Strat.I definitely agree that player preferences is a factor here in what strings and picks are right *for you*, but that doesn't change the underlying acoustic physics as well as my experience, which is what I'm using to inform my recommendation that players looking for pro advice should try heavier strings and picks if they want better tone and more precision. Buckle up because I'm gonna dive deep here, haha!

Heavier gauge strings by definition have more mass than lighter strings, and that means a couple of things in practice. Heavier strings have to be tuned to a higher tension relative to lighter strings (if you tune them to the same note), meaning that although they vibrate at the same frequency, heavier strings have more potential energy than lighter strings, and more kinetic energy is involved in the process of vibrating a heavier string than a light one.

What this means is that when you play an electric guitar with heavier strings, this translates to a greater disruption of the magnetic field created by the pole pieces in the magnetic pickups, which is how electric guitars work. This in turn translates to more dynamic range available to the player, and because of the greater output from the greater mass, you can lower the height of the magnetic pickups (away from the strings and deeper into the guitar body) without losing volume. The reason that's important is that pickup height is essentially a tradeoff between two things: sustain and output. The higher the pickup, the hotter the sound, but the more the magnet disrupts the (ferrous) string vibration itself, meaning that the note will not sustain as long if plucked or picked with equal force. In practice this means that heavier strings = greater natural sustain.

Further, the more mass a string has, the lower the inharmonicity of the string. [Wikipedia explains this really well](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Piano#Grand) so instead of reinventing the wheel I'm just going to quote:

&gt;All else being equal, longer pianos with longer strings have larger, richer sound and lower inharmonicity of the strings. Inharmonicity is the degree to which the frequencies of overtones (known as partials or harmonics) sound sharp relative to whole multiples of the fundamental frequency. This results from the piano's considerable string stiffness; as a struck string decays its harmonics vibrate, not from their termination, but from a point very slightly toward the center (or more flexible part) of the string. The higher the partial, the further sharp it runs. Pianos with shorter and thicker string (i.e. small pianos with short string scales) have more inharmonicity. The greater the inharmonicity, the more the ear perceives it as harshness of tone.

This is part of the reason 9-foot grand pianos sound better than smaller grand pianos or upright pianos. The other major reason is that they have bigger soundboards.

All else being equal, wound strings have less inharmonicity than the same gauge plain string, which is why wound strings are preferred by classical and jazz guitarists. You can even buy sets of classical strings with all 6 strings wound (I use these) for a very consistent tone string-to-string and the lowest possible inharmonicity.

Also, because heavier strings have more mass at the weakest points (where they bend at the saddle and nut), even though they are higher tension, they break *less* easily and less often than lighter strings.

Now, on to picks: There are excellent reasons that almost no pro players use light gauge picks, and that more than you might think actually use extremely heavy picks. For example the highly popular Dunlop Jazz III picks aren't even offered in light gauges; they come in heavy, heavier, and heaviest at 1.10mm, 1.18mm, 1.38mm. Personally I use 1.5mm Dunlop Tortex Sharps. I know Johnny DeMarco uses 3 mm picks, which is not uncommon for pros. With the exception of some acoustic strummers and Kirk Hammett, I can't think of a single (electric) pro player who prefers picks really any lighter than 1mm. 

Interestingly the latest Taylor Wood &amp; Steel magazine has a huge article about picks and how pick choice affects tone. If you don't get Wood &amp; Steel I'll just post it here for you:

[Page 1](http://i.imgur.com/jkClw7h.jpg?1)

[Page 2](http://i.imgur.com/NpJp2UI.jpg?1)

I'm just gonna pull out the more relevant parts to our conversation:

&gt;"Thin and flexible picks act like shock absorbers... **a stiff pick will always offer the player's hand more dynamic range than a flexible one.** Besides reducing dynamic range, this flexing action takes time. Not much, but it takes time for the pick to bend and snap past the string. As a result, **rapid articulation is greatly facilitated by a more rigid pick.**" (emphasis added)

Many pros use lighter strings live than they do in the studio explicitly because they sound better, even though they are a bit harder to play for a full night, night after night. It depends on what kind of music you play, too\u2014if you play jazz you're more likely to use 12s or 13s or 14s; if you use a Floyd-equipped guitar to play heavy metal, you're more likely to use 9s or 10s. I'm not saying some pros don't use light strings, but most pros don't, especially in the studio, because of the reasons I listed.

tl;dr: Yes, everyone has personal preferences and you should use what's right for you. However, because of basic acoustic physics, you will get more dynamic range, more articulation, and a fuller tone with heavier strings and picks than is possible with lighter ones.I've been that poor, man. You did all the right things. You tried to pay more, they refused. They needed the money and you helped them out. If you had not bought it, they would have pawned it and gotten even less for it (which is why they were trying to sell it online instead of just pawning it in the first place). They clearly were on a deadline and that was a priority to them. They also didn't want to take a handout and having some dignity was also a priority to them. You helped them with both of their priorities. You absolutely did the right thing offering to return it for what you paid when they get back on their feet. Feel good about the fact that you helped a family in need in a way that *they* wanted help.Hey /u/Josh-Andertons, are you with Andertons in the UK?Cool. Great work with the YouTube vids. I am in the US and it's impractical for me to buy from you, but you guys have helped me with a lot of my gear decisions and I appreciate the entertainment value, too. I'm a bit confused about your question. You are interested in doing solo gigs of jazz standards, or you are looking to join or start a band? 

If you are looking for other musicians to play with, flyers in music stores is one way to find them, although a bit outdated compared to Craigslist, Bandmix, etc. Gotchya. You will not get any gigs putting flyers up in music stores. Music stores don't hire performers, although they are a decent place to network with other locals on the music scene. 

If you are looking to perform you need to seek out the people who hire performers. That would be the booking agents/managers/owners/event coordinators etc of bars, restaurants, fraternities and sororities, country clubs, art galleries, wedding planners, event management companies, entertainment companies, coffee shops, clubs, etc etc etc. Most charity organizations also have event organizers.

There is less of a market for solo jazz standards today than in years past. There is also competition for certain types of these gigs because they pay RIDICULOUSLY WELL depending on what they are. It's not unusual for these types of gigs to pay in the $500 to 1000/hour range, depending on the event and where you live. If you are playing for a big formal gala you can charge pretty much anything you want and the people hiring you are unlikely to bat an eye. I have played many gigs charging hundreds of dollars per person, per hour, to play background music during a fancy dinner or whatever. They usually give you a really great meal too, and they don't really care what songs you play as long as you dress really well, keep the volume unobtrusive, provide all your own equipment, and show up early and sober.

Looks matter for these sorts of gigs. You need to do your hair and makeup if you are a lady. You need to look clean-cut and showered etc. You will need to own a tuxedo, or a formal black dress if you're a lady. You need to have appropriate looking gear that fits a pretty specific profile tonally and as far as looks. An old ES-175 or similar is par for the course. I hate to say this because it's kind of bullshit, but looks matter for this type of thing. Anyone can play jazz standards but if you want to be taken seriously you need to look the part. Gear is not the most important thing, but it is something to consider. It's probably not a good idea to play these gigs with a Flying V. These are the two guitars that I use for these types of gigs:

[Main guitar](http://i.imgur.com/o0y7wku.jpg)

[Backup guitar](http://i.imgur.com/MxvfgbE.jpg)

The #1 absolute most important thing for getting these types of gigs is to have great references. Usually the people who book these types of gigs will go with whoever is the first person who's recommended to them when they start looking. That means you need a high local profile and a positive reputation in order to get these gigs. Some event bookers shop on price but in my experience, they usually decide who they want based on a simple recommendation, and then they will simply try to negotiate the price with you rather than look for anyone else. There are basically two types of people who are booking these types of events: People who have no idea what they're doing because this is their first time doing this, and people who book background music for a living. In both cases they tend to go by word of mouth reputation for who is reliable, a good value, etc. The people who do this for a living tend to use the same people over and over again if you do a good job, so it can be hard to break into their consciousness if you are new to the scene.

If you don't have references because it's your first gig, you need to build something that can substitute for that by having a great looking website (not just a FB page), great looking business cards, good publicity photos, and some good, high-quality video of yourself performing publicly. Honestly the people who do the hiring for these types of things rarely care about how good you are at guitar and sometimes don't even care about hearing a recording of you first. They want someone who looks "fancy" and fits the mood they are going for, who acts in a professional manner, who is easy to get along with and friendly, who is punctual, who is the opposite of your stereotypical diva or drug-addicted rocker. These days, it's very easy to pop in some recorded background music (and a ***LOT*** cheaper than hiring a live musician). If they are hiring a live musician, it's because they're going for a certain environment of classiness. It is your job to create that environment.

It's a lot harder to do these types of gigs as a solo artist. Generally these types of gigs go to trios or whatever. Many of these gigs will request instrumental arrangements only, but occasionally they will want a singer. Even if it's an instrumental gig, you will probably still be expected to provide a microphone and a PA system so that people can make announcements. If that's not something you're interested in doing, make sure it's in your contract and that the event planner understands that you are a guitarist and that does not include a mic that can be used in this way. In my experience people who need to make announcements just head for the band and don't even consider that if we're playing instrumentals, it means we don't necessarily have a hot mic we can just hand to them.

Anyway, so as far as booking these gigs. You will need to start small. I have played dinner parties and cocktail parties at people's homes before. It's not a bad way to get started if you know anyone who entertains regularly. Charities are also a good way to get started. Because they are 501(c)(3) organizations, they are legally able to pay you with what's called an in-kind receipt instead of cash, which they are generally much more willing to do, which means it can be easier to get those gigs if you're willing to take a receipt instead of cash. (Give the receipt to your accountant and then when it's tax time, you can deduct that amount from your taxable income. If you itemize, it's as good as cash, minus float). I have played plenty of gigs for, say, $400, with $100 of it being in cash and $300 of it being in the form of an in-kind donation receipt. Ask for cash first obviously, but if they balk at your price, you can accept a receipt as partial payment. It's better than nothing.

If you are playing coffeehouses you are probably going to be working for free coffee &amp; food plus tips. That's just the reality of it when you're starting out, especially if there's no cover. This is not a bad thing though if it gets you some stage experience and if you can use the opportunity to have some professional photos taken of you performing on a stage.

The way to get the first gig is to go to a coffeehouse or wherever you want to play and ask them about live music. Don't go during rush periods, and be willing to come back when the correct person is there or otherwise not busy. Bring with you a posed photo of yourself with your instrument, your business card, and a press kit with info about yourself, your music, and what you have to offer that sets you apart from everyone else. Even if you just get an opening set for no pay, it's a start.

Next you need to work your ASS OFF to bring as many people as possible. You need to pack the place. Get as many friends and friends-of-friends to come as you can. Get coworkers to come. Get old classmates to come. You need to impress the booking agent with how many people you can bring - that is what they are looking for above all. Play your 20 or 30 min or whatever and have fun. Hire a photographer to come and take some really great pictures of you while you're performing. Record your set (something cheap and simple like a Zoom H1 or similar is totally fine if you don't have proper recording equipment). Get high quality video if at all possible, you can rent video cameras if you don't own one.

The next step is to send a thank-you card to the person who booked you. *Mail them* a card, don't just email them. Say that you want to book again as soon as possible and include another business card. If you brought a bunch of people with you who spent money on food and drinks, they will be very happy to have you back.

Put the video of your set up on your website and on YouTube. Pull out the audio and put this on your website separately as well. Put the photos of yourself from the photographer up. 

Do this three or four times. It doesn't really matter where you play as long as you play and get some stage experience. This could be playing for hospitalized people. Just go to your local hospital and ask the nurses if you can set up a time to come play to anyone who wants to listen to some live music. Kids love it, especially this time of year, and if you can play holiday songs that's even better. Get some photos of this too if you can. The idea is to get more gigs under your belt, more positive references, more photos of you performing for your website. I have played everywhere from public school music classrooms to hospitals as I mentioned to house parties to between sets at volleyball games. You name it. There are gigs everywhere if you know where to look and how to ask.

As you start to build a good mailing list and a good following, and you start to gain a good reputation, you can start to seek out the higher paying corporate gigs. Again you are unlikely to do these solo; they are usually trios or at least duos. I've done the bulk of these types of gigs as a duo with either two guitars or with a guitar and a bass (I play bass as well), or with a guitarist and a singer. There's just something about having two people that looks larger-than-life and more "important" than a solo player, if you ask me. It comes across more as an act rather than just some dude, especially if you choose a band name for your duo. I don't know, whatever works for you. If you can get solo gigs, go for it.

If you want more specific advice about any of this just ask.&gt; I've found the tonal effects of heavier strings to be way overblown if you're playing with any significant amount of distortion. In fact, for heavy distortion styles I would say it ranges between imperceptible and undesirable.

Speaking of heavier styles, see the very next tip on the list ;)

&gt; 10) Use MUCH less overdriveI understand what you're saying but what I'm saying is that I disagree. Even if you're talking about the heaviest of metal, what the purpose of those two tips (9 and 10) are about is saying in many cases, you actually *don't* need as much gain as you might think.

Usually when relatively new to intermediate players say they need lots of gain, what they really mean is that they like lots of sustain. What they haven't learned yet is that how you set up your guitar greatly influences how much sustain you'll get. One way to get more sustain is by using a ton of distortion, but the downsides of doing it this way is that it also raises your noise floor and kills your ability to use dynamics, which is a major part of expressiveness in playing. 

If you switch from 9s to 10s and lower your pickup height a hair, you'll get more natural sustain without compression, meaning that you retain all of your ability to play with dynamics (and actually, the heavier the strings, the greater your dynamic range). If you want even more sustain that that, I also highly recommend using a compressor instead of going straight for the distortion.

In my experience, one of the easiest ways to tell a real pro session player from a hobbyist is by checking their pedalboard for a compressor pedal. Most pros I know cite compression as one of the top 5 most important pedals, whereas many hobbyists either don't understand what they do or don't know how to use one properly. 

If I were choosing 4 pedals for a mini board, they would be a tuner, a drive, a tremolo, and a compressor (assuming my amp had built-in reverb\u2014if I was playing on an amp without reverb, swap the tremolo for either a delay or a reverb). But either way, I think a compressor is a *vital* effect, simply because it lets you use less distortion while keeping the sustain. The downside of this is that you lose dynamic range, which is why I also recommend a bit heavier strings and lowering your pickups instead.I've got several custom built guitars that are exactly what I want. [Here are 8 of them](http://i.imgur.com/OhDUrOE.jpg) (the Parker, the two Gibson hollowbodies, and red Strat in the back are not custom-made, but all 4 have quite a few mods).

The main thing to notice though is that they are all very different. I play different kinds of music and go for different tones depending on the exact song and style I'm doing, so it's hard to pick out a single instrument and say it's my "signature." Or the fretboard? I was about to ask the same thing. Generally if you want rosewood on rosewood you would just use a one-piece neck. You can some added stiffness with a laminate neck but if you get a really beautiful piece of Brazilian rosewood big enough for a neck it would be a shame to cover it up with another piece unless like you REALLY hate skunk stripes or something.Dakota red FTW! I like it so much better than Candy Apple.Hi!

They have many names. Tremolo, vibrato, whammy bar, wang bar are a couple of them.

Technically speaking, tremolo is an effect where *volume* rapidly, rhythmically fades in and out. [This is what tremolo sounds like on a guitar.](https://youtu.be/PtY7gYzt7EI?t=3m57s)

Technically speaking, vibrato is an effect where *pitch* rapidly, rhythmically hovers above and below a specified note. [This is what vibrato sounds like on a guitar.](https://youtu.be/rKnwFKRWpOY?t=3m17s) You can also do vibrato [with your fretting hand instead of using the bar, like this.](https://youtu.be/rKnwFKRWpOY?t=1m34s)

The reason people mix these up is that when the guitar company Fender started making the Fender Stratocaster in 1954, they called the feature on the bridge a "synchronized tremolo," even though that's actually wrong. It should have been called a vibrato. Worse still, on some of their early amps, such as the 1956 Vibrolux, they added the effect that's technically called tremolo, but labeled it "Vibrato"!

As a result, ever since then, guitarists have been calling a rhythmic, rapid wavering in pitch "tremolo" and a rapid, rhythmic change in volume "vibrato" although these are backwards. Sometimes you will hear the term "amp vibrato" which means tremolo.

So, to answer your questions, yes, a "tremolo" is a whammy bar if you're talking to a guitarist. Early trem systems were not designed to do major changes in pitch, only very slight variations, more like vibrato that a singer uses. If you tried to do deep dives in pitch, called "dive bombs," the guitar would go horribly out of tune. Starting in the late '70s, inventors like Floyd Rose (the person) started coming up with more advanced trem systems that could stay in tune even with dive bombs. They accomplished this by using locking nuts and more complex knife edges to "float" the tremolo, rather than screwing it into a bridge block or mounting it to the top of the guitar like Bigsby units.

Floyds and other floating trems are *not* hated, in fact they are loved by many players and totally necessary to do certain types of heavier rock techniques. However, they are a huge pain in the butt as far as working with them to get your guitar set up initially and especially when changing strings. If you are new to the instrument, it's best to avoid them because you won't be doing any really crazy speed metal techniques for awhile anyway, and it's more important that your guitar stay in tune while you are learning (even the best trem systems aren't perfect at this).

For this reason, most teachers recommend that beginners stick with fixed bridges, or at least not floating bridges and especially not locking ones.

On a cheaper Squier, frankly I would skip the trem. It's just for show and it's not going to stay in tune very well. I would not recommend getting a guitar with a trem system unless you're going to spend at least $500-700 or so but that's just me.

Designing a stable trem system is just about the single most difficult engineering challenge of the electric guitar universe. My main electric with a trem system is a Parker. They are known for their proprietary trem systems that use a flat spring and several other revolutionary features. These guitars cost over $5,000 and a big reason is the trem system. Good trem systems are very difficult to build and in the world of musical instruments, just like many other things, difficult = expensive. You certainly don't need to spend 5 grand to get a decent trem system, but on a lower-end Squier, I would suggest avoiding it and going with the fixed bridge version.20+ comments and nobody said Chet Atkins yet?!Haha, good thing you figured this out now. If you ordered this guitar from PRS and said you wanted a Brazilian fingerboard on top of a Brazilian neck, they're charge you an extra $160 for it.It is technically possible but you don't want to do it.

First of all, locking nuts are MUCH larger than standard nuts and you will need to do some irreversible surgery to make it fit. Secondly, if you install a locking nut, you will also need fine tuners on the bridge end or you won't be able to tune the guitar. In other words, you will need a Floyd on the other end as well. Third, Floyds need extra space behind the bridge routing in order to accommodate the (very long) lock screws. If you want a guitar with a Floyd, just buy a guitar with one.

If you want better tuning stability, there are MUCH easier ways to do this. The most popular one is locking tuners. A lot of players prefer them even on guitars with fixed bridges just because changing strings is a lot faster (you don't need a stringwinder) and also the windings can't slip because you lock them in place rather than winding them into place. The three biggest companies that make locking tuners are Schaller, Sperzel, and Gotoh. I have lots of guitars and currently have guitars with all of them; it's just a matter of personal preference. I like Gotohs the best but they're are all similar. You can get a set of locking tuners for well under $100. Depending on what kind of guitar you have, direct drop-in replacements are likely available and you won't even need to drill or anything to install them.

Another thing that helps is a nut with less friction. A lot of people like teflon-coated materials, for example nuts made by GraphTech. 

If your guitar is going out of tune that means something moved. Either a saddle moved or a string stretched or a string got caught in the nut and then was released or a winding on the tuning peg slipped etc etc. If nothing moves, everything stays in tune. That is why fixed bridges are better for beginners. But if you are having trouble with this, first you need to identify where your tuning is slipping, and from there you can remedy it.

Hope this helps.What's wrong with not using a pick?That's a horrible idea.

1,425 people are running for president:

http://www.fec.gov/press/resources/2016presidential_form2nm.shtmlHaha, yes, I tweeted that 15 minutes ago when I saw this list!

https://twitter.com/daniellemuscato/status/675140704046329857It's peach! But regardless, [what's wrong with pink?](http://i.imgur.com/LEFZUdw.jpg)One of my favorite pedals! Mine is pretty much always on. I keep it set as a very subtle "shark" thing. It's so versatile - it adds so much character to pretty much any style, rhythm or lead. I adore that thing.As I said a lot of people install locking tuners for reasons unrelated to tuning stability; I have them on many of my fixed bridge guitars just because changing strings is faster and cleaner.Thanks for taking the time! I appreciate the thorough response - enjoy the gold :)

I used to have a Line 6 HD500X and I'm familiar with Line 6 stuff, although as I said I'm not a huge effects user. I will check out the M5. Thank you.Where did I say I was never religious?Nailed it.I didn't say Rick Santorum is the face of a religion. I said that people who grow up learning to be anti-gay, anti-abortion, and young-Earth creationist end up voting for politicians who are anti-gay, anti-abortion, and young-Earth creationists.

This is a problem because then those politicians try to enact policy that forces their discriminatory and unscientific beliefs on the rest of us.

I didn't say Rick Santorum is a religious leader. Reading comprehension FTW, yo.Thanks!That was my question also.Yes, I saw that, but I also have questions about buying the right pedalboard, and choosing a delay pedal, so I asked here.Yes, here's a short explanation from Steve Vai:

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=uehDWQNActABy the way, I wanted to say that I'm sorry to hear about the financial problems, and I hope you get it sorted out soon. If it helps: Don't feel too bad that you had to get rid of a bunch of gear. The Variax, in my opinion, does the same thing as a roomful of guitars, and you don't have to worry about maintaining a bunch of instruments, insuring a bunch of instruments, adjusting to different fret sizes and scale lengths and neck shapes when you switch from one to another, etc. You can even change from E standard tuning to open tunings and drop tunings and even a baritone tuning, without actually retuning the strings. 

I have a bunch of really great guitars (see pic below), including several Custom Shop Fenders, several vintage Gibsons, a Parker, multiple one-of-a-kind custom made guitars, etc - and these are just the electrics; I also have a number of acoustic guitars, vintage classical guitars, and jazz guitars not pictured. Despite this, my Line 6 Variax is, *overwhelmingly*, the one I reach for the most when I'm recording.

http://i.imgur.com/OhDUrOE.jpgYes, the tuning stability on them is quite good. They come with locking tuners and the bridge is exactly the same bridge that comes on the $3800 US versions. 

I replaced the stock machines with Gotoh 18:1 machines for even more precision, but the stock tuners are fine too.How do you like the Wilkenson bridge?

I used to have a Carvin DC127T with one, but I wasn't a fan.I have seen "An" before "historic" in formal writing, so I'd think that it's fine to use "an" before, at minimum, that specific vowel-sounding consonant. 

Be careful about differentiating between initialisms and acronyms. Because NYPD is an initialism (each letter is said aloud individually), the "An/A" precedes the sound of the letter "N," which is spelled "en" (as in "en dash"). The same would not apply to, for example, "NASA," which is an acronym (pronounced as a word), not an initialism.

Edited to add:

I found this on Purdue's OWL. Apparently "h" is an exception if it sounds like a vowel. "U" is an exception the other way, if it's pronounced with a "y" sound, as in "A United States flag."

https://owl.english.purdue.edu/owl/resource/591/01/This seems to be a commonly accepted usage, at least in American English:

https://owl.english.purdue.edu/owl/resource/591/01/
https://owl.english.purdue.edu/owl/resource/540/1/

It says that "A" is preferred, though.I've heard good things about the DL4 but apparently a lot of people mod them to fix common complaints, like the footswitches. Also given the large amount of real estate taken up by the unit, especially if you want to use an expression pedal with it\u2014the thing weighs over 3 pounds!

Do you think it's a better choice than, say, a Strymon Timeline?Thanks. I'll see what I can find. The place I shop the most carries a lot of high-end stuff and I know they have Strymon Timelines in stock. Not sure they have Line 6 gear but if not, there's a Guitar Center not far from there. 

If I get the Line 6, I will probably want to get the JHS mods as well, which really puts them at about the same price. So it's just a matter of pedal board space and features (one of the mods does away with the need for an expression pedal):

https://www.jhspedals.com/products/mod-shop/line-6-dl4-mods/Depending on how often you gig, if you have fewer than 2 or 3 pedals, you don't necessarily need a pedalboard.

If you really like Slash's tone, try out of his signature wahs and see what you think. Alternatively, try out a wah with multiple settings like a 535Q so you can find the one(s) that sound the best with your guitar and amp.

You can also save a lot of money by buying a used pedalboard (they are all over Reverb.com) or you can build you own.Visual Sound actually makes a dual Tube Screamer clone (two stackable TS circuits) pedal called the "Double Trouble" for this reason.On about day 5000, yeah. Just enjoy it while you can ;)That seems unnecessarily and unrealistically advanced for someone asking what the essentials are. 

You can get a used Tubescreamer on Reverb.com for about $50.What kind of amp do you have and what's your budget?

The basic categories of pedals are wah, compression, overdrive/distortion/fuzz, pitch, equalizers, modulation, level, and echo/delay. Not all players need all or even most of these, depending on what kind of music you play and what's built into your amp.

If you don't have a dirt pedal yet, and your amp doesn't do it, that's probably the first thing to add.You can't use the looper at the same time you have the delay on, right?There's a TS Mini on there right now with an asking price of $55. Same guts, smaller enclosure. Also, you have to look at the closing prices, not the asking prices. Most sellers accept offers and will negotiate.That's the idea behind the f.lux Chrome extension:

https://justgetflux.com/Oh yes, of course. I don't know why I said it was a browser extension.From Sweetwater:

&gt;Smaller speakers can produce higher frequencies than larger speakers, which is why a tweeter is small and a woofer is large. So in the real world, a 10\u2033 speaker will generally produce a better \u201ctop end\u201d than a 15\u2033 speaker. There is also a difference between an open-backed cabinet and a closed-cabinet design. Which is why certain amps, like a 4 x 10\u2033 Bassman with an open back will sound different than a 2 x 12\u2033 Bassman with a closed cabinet. And even though speakers may be the same size, they can still have different sound characteristics.

http://www.sweetwater.com/insync/guitar-amp-buying-guide/

The circuits in these 3 Fender amps aren't hugely different. There are some distinctions but the main one is wattage and tube compliment. Higher watt amps will have more clean headroom. So it really depends on what you mean by "brightest cleanest."

The cleanest amp is terms of headroom before breakup and THD will be the highest rated amp of the three, a Twin at 85 tube watts RMS with four 6L6s into two Jensen C12Ks 12s. Twins are famous for being one of the cleanest tube amps around, as far as guitar amps (rather than hi-fi amps), and Jensens have a characteristic "wine glass" crystal clear high end.

That said, if you want bright, a Vibrolux will be closer to that adjective. With 10s, it won't deliver as much low-end thump. It won't have as much clean headroom as a Twin, but it's also a smaller amp. Smaller speakers excel at what's called transient response - they can move faster than bigger speakers, which makes them better at reproducing high frequencies, which is why as Sweetwater says, you see little cones for tweeters and big ones for woofers. Keep in mind that although the difference between 10" and 12" seems small, in terms of surface area for 2 speakers, it makes a huge difference. Because cones are 3 dimensional objects, and because the formula for surface area of a circle multiples rapidly with pi, you get a big change just by changing speaker size a little bit.

I'm getting this info from Dave Hunter's "Guitar Amp Handbook" by the way. A 10" speaker moves 79 square inches whereas a 12" speaker moves 113 square inches. Times two speakers, you get a difference of 68 square inches, which is almost an entire 3rd 10" speaker if you are comparing a 2x10 cab to a 2x12 cab!

The number of speakers and the surface area of them contributes greatly to the perceived loudness and output of an amp, so a 2x12 Twin is going to *sound* a lot louder than a 2x10 Vibrolux even if they have the same power rating and cab design (they don't). You will be able to push the Vibrolux into breakup at a much lower volume than the Twin.

So, do you want clean as in lots of headroom? Do you want bright as in better transient response in the high end? Do you want a combination of both?

If you want as clean as possible, don't get a tube amp. Roland JC120s are popular with jazz players because they have a lot lower THD than any tube amp could ever hope to achieve. 

Don't forget that you can also EQ things brighter to help out, too. Many guitarists use an EQ pedal or rackmount unit for this, if the onboard EQ doesn't get you as much as you need. EQs are, in my opinion, the "secret weapon" of a lot of pros. Many people spend thousands of dollars and countless hours ripping their hair out over changing their pickups, changing their strings, the thickness of the finish on their guitars, the brand of speakers in their amps, the type of tubes in their amps, even what material their picks are made of...

My advice is to spend some time getting your gear right, but then forget about it, shut up, and focus on playing. You can do almost any tone-shaping you could ever need to do with a simple MXR 10-band EQ pedal for $100. Worrying about which is cleaner, a Vibrolux or a Twin, should not be at the top of your list. A more practical concern is which one is the right size, weight, and power for your application. 

Do you gig a lot and need a smaller amp that you can carry easily and mic up for extra volume? Do you like vibrato AND reverb? Get a Vibrolux.

Do you need a big amp that can keep up with a rock drummer at band practice without sound reinforcement? Get a Twin.

Do you need an amp that you can play at home without pissing off your neighbors but still has a great Fender clean tone? Get a Deluxe.

Other than that they are really about the same.I have a 60-watt 1x12. It's the most versatile amp Fender has ever produced (if you don't count the Cyber series or the Mustang series of modeling amps).

Cool trick with the Super-Sonic: It has a foot-switchable effects loop with an adjustable level control. If you take a little, high-quality patch cable and run the preamp out directly into the poweramp in (just close the loop), on top of the burn channel, you can use the footswitch for the effects loop as an additional boost!I play a lot of jazz and I have two main amps I use for this.

One is a crystal clean single channel $3,000 Fargen Custom Shop 30-watt 6L6 loaded "Blackbird" with a Tone Tubby hemp coned ceramic 40/40 12" speaker, spring reverb, and a bright switch.

The other one is a totally stock 1x8 (not a typo) solid state DV Mark "Little Jazz" 45-watt combo with a 3-band EQ, built-in (digital) reverb, and an XLR line out. That thing gets *damn loud* if you crank it, especially if you put it up on a table instead of pointing it at your ankles. It can easily keep up with a jazz drummer without reinforcement. It weighs 15 pounds (again not a typo).

It was $350.

Guess which ones sees the most sunshine? I'll give you a hint: It's not the 40-pound Fargen. Thanks for taking the time! I appreciate the thorough response - enjoy the gold :)

I used to have a Line 6 HD500X and I'm familiar with Line 6 stuff, although as I said I'm not a huge effects user. I will check out the M5. Thank you.Where did I say I was never religious?Nailed it.I didn't say Rick Santorum is the face of a religion. I said that people who grow up learning to be anti-gay, anti-abortion, and young-Earth creationist end up voting for politicians who are anti-gay, anti-abortion, and young-Earth creationists.

This is a problem because then those politicians try to enact policy that forces their discriminatory and unscientific beliefs on the rest of us.

I didn't say Rick Santorum is a religious leader. Reading comprehension FTW, yo.Thanks!That was my question also.Yes, I saw that, but I also have questions about buying the right pedalboard, and choosing a delay pedal, so I asked here.Yes, here's a short explanation from Steve Vai:

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=uehDWQNActABy the way, I wanted to say that I'm sorry to hear about the financial problems, and I hope you get it sorted out soon. If it helps: Don't feel too bad that you had to get rid of a bunch of gear. The Variax, in my opinion, does the same thing as a roomful of guitars, and you don't have to worry about maintaining a bunch of instruments, insuring a bunch of instruments, adjusting to different fret sizes and scale lengths and neck shapes when you switch from one to another, etc. You can even change from E standard tuning to open tunings and drop tunings and even a baritone tuning, without actually retuning the strings. 

I have a bunch of really great guitars (see pic below), including several Custom Shop Fenders, several vintage Gibsons, a Parker, multiple one-of-a-kind custom made guitars, etc - and these are just the electrics; I also have a number of acoustic guitars, vintage classical guitars, and jazz guitars not pictured. Despite this, my Line 6 Variax is, *overwhelmingly*, the one I reach for the most when I'm recording.

http://i.imgur.com/OhDUrOE.jpgYes, the tuning stability on them is quite good. They come with locking tuners and the bridge is exactly the same bridge that comes on the $3800 US versions. 

I replaced the stock machines with Gotoh 18:1 machines for even more precision, but the stock tuners are fine too.How do you like the Wilkenson bridge?

I used to have a Carvin DC127T with one, but I wasn't a fan.I have seen "An" before "historic" in formal writing, so I'd think that it's fine to use "an" before, at minimum, that specific vowel-sounding consonant. 

Be careful about differentiating between initialisms and acronyms. Because NYPD is an initialism (each letter is said aloud individually), the "An/A" precedes the sound of the letter "N," which is spelled "en" (as in "en dash"). The same would not apply to, for example, "NASA," which is an acronym (pronounced as a word), not an initialism.

Edited to add:

I found this on Purdue's OWL. Apparently "h" is an exception if it sounds like a vowel. "U" is an exception the other way, if it's pronounced with a "y" sound, as in "A United States flag."

https://owl.english.purdue.edu/owl/resource/591/01/This seems to be a commonly accepted usage, at least in American English:

https://owl.english.purdue.edu/owl/resource/591/01/
https://owl.english.purdue.edu/owl/resource/540/1/

It says that "A" is preferred, though.I've heard good things about the DL4 but apparently a lot of people mod them to fix common complaints, like the footswitches. Also given the large amount of real estate taken up by the unit, especially if you want to use an expression pedal with it\u2014the thing weighs over 3 pounds!

Do you think it's a better choice than, say, a Strymon Timeline?Thanks. I'll see what I can find. The place I shop the most carries a lot of high-end stuff and I know they have Strymon Timelines in stock. Not sure they have Line 6 gear but if not, there's a Guitar Center not far from there. 

If I get the Line 6, I will probably want to get the JHS mods as well, which really puts them at about the same price. So it's just a matter of pedal board space and features (one of the mods does away with the need for an expression pedal):

https://www.jhspedals.com/products/mod-shop/line-6-dl4-mods/Depending on how often you gig, if you have fewer than 2 or 3 pedals, you don't necessarily need a pedalboard.

If you really like Slash's tone, try out of his signature wahs and see what you think. Alternatively, try out a wah with multiple settings like a 535Q so you can find the one(s) that sound the best with your guitar and amp.

You can also save a lot of money by buying a used pedalboard (they are all over Reverb.com) or you can build you own.Visual Sound actually makes a dual Tube Screamer clone (two stackable TS circuits) pedal called the "Double Trouble" for this reason.On about day 5000, yeah. Just enjoy it while you can ;)That seems unnecessarily and unrealistically advanced for someone asking what the essentials are. 

You can get a used Tubescreamer on Reverb.com for about $50.What kind of amp do you have and what's your budget?

The basic categories of pedals are wah, compression, overdrive/distortion/fuzz, pitch, equalizers, modulation, level, and echo/delay. Not all players need all or even most of these, depending on what kind of music you play and what's built into your amp.

If you don't have a dirt pedal yet, and your amp doesn't do it, that's probably the first thing to add.You can't use the looper at the same time you have the delay on, right?There's a TS Mini on there right now with an asking price of $55. Same guts, smaller enclosure. Also, you have to look at the closing prices, not the asking prices. Most sellers accept offers and will negotiate.That's the idea behind the f.lux Chrome extension:

https://justgetflux.com/Oh yes, of course. I don't know why I said it was a browser extension.From Sweetwater:

&gt;Smaller speakers can produce higher frequencies than larger speakers, which is why a tweeter is small and a woofer is large. So in the real world, a 10\u2033 speaker will generally produce a better \u201ctop end\u201d than a 15\u2033 speaker. There is also a difference between an open-backed cabinet and a closed-cabinet design. Which is why certain amps, like a 4 x 10\u2033 Bassman with an open back will sound different than a 2 x 12\u2033 Bassman with a closed cabinet. And even though speakers may be the same size, they can still have different sound characteristics.

http://www.sweetwater.com/insync/guitar-amp-buying-guide/

The circuits in these 3 Fender amps aren't hugely different. There are some distinctions but the main one is wattage and tube compliment. Higher watt amps will have more clean headroom. So it really depends on what you mean by "brightest cleanest."

The cleanest amp is terms of headroom before breakup and THD will be the highest rated amp of the three, a Twin at 85 tube watts RMS with four 6L6s into two Jensen C12Ks 12s. Twins are famous for being one of the cleanest tube amps around, as far as guitar amps (rather than hi-fi amps), and Jensens have a characteristic "wine glass" crystal clear high end.

That said, if you want bright, a Vibrolux will be closer to that adjective. With 10s, it won't deliver as much low-end thump. It won't have as much clean headroom as a Twin, but it's also a smaller amp. Smaller speakers excel at what's called transient response - they can move faster than bigger speakers, which makes them better at reproducing high frequencies, which is why as Sweetwater says, you see little cones for tweeters and big ones for woofers. Keep in mind that although the difference between 10" and 12" seems small, in terms of surface area for 2 speakers, it makes a huge difference. Because cones are 3 dimensional objects, and because the formula for surface area of a circle multiples rapidly with pi, you get a big change just by changing speaker size a little bit.

I'm getting this info from Dave Hunter's "Guitar Amp Handbook" by the way. A 10" speaker moves 79 square inches whereas a 12" speaker moves 113 square inches. Times two speakers, you get a difference of 68 square inches, which is almost an entire 3rd 10" speaker if you are comparing a 2x10 cab to a 2x12 cab!

The number of speakers and the surface area of them contributes greatly to the perceived loudness and output of an amp, so a 2x12 Twin is going to *sound* a lot louder than a 2x10 Vibrolux even if they have the same power rating and cab design (they don't). You will be able to push the Vibrolux into breakup at a much lower volume than the Twin.

So, do you want clean as in lots of headroom? Do you want bright as in better transient response in the high end? Do you want a combination of both?

If you want as clean as possible, don't get a tube amp. Roland JC120s are popular with jazz players because they have a lot lower THD than any tube amp could ever hope to achieve. 

Don't forget that you can also EQ things brighter to help out, too. Many guitarists use an EQ pedal or rackmount unit for this, if the onboard EQ doesn't get you as much as you need. EQs are, in my opinion, the "secret weapon" of a lot of pros. Many people spend thousands of dollars and countless hours ripping their hair out over changing their pickups, changing their strings, the thickness of the finish on their guitars, the brand of speakers in their amps, the type of tubes in their amps, even what material their picks are made of...

My advice is to spend some time getting your gear right, but then forget about it, shut up, and focus on playing. You can do almost any tone-shaping you could ever need to do with a simple MXR 10-band EQ pedal for $100. Worrying about which is cleaner, a Vibrolux or a Twin, should not be at the top of your list. A more practical concern is which one is the right size, weight, and power for your application. 

Do you gig a lot and need a smaller amp that you can carry easily and mic up for extra volume? Do you like vibrato AND reverb? Get a Vibrolux.

Do you need a big amp that can keep up with a rock drummer at band practice without sound reinforcement? Get a Twin.

Do you need an amp that you can play at home without pissing off your neighbors but still has a great Fender clean tone? Get a Deluxe.

Other than that they are really about the same.I have a 60-watt 1x12. It's the most versatile amp Fender has ever produced (if you don't count the Cyber series or the Mustang series of modeling amps).

Cool trick with the Super-Sonic: It has a foot-switchable effects loop with an adjustable level control. If you take a little, high-quality patch cable and run the preamp out directly into the poweramp in (just close the loop), on top of the burn channel, you can use the footswitch for the effects loop as an additional boost!I play a lot of jazz and I have two main amps I use for this.

One is a crystal clean single channel $3,000 Fargen Custom Shop 30-watt 6L6 loaded "Blackbird" with a Tone Tubby hemp coned ceramic 40/40 12" speaker, spring reverb, and a bright switch.

The other one is a totally stock 1x8 (not a typo) solid state DV Mark "Little Jazz" 45-watt combo with a 3-band EQ, built-in (digital) reverb, and an XLR line out. That thing gets *damn loud* if you crank it, especially if you put it up on a table instead of pointing it at your ankles. It can easily keep up with a jazz drummer without reinforcement. It weighs 15 pounds (again not a typo).

It was $350.

Guess which ones sees the most sunshine? I'll give you a hint: It's not the 40-pound Fargen. OP isn't in the market:

&gt; what are the main sonic differences between those amps? Not looking to buy anything

&gt;what are the main sonic differences between those amps? Not looking to buy anything

OP isn't in the market, just curious about the sonic differences.I don't know what you mean by "heart-breaking effect," but I tend to tune my high E slightly sharp on most of my guitars. My main recording guitar has a True temperament neck and that isn't necessary, but on the rest of them, a sharp E sounds more consonant to my ear.**Let's clarify your question a bit.**

Are you looking for a $300 full hollow that is a relatively good *value?*

**There is no such thing as a "good hollowbody" under $300** used unless you're buying a stolen one. There are some hollowbodies that you can find under $300 that have better bang-for-buck than their competitors but that's a different question, so I want to make sure we're on the same page.

**I really don't recommend spending less than about $400 on ANY electric** guitar, period. If you spend less than that you are likely to run into problems like bad fretwork, loose frets, buzzing, divots, swollen or dried seating, sharp fret ends, relief/bow or truss rod problems, high action, noise or shielding issues, tuning stability issues, worn out jacks, rusted or sticky saddles, poorly cut nuts with bad intonation, noticeably and poorly performed structural repairs (esp on places like the headstock), and if this sort of thing matters to you, unethical and sometimes illegal labor and environmental practices.

For a hollowbody, I'd raise that to about a $500 minimum. Hollowbodies are, unforunately, simply more costly to build than solidbody electrics.

If you are looking for a relatively good value, and your budget is $300 or close to it, the most important question to come next is **"What style of music do you want to play?"**

**Depending on whether you are looking for a thick jazzy sound, a twangy fingerstyle country sound, a jangly Beatles sound, a roaring rockabilly/punk sound, or a fat bluesy sound, my suggestions will differ *drastically.***

Overall, here are my brand recommendations for **underpriced/good value** hollowbody style guitars:

**Ibanez, Eastman, Godin, Hagstrom, Loar, Washburn, DeArmond, Cort, and Aria.**

Epiphone is in the middle of the pack as far as bang-for-buck. Some of their models are a really great value. Others are overpriced. I wouldn't direct you toward an Epi right away unless you really love Gibsons and want that aesthetic specifically, or you are looking at a vintage (pre-Gibson) Epi. There are some surprisingly good deals out there on fully hollow ones.

To clarify, when you say you want fully hollow, you mean a big bodied jazz guitar, right? Or do you mean a thinbody with no center block?

Also to clarify, are you looking for a guitar with humbuckers? With P90s? Do you have a preference?

Let us know also, in addition to what kind of music you play, what kind of amp you're using, and where you are located, so we can recommend a good match (not every guitar sounds good with every amp) and what is available as far as used markets in your area.Sure, happy to helpWhen you're ready to shop, the two things that are really the most important, besides your budget, are:

1) What kind of music do you play? and

2) What are you going to use it for?

Obviously the right amp for you depends on what kinds of sounds you need, but also, what features you need.

The answer of which amp is right for you changes drastically depending on whether you're using it for rehearsal, practicing, home/silent recording, studio recording, busking, bar gigs, touring, etc. 

If you want to learn a lot about tube amps, check out Dave Hunter's "Guitar Amp Handbook." There are two editions; the newest one just came out a few months ago and the older one came out in 2005. You can get the older one for about $5 used. Definitely worth a read if you're interested in how amps work and the kind of stuff I talked about above.No problemAre you talking about applying to music school or just for personal study?

You don't need to take an exam to have a goal-oriented practice regimen, a list of milestones, and a plan to reach them.Amps *have* gotten cheaper over time. And the technology has *certainly not* stayed the same over time.

60 years ago, all tubes were P2P hand wired. They had tube reverb, tube rectifiers, tube preamps and tube power amps.

Then, in the '60s/'70s, along came transistors. They were punchier, cleaner, lighter weight, tougher, required less maintenance, worked at any volume level, had headphone outputs, and cost less.

Then along came digital modeling amps in the '90s. They were versatile, sounded better than solid state amps, had built-in effects and often a built-in tuner, and had cab-modeled direct outputs for recording.

Each type of amp has their fans. Jazz and metal players still often use solid state amps. Most blues and rock players still prefer tube amps despite their drawbacks and high cost, although most tube amps today have printed circuit boards and therefore don't cost as much as they used to. Studio rats tend to like modeling amps for their versatility and efficiency. 

It just depends on what you want. There are quality amps at every budget from $200 to $5,000 and beyond.

I have several very expensive tube amps

http://i.imgur.com/GftvU3r.jpg

but the one I use the most is a Line 6 DT25 digital modeling amp, available for well under a grand used (they are $999 new). I also love my DV Mark Little Jazz, available for about $300 used.That's a pretty good price for a Mesa combo. Some of their cabs cost that much. What model was this?

Mesas have a bit of a premium for the brand name, but it's mostly because they are just really well-built, handmade tube amps made in the USA.I almost exclusively use the neck pickup. One of my guitars (Schaefer 16") is a custom guitar and it doesn't even have a bridge pickup. On my main recording guitar, a heavily modded Line 6 JTV-69, I replaced the neck and middle pickup with Seymour Duncans, but I kept the stock pickup in the bridge because I never use it anyway.The interesting thing to me about these photos is the color quality of the prints. I'm talking about the finish color - These look like two completely different guitars! That's a reasonable deal on a beginner guitar. If you are looking for an entry-level full sized electric with two humbuckers, it's hard to go wrong with an Epiphone. I would recommend getting a nicer used one for the same price, though, especially if you can find one that's had a proper fret dressing already. The fretwork and action on those lower end ones can be rough.If you are doing home recording, I highly recommend against a tube amp, especially if your budget is only $300, even if you buy used. 

For recording, you will need a good microphone, a good preamp/interface, and isolation as well. These things are not cheap. 

Get an amp with a cab-simulated direct out so you can record silently. You'll get a much better signal-to-noise ratio, a lower noise floor, and you won't need to buy extra equipment or worry about isolation. 

Tube amps are great if you are nostalgic but frankly they are 60 year old technology. Home recording has come a LONG way since then. If you're on a budget, you will get better results with a modeling amp.There are so many brands and they're all substantially similar except for a few outliers.

I'm a big fan of Elixir Nanowebs for wound strings. I use them on all my guitars. They come stock on Taylors for a good reason. They last a very long time and they're a good value - they cost just under twice as much as non-coated strings but last easily 3x as long. This only applies to the wound strings; the plain strings are just normal plain steel strings. If you don't break (wound) strings often, they're a good value.

I change my plain strings pretty regularly because I like the sound and feel of fresh plain strings. As a result I buy them in bulk and go for pretty cheap ones.

When I put on a new set of Elixirs, I play them until the plain strings are dead. Then, I swap just the plain strings for new ones. I use D'Addario plain steels for my singles. A 5-pack from JustStrings.com is 3 bucks. Can't beat that.

One other thing: ***CLEAN YOUR STRINGS.*** A simple wipe-down with a cleaning cloth will help your strings last a lot longer. You can use string cleaner too if you want. It will save you a lot of time and money in the long run.Take lessons! A good teacher will help you set goals and establish a realistic timeline for meeting them.No, I'm talking about replacement single plain steel strings. So for example, I use an Elixir set for my wound strings, and because they are coated, they last a *lot* longer than the plain strings do.

So, once the plain strings start to go dead, I replace them with plain strings I buy in bulk. You can buy singles in a pack of 5 for $3. In other words, you can get a pack of 5x high E strings for $3, 5x B strings for $3, and 5x G strings for $3. Total cost of changing the top 3 strings is $1.80, which I do once a week or so. You don't need to change the wound strings nearly as often, maybe once a month or every 6 weeks. The wound strings cost $9 for a pack, but that also includes new plain strings.

How often you change your strings really depends on how clean you keep them, how much you play your guitar, how hard you are on your strings, and how much you prefer fresh ones versus worn-in ones. Fresh strings (properly stretched) stay in tune better and have a cleaner sound and sustain better. But there are no rules. The only time you HAVE to change a string is when it breaks.

You should wash your hands every time before you play, and you should clean your strings (even just a simple wipedown) every time you're finished playing.

You can't really compare D'Adarrio and Ernie Ball with Elixir because Elixirs are coated strings and the others are uncoated strings. They are targeted toward a different market and they serve a different purpose.

Coated strings have a polymer coating that helps them last a really long time. They also cost more.

Uncoated strings sound slightly brighter, last something like 1/3 as long as coated strings, and cost about half as much.

It just depends on how often you want to change your strings, what you want to spend, and what kind of sound you want.

There are also different materials for strings. Stainless steel will sound the brightest. Nickel strings sound warmer. Really though, the EQ settings on your amp matter a lot more than what kind of strings you're using."I can never ever finish a song 100%"

Yes you can, but not with that attitude.

You *choose* not to finish learning a song.

That said, there's nothing wrong with making a song your own. Unless you are playing in a tribute band or doing session backing tracks or something, there's no reason you have to play a song exactly as it was on the original recording. It's music. You're supposed to be artistic about it.Those are what I use. The difference between the two is minimal. Polyweb is a bit older technology. It sounds a bit thicker than Nanoweb, which sounds a bit clearer. Polyweb has a reputation for the coating peeling off over time, but also has slightly less string noise than Nanoweb. It just depends on what's important to you.

I prefer Nanoweb personally.The polymer coating is only on the wound strings. The purpose of the coating is to keep dirt and oil from getting caught between the windings, as detailed on their website:

http://www.elixirstrings.com/images/3way-gunk.jpg

The plain strings just steel. There are anti-rust treated (stainless steel), but they don't have the polymer coating, which is what Elixir strings are all about.Any of the G3 tours feature this.Adjusting the action shouldn't cost anywhere near $50. Even with a string change and full setup, most techs charge somewhere in the $30 range for this. If you are paying $50 you are seriously overpaying.

Anytime you adjust the action, you should also set the intonation. It's not difficult to do at home if you have the proper tools (feeler gauges and allen wrenches for the action, mini screwdriver set for the intonation, and an accurate tuner, such as a bench tuner with a strobe mode).

Take it to a local tech and tell them what you want. It's a 30 minute job, tops.

Edited to add: Go buy yourself a copy of Dan Erlewine's "How To Make Your Electric Guitar Play Great!" used for $6. You'll save yourself hundreds a year in tech fees.Let's fix your guitar before you start giving up on using the whole fretboard.

What kind of guitar do you have?First question: What's your budget?
Second question: What style(s) of music do you like?They are plain steel that's been "anti-rust" treated. I don't know exactly what that means, but that's what Elixir says in their marketing. They do not have the polymer coating that makes Elixir wound strings special.To be clear about this, fanned frets address/solve a totally different problem. The idea behind fanned frets is that you get a tighter, more focused bass response with a longer scale, which is why baritone guitars and basses have longer scales. The downside of course is that if you keep the pitch the same (E standard) but with a longer scale for better bass response, for example the way Soloway Swan guitars are designed, you run into the problem of high tension on the strings, which is tough on the neck stability, and also it's a lot more difficult to bend strings. Also, higher pitched strings will have too much tension on a long scale. So, a fanned fret system helps the low notes have more focus and clarity, and the still keeps it easy to bend and play comfortably on the high notes.

True Temperament necks have nothing to do with this problem and in fact, you can have a neck that is both True Temperament *and* fanned fret if you wanted to address both intonation problems and scale length problems together.

To answer your questions:

1) It feels normal. You don't notice it while you're playing. 

2) Yes, a little bit. You have to use your ears a little bit more than just simply doing it by feel. On some notes, bending a little bit makes the pitch change a lot. On other notes, bending makes the pitch change less than you'd expect, depending on which way the fret is positioned for that particular string. It's not that big of a deal, though. You get used to it in about 5 minutes or so.Hi /u/guitarnoir.

I have LONG been bothered by the poor intonation of standard guitars. I have tried the Buzz Feiten tuning system and also the Earvana system. Both helped incrementally but did not solve the problem even remotely. 

I use a stroboscopic tuner to check and set intonation on all my guitars. The tuner I use is a Sonic Research ST-200. They're about $130 and I love mine. They also make a "mini" version for the same price, if you're using it on a pedalboard rather than as a bench tuner. It's accurate to within \u00b1.02 cents.

I can say with hard evidence that the TT neck intonates better than any of my other guitars, including a $5,000+ Parker Fly Artist and a couple of similarly priced Custom Shop Fenders. 

Part of understanding how the TT neck works is understanding that the open strings are offset in a specific pattern. The frets further accommodate differences in the strings as far as gauge and whether they are plain or wound, and the relative tension of the strings in standard tuning. Normal frets do not take these factors into account and assume a theoretically perfect string that does not go sharp when fretted, that intonates the same whether it's wound or plain, and that intonates the same regardless of tension. Real strings in the real world, of course, do not behave this way. TT frets are not perfect but they do take these factors into account and the result is immediately noticeable even by someone without extremely sensitive ears.

I should say that I have noticed over the years that my sense of pitch is considerably more sensitive than most other people's and even than many other musicians. I know multiple people who have been playing music at a concert level for decades, who cannot sense "warbles" in pitch that I not only notice, but which are *extremely* frustrating to me. 

If you can hear the difference outlined in the video below, I'm certain you will benefit from trying a True Temperament neck. Please note that not everyone can hear the difference. If you can't, consider yourself lucky, I'd say. It's more of a curse than a blessing.

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=6NlI4No3s0M

To give you an example, I keep my bridges floating, and for many years now, I have paid close attention to which direction I use for vibrato on diads depending on the interval. For example, for vibrato on diads consisting of a major third, I have always used the whammy bar to push slightly flat as far as the vibrato is concerned. For minor thirds, I use the whammy bar to pull up so the vibrato is slightly sharp. I find that this is much more pleasing to the ear than doing it the other way around.

If you don't notice a difference, a TT neck may not be worth it to you. They are not cheap and they are a pain to maintain as far as fret dressing and so on, but if you can hear the difference, you will be THRILLED that there is finally a solution for this.

As far as your other question, yes, if you have a bolt-on neck, it's much cheaper to simply replace the neck. That is what I did on my Line 6 guitar. If you have a guitar that does not have a bolt-on neck, such as a Les Paul or an acoustic guitar, the company still offers TT installations. You just have to send them your guitar, and what they do is remove the entire fretboard and install a new one with the fret slots cut for TT frets. Then they install the frets and send the guitar back to you. On the bright side, if you want any kind of custom inlays, they can do this for you at the same time, since they're replacing the entire fretboard anyway.I wouldn't say there's really a noticeable difference in tone. It's a maple neck with a rosewood board, same as the stock neck. When I replaced the neck, I also put a much better nut on it (Tusq instead of plastic) and much better tuning machines (Gotoh Delta 510s) which are higher mass than the stock tuners. I imagine any improved tone would come from the increased mass at the headstock and the density of the nut.

Replacing the neck has no effect on using pedals with the exception of needing less compression:

The one thing that's immediately noticeable, aside from improved intonation that's to be expected, is the increased sustain. This guitar *sings.* It is difficult to describe. The upper harmonics in diads and chords that used to "fight" each other for sonic space now, instead, resonate together and reinforce each other. It feels as though you have a bit of compression on at all times, even if you're not using a compressor pedal. I have a Keeley 4-knob that I find I don't really use anymore because it's not needed. When I play with drive, I've noticed that I don't use as much dirt as I did before because you don't need it to get the same sustain as before. The notes just last longer.

Steve Vai does a good job of demonstrating the increased sustain at this point in the video I linked above:

https://youtu.be/uehDWQNActA?t=2m20s

I have the same experience. As I said, it's like having a compressor/sustainer on at all times, except without one.Not to be a whiner but I hate it. I actually mostly listen to orchestral classical music because classical musicians are trained to play with better intonation than is possible on guitars and pianos. In the car, I almost always listen to news and talk radio instead of music for this reason also.Okay cool. I *highly* recommend that you do not spend anywhere near $2k on your first electric guitar even if you have a lot of experience with acoustic guitars.

First of all, a lot of your tone will come from your amp, so you need to leave room in your budget for a good one. The amp is at least half of your tone, if not more than that. In fact, if you have $2k to spend on a guitar and an amp, I'd recommend spending $1300 on the amp and $700 on the guitar rather than the other way around. A great amp can make a just-okay guitar sound good, and a good guitar sound *great.* However, a subpar amp will make even the best guitars sound just-okay. Simply put, amps matter more than guitars as far as tone. You want a guitar that feels good and inspires you to practice a lot, though, too.

The reason I recommend against spending a lot on your first electric is that you need to know all your preferences before you drop that kind of money on a pro-level ax. There are a *lot* of minor things that add up to your perfect guitar, *many* more factors than come into play on an acoustic guitar. For example:

1) Single coils versus P90s versus humbuckers? What kind of voicing for the pickups? Vintage, modern? Ceramic? Active or passive? 

2) Front routed or rear routed?

3) What kind of neck profile? C? D? U? What kind of fingerboard radius? 10"? 12"? Compound? What size frets? Vintage? Medium jumbo? Wide/flat? Rosewood? Maple? Ebony?

4) Bolt-on? Set neck? Set-in? Neck thru? Direct mounted pickups? Pickup rings? 

5) Locking tuners? High ratio tuners? Top loading tuners? Auto-crimping tuners? Six on a side? 3+3? Reverse? 

6) Solidbody? Chambered? Semi-hollow? Hollow? Carved top? Laminate top? Thinline? Arm bevel? Tummy cut? Body binding?

7) Front jack? Side jack? Inset Strat jack? Tele socket jack? 

8) Bent steel saddles? Tune-o-matic? Fixed bridge? Floating bridge? Blocked trem? Floyd? Bigsby? Wraparound? 

9) Maple cap? Center joined? One-piece top? Bookmatched? 

10) Quartersawn? Flatsawn? 3-piece neck? Volute? String tree? Staggered tuners? Locking nut? Roller nut? 

These are just off the top of my head. I could easily list 10 more categories of things like this. **If you don't know what all of these things are, and have specific articulable preferences for each one,** you're not ready to buy a $2000 guitar.

My advice is to buy a mid-level decent electric and play it for a year or two. Learn about electric guitars. Decide for yourself what your preferences are on all of these things by trying them out and seeing what you like *and why.* We will not be able to tell you what is best for any of this stuff because it totally depends on what you like and what works for you and your technique and playing style. I can tell you what equipment to buy to get the same tone you hear on those songs, but that's about it. There's more than one way to get those tones and you may not like the way those guitars feel, etc. 

If you want to sound like John Mayer, the easiest way to do that is to buy a Fender John Mayer Signature Strat (no longer in production but available used) or really any single-coiled loaded American Strat or Strat copy - there are lots of good options. Then run this into a clean Fender amp like a Deluxe, a Princeton, a Vibrolux, or my personal favorite, a Super-Sonic. You might also want to pick up something like a JHS Morning Glory pedal or an Electro-Harmonix Soul Food pedal for more of a gritty Fenderesque transparent tube breakup tone on solos. This will set you back a total of about $2500 for everything.

Is this the right rig for you? I can't say. It's a great start. Any John Mayer or Rivers Cuomo fan would likely be happy to play on that setup. 

I suggest buying something along the lines of a **used Fender Modern Player Telecaster.** They are excellent, underpriced, mid-level electric guitars. They are readily available used for $300-400 or so on Reverb.com. They have a fixed bridge, so you don't have to worry about getting used to tuning stability issues that plague a lot of lower-end electrics with floating bridges, whose trem systems are mostly for show. They have two single coils for that twangy country-rock/punk sound Wilco goes for, and that crystalline John Mayer tone, as well as a splittable humbucker in the bridge, so you can get an idea of what a humbucker sounds like and decide if you want one later. They have a comfortable neck and like most Teles leave little to the imagination as far as articulation - you have to be a clean and precise player to get the most out of a Tele, which will help you as you adjust and adapt to playing on an electric. And they have a very traditional look that will fit in with the style of music you're talking about. They're also easy to mod and upgrade if you decide you want to experiment with GraphTech saddles, locking tuners, straplocks, upgraded pickups, etc.

For amps, it really depends on your application. Will you be using this for recording in a studio environment? recording at home to your computer? band practice? jam sessions? small gigs? large gigs? busking? What's your budget for an amp? I can recommend some good ones if you give me some direction. What the hell? Was this a Guitar Center or something?

Try another tech. Unless it's a $100 guitar with a broken truss rod, this is almost certainly something that can be fixed. "Old" doesn't mean you can't do anything to fix it. Hell, there are plenty of guitars from the 1940s still in common use today. I have several 50 year old guitars myself that are still running strong. That's crap.No. The construction is totally different.

Jazz guitars (the kind of f-holes), that look like this:

https://c2.staticflickr.com/8/7357/11678995335_0e27c01451_c.jpg

are built based on similar construction principles to violin family instruments. They have what's called a carved top and back, that is, the luthier starts with a thick piece of wood and uses planes to shape it into an "bowl" or arch shape. 

Acoustic guitars, also called "flat top" guitars:

http://i.imgur.com/lWJycKE.jpg

have soundboards that are not carved into an arch, but instead are just planed flat. They evolved from the lute family of instruments and came to us through the Spanish guitar line of folk instruments as opposed to the Italian line of classical instruments.

A flat soundboard gives them a very different sound. These are popular with bluegrass players and with folk players and acoustic rock players, as opposed to jazz players who tend to use archtops.

Archtop jazz guitars use electric or acoustic guitar strings, but usually electric strings, and often flatwound strings. Acoustic flattop guitars always use acoustic strings (e.g. phosphor bronze, etc). You can tell acoustic strings from electric strings because electric strings are usually grey/silver colored and acoustic strings are usually more copper/gold colored.I saw the /r/bass was already suggested but I can give you some advice if you'd like as well. What will you be using this for? Home recording? Studio recording? Touring? Playing big clubs? Small clubs? Busking? Practicing at home? 

Also, what's your budget? And lastly, what kind of music do you play and what kind of bass do you have?I have 3 Gibsons, a '64 ES-345 VOS, a '69 ES-150, and a '98 Les Paul DC Standard. 

Gibsons made nowadays are overpriced crap. It's horribly sad. PRS really took over the high-end two humbucker solidbody market, and a good chunk of the semi-hollow market, too. You'd think the competition would keep them sharp, but they seem to have gone the other way, coasting on their brand name.

I was especially disappointed in the way they handled Les Paul's 100th birthday. I really was hoping to see a huge rock concert, maybe a DVD included with a special run of guitars, featuring all the "double signature" Gibson players - Joe Perry, Ace Frehley, Buckethead, Jimmy Page, Slash, Peter Frampton, Billy Gibbons, et al. Would have been cool to do something at Les Paul's Iridium club in NYC. I dunno, something memorable. Instead they had this stupid guitar giveaway? Really? It's like they forgot about it until a week ahead of time. They should have been planning that for 5 years. Hey man, first of all, congrats on the pregnancy and I hope everything goes smoothly in January :)

***TL;DR: You don't want an attenuator; you want a loadbox with a cab simulator and a built-in headphone preamp.***

One word of warning: Amps can carry lethal power *even when they're not plugged in.* Never go rooting around inside your amp if you don't know what you're doing.

**Long answer:**

The reason that attenuators tend not to have headphone output jacks is that attenuators are designed to solve a different problem than the one you're talking about. 

If you are set on getting an attenuator, there are a couple of options that *can* be used to do what you want. If you want to use an attenuator, you will need to buy 3 things, since you already have the headphones: The right attenuator itself, a headphone amp, and a cable to run from the attenuator to the headphone amp. Then just plug your headphones into the headphone amp and you're set.

**I don't recommend this.**

Here's the deal: Attenuators work by lowering the amplitude (power) of the electrical signal. But it's important to understand exactly what makes tube guitar amps sound so good in order to understand why this is actually probably not your best solution.

A big part of the way guitar amps work is not just lighting up preamp tubes, nor is it pushing the power amp tubes into gritty warmth when cranked, although these contribute to it. What makes guitar amps sound the way they sound is a combination of the caps, preamp &amp; EQ section, the power tubes, the output transformer, the speaker, and the movement of air after the speaker. An equally *HUGELY* important part of the tone of a recorded guitar track is not only the type of microphone but also the placement of the microphone on the speaker both with regard to axis and distance.

An attenuator is actually called a "power attenuator" because what it is designed to do is divert or dissipate whatever amount of power is not needed for your application, coming from the amp guts, before it goes into the speaker. But you still need to run the load into a speaker after that - the attenuator doesn't just swallow that load (har har).

Some attenuators are also designed to serve a dual function of *replacing* the speaker cabinet in terms handling the load coming from the amp. This is called a dummy load. Note that this doesn't actually let you hear what the amp is doing - the dummy load absorbs the power coming from the amp *instead* of converting that power into an acoustic signal (which is what a speaker does). Generally this is used for working on amps, when an amp tech needs the amp turned on in order to do certain things while working on it, like checking the operating voltage or setting the bias for tube swaps. Called a loadbox, these convert the unneeded energy into heat instead of acoustic energy.

An attenuator with a dummy load option aka loadbox will let you run your amp without using any speaker, but it won't help you listen to the sound of it through headphones instead. And definitely **do not** try running the output from an attenuator into your headphones or into a headphone amp! The power handling of your headphones is not rated for that kind of power and they will blow instantly (as will your amp). In case you didn't already know, you should also NEVER run your amp without anything attached. You must plug in either a speaker that converts the power from the amp into acoustic energy, or a dummy load that takes that energy and converts it to heat, but you must always use one of these.

In order to do what you want, you'll need an attenuator with both a dummy load *and* a line output. Then what you do is set the attenuator to dummy load mode (to absorb the power coming from the amp), and use the line out to feed a headphone amp. 

The problem with doing it this way is that a major part of the tone of your amp is the sound of the speaker itself. A line out will not simulate this tone, and will sound very flat and sterile. This is called a "dry" signal and unpleasant to listen to. The reason attenuators have this option is not for going into a headphone amp, but rather, for cloning and reamping. This lets you run a second rig, if for example you want to put effects on your signal but still maintain your dry sound, or if you're in the recording studio and you want the option of trying other guitar speaker cabs after you've recorded your guitar part. But you ideally never want to listen to guitar sounds that have *never* run through a speaker cabinet because they sound awful.

So what can you do? Well, that's what cab simulators are for!

A cab simulator is a digital recreation of what a speaker cab sounds like if it were actually mic'ed up in a studio environment, as far as how this combination of physical objects affect and color the dry signal coming out of your power amp\u2014the final step in what contributes to the tone of a tube amp before it hits your ear. Now, I know what you're thinking - the whole point of using your Hot Rod instead of a modeling amp is that you want real tube tone, right?

The thing is, digital cab/mic simulators in the year 2015 are VERY good and are even used in many professional studio situations instead of mic'ing up a real speaker cab, for both the reason that it's faster and easy to change your mind if you want to experiment with various (simulated) cabs without reamping, and also because the signal-to-noise ratio and noise floor is actually superior to a real mic'ed up cab, especially if you are in a home studio and don't have excellent isolation.

Some speaker simulators, such as the **Mesa/Boogie Cabclone,** not only have integrated loadboxes, but also have integrated headphone preamps. This is the answer to your original question of "Are there any attenuators that are worth a hoot that would allow me to turn my amp up but still plug headphones into them?" - They are about $300.

If you want to spend more, the **Torpedo Live Digital Loadbox** for $1000 is a *much* better-sounding, more professional version of the same thing, with a lot more nuanced control over your tone and more features. It's really designed for recording, but it also has a headphone preamp and headphone output right on the front panel for easy access and can certainly be used for home practice.

**To be frank with you though,** personally, if I were in your shoes, I would not do it this way at *all.* I would get a **Line 6 POD HD** unit, either the desktop model or the floor unit (if you are going to use it as an effects controller as well). You can get these used for around $300 and they will not only sound as good or better than a loadbox with a speaker simulator hooked up to your Hot Rod, but they are also portable, come with built-in effects, can simulate not only mic'ed cabs but dozens of amps (including the Fender Bassman, blackface Deluxe Reverb, and Twin, plus a bunch of others), AND you can use it as a recording interface for your computer if you decide at some point you want to get into home recording. It's just a much better value, and an overall better solution to your problem, than attempting to use an amp for silent home practice that is really designed for gigging musicians playing medium-sized clubs. And they have a headphone output, too.

Here's a video explaining the **Pod HD desktop unit, which is my #1 recommendation** for you:
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=SParhxpu960

If you want **easy access to the built-in effects and switching,** you can either get the optional foot controller for the desktop unit, or you can just get the whole thing built into a foot controller format. Line 6 offers the latter as their **HD500X** unit:
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=qQEkxFDnpDk

If you insist on using your **Hot Rod and want a loadbox with a speaker simulator and headphone output**, this is my recommendation:
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=m7tLzuW36Cc

If you want better tone and more control than the Mesa offers, this is a better version of the same thing:
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Vmz5uBzsHMY

Hope this helps!/u/JimiCage is just having fun. I don't take it personally. But the point about the compressor pedal is True and I thought it was worth mentioning, since he actually did ask about pedals!/u/BattleChubbs, I have owned a lot of guitars, including a couple of other Gibsons besides the three I have now. The DC Standard (mine is blue with a AAA flametop and gold hardware) was among the better ones they've made. It addressed the problem of Les Pauls being too heavy by chambering the body, and added 2 more frets and a killer maple cap, to compete with the PRS Custom 24, which was taking a lot of Gibson market share in the late '90s. It has nice inlays, but not as interesting as the PRS birds, and it has neck binding, which I think is a nice touch.

Tonally, it's a fat, high-output Les Paul, which is ideal for everything from electric jazz to high-octane rock, and was my main guitar for several years.

Mine actually suffered a headstock break in 2001, a common problem with all Gibsons because of the ridiculous headstock angle combined with a one-piece mahogany neck, and I've had it repaired three times. I play heavy strings (12s or 13s usually; I had 14s on it when it broke the first time), which a Strat can handle just fine, but not a Gibson (which is weird, because Gibson has a history as a jazz and acoustic guitar company). It has 10s on it now, and nowadays I also keep it tuned to Eb to ease up on the headstock. I don't really play it anymore on account of the light strings.

Gibson tried to address the weak headstock during the Norlin era with volutes, which I wish they kept into modern times, or at least changed the headstock angle, but oh well.

My LP is currently in the shop and being converted to a headless guitar, so we'll see how that turns out! I hope to use it more when that's done.Happy to help. If you have any more questions please let me know. And thanks for the gold :)At the Beacon Theater? I was at that show, too. I met Blake and Fiona's mom afterwards also.Line 6 blows away just about any other amp.

Lower noise floor, better signal-to-noise ratio, very efficient in the studio, unbelievable versatility (4 amps out of the box, many more on tap if you hook up a POD)... and combinations that do not exist in real life (Class A Fender Twin, anyone?).

I have several really great tube amps

http://i.imgur.com/GftvU3r.jpg

and my favorite, by far, is my Line 6 DT25.The EHX Soul Food, on the other hand, is DEFINITELY worth the $60 it costs to buy a used one on Reverb.com.That's funny, I'm the opposite. I hate the sound of single coils on their own and pretty much exclusively use the 4th position (neck + mid) on my Strats.Yep. If it weren't for Let's Dance, it's unlikely that John Mayer, Susan Tedeschi, Joe Bonamassa, Jonny Lang, Kenny Wayne Shepherd, etc would be famous today.If you ask here, you are going to get answers like "Take lessons," "Watch this video," "Learn theory," "Listen to this [famous recording of long-dead jazz player."

A lot of people *appreciate* jazz, but if you want to *play* jazz, this is not great advice.

I'm a jazz player. If you want to learn to play it, you need to go hang out with jazz players.

Go to some jazz clubs. Watch them play. Get to know them. Find some jazz jam sessions. Sit in. Jazz is an interactive style of music. You get good at it by playing with other jazz musicians. You can practice at home, too, and lessons will speed up the process, but if you spend a couple of years hanging out at a jazz club and sitting in as often as possible, you will learn much faster and better than you will just by listening to a recording or studying a theory book alone.Did you get the HD500X? They make a few versions. That one is the best value, I think. I had one and loved it. I recently sold mine to get one of the new Helix models, but those are really aiming for a different market segment and not directly comparable (the price point of the Helix is $1500-2000 rather than the $400-500 for the HD series). To my knowledge, Line 6 has no plans to discontinue the HD series even though the Helix is now available.

I hope you like it! And good on you for making time for guitar with a baby on the way. A lot of new parents give up guitar, but I think that's a mistake. Not only does it enrich your life to have a hobby (assuming you're not a professional), but it will be something you can share with your kid in a few years.What do you like better (for a transparent drive)?Just don't knock it over or drop it and you'll be fine!

If you post some pics of your ax I'll tell you what the differences are.Good to hear. I think you'll like it. Like I said I loved mine. The only reason I sold it was to fund their more advanced version.What do you mean, you use your volume knob for transparent drive? If you back off on your guitar volume, wouldn't that clean up your sound (and knock off some highs)? Or if you meant your amp, holy crap, 7 is a loud for most amps.

I have a JHS Sweet Tea which has a TS808 circuit in it (it's a dual pedal). I do like 808s for that sort of sound, but it's a *very* different sound from a Klon/clone.

The Soul Food isn't supposed to be a straight boost pedal (EHX makes the LPB-1 boost pedal for that). It is a drive pedal, but it's designed to be a more uncolored one, reverse engineered after the Klon. If you don't like that kind of tone, you don't like it, but an 808 is definitely not a direct substitute (nor is it supposed to be one) for a boost pedal, a Klon, or any of the various clones out there.Well Fender and Gibson both makes many types of guitars. It's not just the Strat and the Les Paul.

The other main types of guitars out there are heavy metal guitars, semi-hollow guitars, archtops, flattop acoustics, and the more modern/ergonomic designs like Parker, Klein, Strandberg, Steinberger, etc.

Aside from Les Pauls, Gibson makes archtops, semi-hollow guitars, flattop acoustics, and heavy-metal guitars like the Explorer, the Flying Vee, the Zakk Wlyde Les Paul, etc.

Aside from Teles and Strats, Fender also used to make HM Strats (for "Heavy Metal") that came with rear routing, Floyd Rose bridges, humbuckers, etc.

Super Strats/Frankenstrats set the stage for ESP/Jackson/Ibanez/Charvel/Carvin metal guitars that came later. 

I think really the only truly original guitars of the last 50 years are the ones where guitar makers tried to reimagine the guitar from scratch.

Ken Parker, Ned Steinberger/Steve Klein, Ola Strandberg, et al are "original idea" guitar makers. They are really the only guitars that AREN'T "Fender/Gibson" designs or variations of them.

My favorite truly original guitar design is the Parker Fly Artist. I have one and it's fantastic. It's under 5 pounds, it has a sitka spruce body, it has a piezo bridge, it has direct mounted pickups, it has a carbon fiber "skin" that makes it EXTREMELY strong and tough, it has locking tuners, it has the best trem system I've ever used, it's just all around amazing. It's superior in design and construction to a Fender or Gibson in every single way. The only reason I think Parkers aren't more popular is that they are $5,000 and they are kind of ugly, although they make ones nowadays that have a reshaped upper horn that's not so bad looking, and they also make import models that are cheaper (although they don't have the awesome carbon fiber skin that is their defining feature).

My Parker Fly Artist:

Front:
http://i.imgur.com/DyHIEzO.jpg

Back:
http://i.imgur.com/c8PoqBk.jpgMost Suhrs are just really well-executed Fenders. They make a couple of models that are a departure from Strats &amp; Teles, but they're not terribly different. They are certainly not "an original idea" in the sense of a Strandberg or a Parker, if you ask me.Yours is very similar to mine. I can't post pics at the moment because as I said, mine is in the shop, but here are the differences I noticed:

- Mine has Grover Rotomatic tuners instead of Klusons
- The truss rod cover screws on mine are gold instead of silver
- The metal ring around the 3-position switch on mine is gold instead of silver
- The pickup ring mounting screws on mine are gold instead of silver

Otherwise they look they same. Nice guitar!I talked to a Gibson employee once about this and here's what she said (paraphrasing):

Gibson has a long history of iconic guitars, mostly the Les Paul but also the J-45, the ES-335, etc.

People associate these guitars with their favorite guitar gods, for obvious reasons.

Consider the Min-ETune^TM from Gibson. That was a disaster. Gibson tried to do something new and different and it ruined an entire year of guitar sales for them. If they were a smaller company, it might have bankrupted them. Oops.

Gibson is constantly toeing the line between making this year's model Les Paul different *enough* from last year's model to make it interesting, but at the same time making it *just similar enough* to a guitar designed in 1958 that people won't complain about fixin' what ain't broke.

It's difficult to mass produce an untested idea and break even financially. It's the same reason that Hollywood movie studios love making sequels and making movies out of already-successful novels, instead of spending a bunch of money on producing and marketing brand-new characters.

Guitar companies have a lot of competition and there are plenty of small brands and 1-man shops that will build you something wacky if that's what you want. But if you are mass producing guitars, you need to focus on something time-tested and buyer approved. That means classic, iconic designs\u2014or *very* subtle variations of those.

Leo Fender was smart about this. He got a lot of player feedback about the Telecaster: The body edges were uncomfortable, the tone was too bright, the thing was ugly (competitors called it "The Plank Guitar"). 

But the Telecaster had a loyal following and was exploding in popularity, so instead of changing it and risk destroying his company, he introduced a new model: the Stratocaster. This one had sexy curves, more finish options, more pickups, and several other changes. And we all know what happened from there: The Strat became popular for rock and the Tele became popular for country, although that's not a hard and fast rule.

Part of Gibson's problem is that they never really had a huge hit with solidbody electric guitars besides the Les Paul. They tried a total redesign in the '60s (called the SG) but it replaced their best-selling, traditional Les Paul, and a lot of people didn't like it. Later they brought back the classic Les Paul design and a lot of people were happy. But the SG had its fans, too, and later still, they brought back the SG alongside the Les Paul.

If you want something different, there actually are *lots* of options out there. Many guitars these days have piezo pickups in the bridge, or even on-board modeling (the Line 6 Variax guitars for example).

You can always add a Roland GK pickup if you want to explore MIDI sounds - the sky is the limit with MIDI! Some guitars such as Godin, Carvin, and even some Fender models have synth access built in.

And, don't forget modding - you don't need to pay big bucks for a custom-made one-off guitar. Get a Warmoth Strat body with a swimming pool route and put 8 pickups in it. See what happens. Maybe it will rock. Maybe it will be a mess. One way to find out!I am not impressed with the Spider amps. They are budget amps. They are a good value in terms of versatility, but they're definitely not intended to sound great. They are intended to be a good value. 

In my opinion the Spider series of amps is pretty much the best explanation of why Line 6 has a reputation among gigging musicians as making amps with bad tone. Line 6 doesn't have this reputation among studio musicians (who use different Line 6 products and are familiar with the capabilities of their high-end gear).

It isn't fair, I think, that Line 6 has a bad reputation when it comes to their low-priced gear, either, but *not* because of the tone. As I said, their low-end gear is a good *value.* It's versatile. But yeah, if you compare a $300 Spider IV to a $1500 Fender Twin, it's not going to sound nearly as good (and no wonder). And that's what people do, because the Spider models a Twin, and they conclude that Line 6 gear sucks.

It doesn't. A $1500 Line 6 rig sounds GREAT compared to a Twin. And compared to a Marshall Plexi. And compared to a Mesa Boogie Dual Rectifier, or a Vox AC30, etc.

If you compare a $300 Line 6 amp to a $300 Crate, then the Line 6 definitely holds its own tonally, and is additionally much more versatile than the Crate. That is a fair comparison and no surprise.

If someone thinks Line 6 gear sucks, it's probably because they've never tried their high-end stuff, or they are comparing a Line 6 practice amp to another brand's flagship amp. 

My 2 (or 3) cents.The big deal about Teles is that they're *very* unforgiving. They can be twangy but they don't have to sound twangy unless you want them to. Teles are *not* just for country players, even remotely. They are also popular for jazz guitarists (Mike Stern, Bill Frisell), classic rock (Keith Richards, George Harrison, Mike Campbell, Andy Summers) and heavy rock &amp; metal players (David Gilmour, Jimmy Page, John 5, and many others).

By unforgiving, I mean that they don't hide much. You have to be very good with your technique, or it's very obvious. They are simple to operate, tough, have an iconic look, and have fixed bridges that stay in tune really well without being as heavy as Les Pauls. If you want a fancy guitar, a Les Paul with binding, mother-of-pearl inlays, gold hardware, and a flamed carved maple top is what you want. But if you want a workhorse, a Tele is impossible to beat for almost any genre.The difference is not just the tone (a bit of EQ can change that much more anyway).

They feel very different. Maple has a tighter grain and usually has a sealer or finish on it. Some people like the feel of that, but I hate it.

Rosewood has a more open grain and is usually unfinished. Even though the strings don't usually touch the fretboard (depending on the fretsize, the strings, and your technique), your fingers DO touch the fretboard, and the feel is very different.I suppose it depends on your amp. My amp (Fargen Blackbird 30 watts 6L6) is a single channel clean amp with no gain knob. Even cranked, it doesn't really get any grit, so a transparent, tube-type drive pedal is really necessary if you want, say, SRV's clean sound.&gt; Regular amps are a pain in the ass and modelling units, be they hardware or software, are where it's at. I will never own another amp.

I read this one and then upvoted your post. But I continued reading anyway :) 
&gt; Learning other people's music has its place, but writing your own is a more effective way to develop not only as a guitarist but as a musician.

It totally depends on what kind of music you want to play and what your goal is. Most classical musicians have zero interest in writing their own music. Composition and performance are two different career paths and two different degree paths at music schools for a reason. There are some AMAZING musicians who will never write any original music in their whole career. There are some AMAZING composers who will never play at a concert level. It's okay. To each his own.

&gt; There isn't much functional point in owning more than a handful of guitars.

It depends on why you have them. Some people collect them and invest in them. Some people enjoy working on them. There isn't functionally any point in having multiple pairs of shoes either\u2014you can only wear one at a time\u2014but most people have at least a couple. Some people have dozens or more. Variety is the spice of life.

&gt; Tremolos are all terrible.

Try a Parker Fly. They are $5,000 for a reason.

&gt; Spring reverb sounds terrible.

Try one of the Fender '63 reissue outboard tanks. They are fuuuuun, especially if you mess around with some surf licks.

&gt; Most distortion pedals sound terrible, and the ones that don't generally only sound good when they aren't actually adding distortion.

Most *cheap* distortion pedals sound awful. I've got ten dirt pedals right now ranging in price from about $50 to over $300. You get what you pay for. 

&gt; What makes a guitar sound truly great is its inherent resonance. Getting a particularly resonant guitar is a total crapshoot and has rather little to do with how much money you spend on it. Oh, tremolos destroy resonance.

Not necessarily. Try a Parker. A fixed bridge is always going to have more stability and resonance than a floating one, but it's certainly not impossible to build a consistently resonant guitar with great tuning stability AND a tremolo. By using a carbon fiber exoskeleton like Parker does, you can ensure a huge amount of resonance in every single instrument that leaves the production line. Rainsong acoustic guitars and Luis &amp; Clark cellos are the same way.
Aw man, what did he say? :PThere are only a couple of things I don't like about it. One is that I like True Temperament necks, but because Parker uses tangless stainless steel frets that are glued onto a carbon fiber fretboard, instead of frets with tangs that are pounded into cut slots on a wood fretboard, it's impossible to remove the fretboard and replace the frets with True Temperament frets. It's something that almost every guitarist wouldn't care about, but in my personal case, I wish I could change that.

The other thing is that the upper horn kinda digs into your chest when you play sitting down. The new [MaxxFly](http://www.parkerguitars.com/products/maxxfly/DF842.html) model introduced a few years ago has a different upper horn shape and doesn't have this problem, but the MaxxFly doesn't have some of the same specs as the Fly Artist I have, which I like very much (e.g. sitka spruce body, natural finish, etc).

Other than that, I *love* mine. It's simply the best-designed electric guitar I've ever played and has quickly become my #1 for practicing, teaching, and performing. And this is coming from someone who has LOTS of other nice guitars, including [multiple totally custom made guitars](http://i.imgur.com/GftvU3r.jpg) and quite a few [high-end and/or Custom Shop models from various other makers](http://i.imgur.com/OhDUrOE.jpg). My Parker is really the only one I play anymore day-to-day outside the studio.

If I could put True Temperament frets on it, it would be my #1 for recording as well, but in the meantime I'll continue to use my [Variax with a TT neck](http://i.imgur.com/aMnQE6E.jpg) for that.**TL;DR:**

**- Combos are called combos because they combine a head and a cab in a single box.**

**- Playing an acoustic guitar live is a pain in the ass and doing it correctly requires expensive extra equipment. If you're on a budget, you can use an acoustic simulator pedal instead.**

**- In order to recommend the right amp(s) for you, we need to know what kind of music you play and what size audiences you're expecting.**

__________
As /u/aaron0043 said, here's the basic difference:

A ***head*** is the part of your rig that **amplifies your signal** and **shapes your tone.** This is where all the fanciness is. A traditional amp head [looks like this](http://www.sweetwater.com/store/detail/JTM45HW) although they can also [look like this](http://www.sweetwater.com/store/detail/ProfilePwrHD?adpos=1o1&amp;creative=55281441601&amp;device=c&amp;matchtype=&amp;network=g&amp;gclid=CjwKEAiAvPGxBRCH3YCgpdbCtmYSJABqHRVwt4gMQBo9LdGNe6uH84BZpejZrkQGh9r06wtDoocXQBoCzSLw_wcB) or [this](http://www.sweetwater.com/store/detail/MicroTerror).

A head is made up of several important pieces (all in the same housing). Heads include a **preamp,** often with smaller tubes like 12AX7s. Heads have **EQ and effects sections** (knobs that adjust things like bass, mid, treble, presence, reverb, etc), as well as volume and gain (overdrive/distortion) controls and channel switching, if the amp is a multi-channel amp. Heads also have a **power section** that ramps up the signal so it can power a speaker cabinet, usually with bigger tubes like EL34s or 6L6s. 

- a *speaker cabinet* is basically just a well-built wooden box that holds speaker(s). The cab gets the signal (and power) from the head, which plugs into it and [sits on top of it like this](http://www.sweetwater.com/store/detail/JVM410-1960ABun). You can also run one head to [multiple cabs like this](http://www.musiciansfriend.com/amplifiers-effects/marshall-jvm410h-1960av-and-1960bv-tube-guitar-full-stack).

**Speakers actually play a MAJOR role** in your overall tone. Different types of speakers, differently sized speakers, and different construction methods (especially open-back or closed-back) for cabs makes a HUGE difference in how the amp sounds overall.

- A ***combo amp*** is called a combo because it combines the head and the cab into a single enclosure that [looks like this](http://www.sweetwater.com/store/detail/65TwinRev).

Many amp heads and combos also have [available footswitches](http://www.sweetwater.com/store/detail/PEDL00021) to control things while your hands are busy performing, such as channel switching, turning on and off effects such as reverb, and turning on and off the effects loop. These footswitches are *not* the same as so-called outboard effects or effects pedals - the switches control things going on inside the amp, which is why you can get a 5-function footswitch for $130 - it's just a controller.

Having access to a footswitchable effects loop lets you put other effects (such as delay, compression, chorus, etc) into your signal in between the preamp stage and power amp stage. Other effects work best when placed between your guitar and the front input of the amp (overdrives and distortions, wahs, compressors, etc, and also tuners).

---
So, as far as your application: Virtually any tube amp that's over about 30 watts or so can keep up with a drummer, depending on what kind of speakers you have and how much clean headroom you need. Something to understand is that **a higher rated amp (more watts) does not mean the same thing as more volume**. More watts means more *headroom,* or the ability to stay clean at high volume. But **volume is really dependent on a combination of factors** and mostly depends on what kind and how many speakers/speaker cabs you're using. A 40-watt combo with a 1x12 speaker is going to sound a lot quieter than a 20-watt head with a 2x12 or 4x12 cab.

If you are performing somewhere with a PA system, **you can put an inexpensive mic on any speaker cab** (or use a speaker-simulated line output, if your amp has one) and make **any amp loud enough for a club**. A Shure SM57 mic for well under $100 used is a common choice. Generally in club settings, your amp mostly serves as your stage monitor (so you can hear yourself) and the source of your tone for the soundman to then scale up for the audience through the PA system, although depending on the venue, your amp can also serve as the monitor for your entire band, or if you're playing without sound reinforcement (without mic'ing your amp), it can be the sole source of your guitar sound for you, your band, and the audience as well. I generally don't recommend this unless you have no other choice, because it's hard to get a good **mix** when one source is serving double-duty as a monitor (for you and your band to hear you) and main (for the audience to hear you). 

I **do not recommend running an acoustic guitar through an electric guitar amp.** They are not designed for this and it won't sound very good, although you can do it in a pinch. Frankly, if you just need an acoustic guitar *tone,* and you are on a budget, and you don't want to mess around with a lot of switching up equipment on stage, **your best bet is actually an acoustic simulator pedal.** [This one is very popular](http://www.sweetwater.com/store/detail/AC3) and easy on the wallet as well. This will make your electric guitar sound about the same as an acoustic guitar with a piezo pickup plugged into an electric guitar amp.

Playing an acoustic guitar live can be a pain in the ass. Acoustic guitars get feedback easily when played at high volume, and switching guitars requires either [a switcher \(a pedal that switches which signal you're using\)](http://www.sweetwater.com/store/detail/ABY) or bumbling around with plugging and unplugging guitars while you mute everything with your tuner. *AND* it sounds like crap live if you run your acoustic through your amp.

If you like the look of playing a real acoustic guitar live (audiences like it, too), ideally, you would run your acoustic through either a [separate amp that's designed for acoustic guitar](http://www.sweetwater.com/store/detail/LoudboxArt), or through the PA system directly with a [preamp/DI box](http://www.sweetwater.com/store/detail/ParaDI/), so that your soundman can control the tone to the audience more easily, and so that the soundman or monitor engineer can control feedback through the monitors instead of having a loud amp onstage. Many acoustic players also use a feedback suppressor to prevent feedback.

As far as **recommending a specific amp and effects unit,** we need more info from you. 

- What style(s) of music do you play? 

- What kind of electric guitar do you have?

- What size audiences are you expecting?

- Do you have a bad back or any preference for something extremely lightweight?

- Do you live anywhere, or will be gigging anywhere, where extreme weather is a concern?

- Are you extremely tough on your gear and need something very solid and unbreakable, or is something a bit more fragile acceptable?

- How often do you use effects? Are you looking for something to take the place of a whole mess of complicated pedals and out-there sounds, or are you more of a straight-ahead player who just needs a few options?I'm not as big a fan of the Deluxe model, although it's a fine guitar. It doesn't come in any colors I like and it weighs a good 25% more than mine (4.5 pounds versus almost 6 pounds). I have a bad back and even 1 pound makes a huge difference for me, which is why I went shopping for a Parker in the first place. The fact that they are incredibly fast, versatile, and sound great is icing on the cake, really.I'll pass along some advice I got from Danny Morris, one of my professors at Berklee College of Music:

Always play with the best players you've ever played with. If you're not playing with the best players you've ever played with, move on.I don't doubt it. Modeling technology has improved a lot over the years, just like every other digital tech. I mean, look at iPhones from just 5 years ago versus iPhones today. For most of 2010, until the iPhone 4 came out in September of that year, no iPhone even had a front-facing camera. It didn't even have 4G!Okay, cool. There are *lots* of options that will work for you. It really just boils down to personal preference, then.

I suggest a multi-channel amp with built-in reverb that's at least 30 watts.

My first suggestion would be a Fender Hot Rod Deluxe. It a 40-watt 1x12, which is *definitely* enough for rehearsal and enough for most small-to-medium bars and clubs without sound reinforcement, although you'll get a better mix with a soundman and a PA. It's one of the most popular gigging amps in the world for good reason. It's not terribly expensive, easy to mod, has built-in reverb, 3 channels (clean, drive, and more drive), an effects loop, and a bright switch. It even has two inputs if you really wanted to run your acoustic and your electric through it at once, although I don't recommend doing it this way unless you don't have a soundman/PA *and* you don't want to spend money on an separate acoustic guitar amp *and* you want the look on stage of a real acoustic guitar, and a simulator pedal just won't do.

Since it's a tube amp, it will be a bit more sensitive to cold weather, a bit heavier, and a bit more fragile than some other choices, but if you're not rough on your gear, it shouldn't be a problem. If you are performing regularly, I do recommend getting a cheaper solid-state backup amp in case you have a problem, because tube amps do fail sometimes, especially if you accidentally drop them or are playing them at extremely high volumes (as you would without a PA). 

Another great choice is a Line 6 DT25 or DT50. These are hybrid amps with a digital preamp section and a tube power section. They are two channel amps but they have 4 different voicings built in, meaning you can get a huge variety of tones. They also have built-in reverb and switchable topology and class operation. Additionally, they have a cab-simulated direct out, which soundmen and studio recording engineers *love* for their low noise floor and excellent signal-to-noise ratio - no microphones, no need for isolation!

They can do blues-clean Fender blackface tones all the way up to searing Mesa/Boogie Dual Rectifier sounds like Metallica uses. The DT25 is $1000 USD new but you can find one used for quite a bit cheaper than that. If you want more headroom, they also make a 50-watt model, and a 1x12 extension cab. If you play a variety of music and need a variety of very different tones, from Bryan Adams to Metallica, there really is no substitute for a digital amp, versus a normal tube amp. I have [several very nice amps](http://i.imgur.com/GftvU3r.jpg), some of which cost multiple thousands of dollars, but my favorite for versatility is actually my Line 6 DT25. 

For the style of music you play and the bands you listed, you really don't need much in the way of effects. Both of these amps have reverb and overdrive/distortion built in, and other than that, really all you need is a tuner and maybe a wah for fun. You can get a Boss TU-3 chromatic tuner or a TC Electronic Polytune for about $100 USD new or even cheaper used. You can get a standard Dunlop Crybaby wah for less than $100. Other than that you'll just need a couple of cables and you're all set.

If you do want to experiment with more effects, something to keep in mind is that you get what you pay for. Good effects are *expensive* and if you start piling them on, you'll not only need the pedals themselves, but power supplies, patch cables, a pedalboard, and probably a switcher/router. Even just a simple setup with 5 different effects (tuner, compressor, wah, delay, chorus) can run you over $1k once you add it all up. 

As you mentioned, a multi-FX unit is an alternative, but DO NOT SKIMP. I would not spend less than about $400 on this. A Line 6 POD HD500X is pretty much the industry standard and for good reason. It has a built-in tuner, wah, and volume pedal that can be used as a mute, plus dozens of other effects like delay, chorus, flanger, phaser, compression, fuzz, etc etc etc. AND it has a universal tap tempo, which is just fantastic for playing live, and a looper, which is fantastic for practicing. You can also use it for silent practice with headphones, and for silent computer-based recording. It's great for gigging musicians if you need to program patches for different songs, especially if you use a variety of different tones in a cover band, to sound like different artists. 

There are other options out there, but really, I have tried them all, and for that price range, the Line 6 unit is *by far* the best one. They really have earned their reputation as the world leader in effects and amp modeling. 

I hope this helps!They are custom made by this guy Michael Rowan in Garland, Texas USA.

My natural-finish one (pictured on the right above) is called a Texas Twister. It has a bolt-on neck, a 5-position blade with splittable humbuckers, a very lightweight chambered cedar body, a maple neck with rosewood fretboard, a fixed bridge, Gotoh auto-locking tuners, and a pretty maple cap. It's in the shop right now getting a fret dressing, so I can't post additional pictures of it, but it's one of my favorite guitars.

My other one is called a Journeyman, see additional pics below. It's actually the first drop-top Journeyman that Michael ever built. It has a chambered mahogany body with a set mahogany neck, a rosewood fretboard, a Gotoh high-mass floating bridge, a 3-position Les Paul-style switch, a push-poll volume pot to tap the bridge humbucker, and a "Santana Yellow" yellow/red burst finish.

They are some of the best-sounding, best-playing, lightest weight guitars I've ever played, built as good or better than any PRS. Michael retired from guitar building last year, which is a DAMN SHAME. If you ever come across one of his guitars for sale used, *please* message me. They are almost impossible to find now and I really want another one.

More pics of my Journeyman:

http://i.imgur.com/sNx3GNC.jpg

http://i.imgur.com/xknvrHU.jpg

http://i.imgur.com/umookMS.jpg

http://i.imgur.com/ltiaQD9.jpg

http://i.imgur.com/nZVKxh8.jpgYep! I have [several nice guitars](http://i.imgur.com/OhDUrOE.jpg) and when people see a '64 Gibson or a CS Fender or a Parker Fly etc, they assume I'm using a crazy-expensive amp along with it. Nope. The Line 6 DT25 is an *amazing* amp AND I could buy 4 of them for the price of my Fargen. I wish more people would give them a chance; they are one of the best pieces of kit on the market today.I play on a Parker Fly Artist:

http://i.imgur.com/ofpiTv2.jpg

It has a carbon glass composite "skin" covering the entire back of the (set neck) guitar:

http://i.imgur.com/c8PoqBk.jpg

and also the fretboard is made of the stuff. In the past, I have also owned a Modulus Quantum 5 bass with the (bolt-on) neck made entirely of carbon fiber:

http://i.imgur.com/q9GvE6P.jpg
_____
The thing to know about carbon fiber is that it's VERY STIFF. As a result, it has better transient response than wood (it sounds brighter). It's very stable, meaning that it helps instruments stay in tune better. It's also very consistent, since it's a manmade material, meaning that it has no knots or irregularities in the grain like wood does. As a result, it resonates AMAZINGLY well compared to wood. It feels very solid and when you strum on a guitar with it, the whole thing just vibrates like crazy. 

There ARE tonal differences, but it's nothing you can't simulate with a bit of EQ. It's a little brighter and more focused, kinda like adding a maple cap to a mahogany guitar. But the real difference is that it sustains better. The best way to describe the effect that carbon fiber has on a stringed instrument, in my experience, is that it makes your guitar sound like "one giant string." Every note up and down the neck on every string sounds very consistent. Notes ring out more clearly and solidly, meaning that you don't need to use as much compression (or as much distortion) as you might with other guitars.

I tend to like super heavy strings (I usually play 12s, sometimes 13s or 14s), but on my Parker, I find that 10s work great. Despite having a lot less mass, the 10-gauge strings on my Parker sustain just as well as the 12s on my Strat. I think part of this is also the set-neck design versus the bolt-on design, but there's no way to know.

As far as feel, yes, the feel is very different. Carbon fiber is exceptionally smooth and slick, even more than finished maple. It's very easy to play extremely cleanly on a Parker or a Modulus. If you play complex music like speed metal or jazz, a carbon fiber guitar is a good choice. If you play acoustic guitar and do a lot of body percussion or complex things like harmonics or big open chords up and down the neck, a carbon fiber guitar such as a Rainsong is a good choice. It's also lightweight and *LOUD* compared to wood.

I don't know how much of a difference a carbon fiber fingerboard on its own would make. My guess is that it's mostly for stiffness so that you don't need to do as much in the way of season adjustment to the truss rod, and so that you can play with heavier strings without stress on the neck. If you want a very clear, clean, open sound that's bright and focused, and want a very slick fretboard that makes it easy to play fast, and a bit better sustain, and you want a stiff feel that can take abuse with humidity changes and so on, a carbon fiber fretboard will help with these things.Makes perfect sense I think. I think that a lot of people got a bad taste for Line 6 because their cheaper Spider series of practice amps, years ago when they came out, did not sound that great\u2014AND, it was the first time many players ever got a chance to try any Line 6 gear, since the lower price point meant they were widely stocked in stores everywhere. Even their low-end stuff has gotten much better in the past couple of years, just like all digital technology, but their upper-end stuff has always been fantastic and is just getting better. I think most people just don't bother to try them because they had a bad experience with a $200 practice amp and/or were thinking of 8-year-old technology, like you were saying.I'm a fan of DBZ guitars. It's the same guy who started Dean guitars, just a spin-off company. They are high quality, have good parts and good pickups, good fretwork, and are VERY underpriced in my opinion.  Here's one for $650:

http://www.worldmusicsupply.com/dbz-hfrstp14-twa-hailfire-plus-electric-guitar-carved-top-trans-walnut**Every Guitar Center employee, past or present, is unfortunately all too familiar with these:**

For trying out a 12-string guitar: "Free Fallin'" by Tom Petty

For trying out a pointy guitar: "Enter Sandman" by Metallica

For trying out a Les Paul, even though that's actually the wrong guitar for this part: The intro to "Stairway to Heaven" by Led Zeppelin

For trying out a Fender Mustang: "Come As You Are" or "Smells Like Teen Spirit" by Nirvana

For trying out a Strat: "Pride and Joy" by Stevie Ray Vaughan

For trying out a wah pedal: "Voodoo Chile" by Jimi Hendrix

For trying out a delay pedal on dotted 1/8th mode: "Pride (In The Name of Love)" by U2

For trying out a 335: "Johnny B. Goode" by Chuck Berry

For trying out a '63 Reissue reverb tank: "Miserlou" by Dick Dale

For trying out any guitar with a Bigsby: "Summertime Blues" by Eddie Cochrane

For trying out any guitar with a Floyd: "Eruption" by Van HalenThey make a korina version too that's SUPER lightweight. I don't usually go for off-the-wall guitars but man do I want one.Please find out what kind of guitar this is. Very few companies use carbon for the entire guitar and I'm curious. It's more common on bass guitars, but very rare regardless.Take lessons!

Practice at minimum 30 min day, 1-2 hours is better and 3 hours is better still.

Check out Steve Vai's workout regimen:
http://www.picksnlicks.com/Guitar%20Lessons/Exercises/30_hr_workout/30_hr_workout_1.html

Learn your favorite songs by going to YouTube and searching for "how to play [song name]".

Get the textbook "Tonal Harmony" by Payne and Kostka and Jay Weik's "Daily Sight-Reading Studies for the Guitarist."

I also recommend The Christopher Parkening Guitar Method, although that is for learning classical guitar.

Check out the website musictheory.net.

But most importantly, go to open mics and especially to jam sessions and PLAY YOUR BUTT OFF. Play with as many people who are better than you as you can find. There is no substitute for jamming with someone better than you.***Picks***

I use Dunlop Tortex Sharp 1.5mm picks (the white ones).

http://www.jimdunlop.com/product/tortex-sharp

They have a good texture that's grippy without being annoying and you can hang onto them even if you're sweaty. They have a lot of mass and a good sound. The sharp tip helps me play more precisely. They feel good in my hand. The bright white color makes them easy to spot on a dark stage if needed.

___________
***Strings***

I use Elixir Nanowebs:

http://www.elixirstrings.com/guitar-strings/electric-nanoweb-guitar-strings.html

They last a very long time and are a good value. They have less string noise than other strings. They have good clarity but still sound warm and full. They are available at every music store even if I'm on the road. I use different gauges depending on the scale length of my guitar and what kind of sound I'm going for. I usually use 10s, 11s, or 12s for electric and 12s or 13s for acoustic.

Edit: For what it's worth, most of the greatest guitarists use heavier strings like 10s or 11s, and virtually every good guitarist uses very stiff, very thick picks. A lot of the best guitarists use like 3mm picks or other very stiff picks. They give you more precision and it's easier to get nuance and dynamic control. I don't know ANY really great guitarists who use thin picks.

Heavier strings with more mass will have better signal-to-noise ratio, stay in tune better, and break less, also.Ohh, I thought you meant an electric guitar. I'm very familiar with Rainsong. I'm unaware of any electrics that are solid carbon fiber but I'd be interested to try one."We threw the racket up to get the birdie."Mine is also a '97. Oh yeah, I forgot to mention cleaning the fingerboard. You don't need any chemicals, just wipe it with a damp towel and you're good as new.Happy to help. If you have any more questions, just post. Especially if you are interested in a POD HD500x, I *highly* recommend checking out a Line 6 DT25 or DT50 amp as well. They are designed to connect to each other digitally and you can do a lot of things using them together that neither can do on their own. But if you want a popular, well-built, gig-ready tube amp, a Hot Rod is also a great choice.

P.S. I've got a couple of Roland amps and they are lots of fun. If you are playing with a PA system, frankly you don't need another amp depending on which model Roland you have. Most of their amps sound very good, have a direct output, and have multiple channels and built-in effects. I personally wouldn't gig with one as my main amp, but they make a great solid-state backup amp if your main amp is a tube amp. Never gig with just one amp if your main amp is a tube amp! It's Murphy's Law waiting to happen :)I didn't know they made an 8-string. Very cool. I got to play a Strandberg for the first time a few weeks ago. I have a bad back and can only play lightweight guitars, and I'm currently playing a Parker, but a Paul Masvidal Boden OS 6 would be my second choice:

https://strandbergguitars.com/product/plini-boden-os-6-guitar-limited-edition/

P.S. Did you know that Ola Strandberg's name is pronounced Oo-lah Stran-berry?I'm a big fan of 5-position blade switches. With a S+H setup like your guitar has, you could use this for bridge humbucker, bridge split, full bridge humbucker + neck single, neck pickup + split humbucker, and neck pickup solo. 

With blade selectors you can quickly switch from position 1 to 5 or vice versa (or anywhere else), and see what position you're in on a dark stage or even by feel.

Depending on where you put the switch, it's unlikely you'll hit it while you're playing. Unless you're doing windmills or jumping around playing ska you'll be fine.

Coated bass strings are a thing, too.

Or try flatwounds. They last *decades.*Yes, getting your gear set up correctly makes a difference, haha.

Check out the book "How To Make Your Electric Guitar Play Great" by Dan Erlewine for lots of tips like that, and step-by-step instructions.

http://www.amazon.com/Make-Your-Electric-Guitar-Great/dp/0879309989Haha, this is awesome.They are toys. They're fun, but they're not a substitute for a practice amp.

There are plenty of decent, actual practice amps you can use with headphones or at low volume.

I've tried a LOT of mini amps and the only one I've come across that's actually a mini amp (rather than a toy) is the Blackstar Fly 3:

http://www.sweetwater.com/store/detail/Fly3

Really though, for not much more money ($150), you can get a Roland Micro Cube, which is a real amp, just teeny tiny. They won Best in Show at the 2013 NAMM show:

http://www.sweetwater.com/store/detail/MicroCubeGX

They are even cheaper used. **Yamaha** makes some *killer* value guitars.

**DBZ** is also underrated (same guy who started Dean guitars).

Probably the best value guitar on the market today, though, is **Vintage.** They make Strat, Les Paul, and Tele copies, and come in relic finishes. The fretwork, hardware, and overall quality is right up there with American Fenders. Really crazy stuff. I don't know how they do it. [Here's a review by none other than Will Ray](http://www.premierguitar.com/articles/22225-bottom-feeder-vintage-icon-series-v6-distressed-s-style).

I'm also a big fan of the **Fender Modern Player Tele.** I bought one as a present for a friend of mine who's an acoustic player when she wanted to get into electric. I'm not a Tele player, but I liked it so much that I almost bought a second one for myself!

**Rob Chapman** guitars are also a good value.

**Danelectro** guitars are also a lot of fun.Yes!

Disclosure: I teach and I'm biased. That's what volume pedals are for!A lot of artists seek to reflect on tragedy in their lives in their art, and their art is better for it. If you loved guitar, and you were good at it, I encourage you to consider one day taking it up again. But it's up to you of course.Check out the book Christopher Parkening Guitar Method Vol 1. It's pretty much the industry standard for those learning classical guitar in my experience. Also pick up Segovia's Diatonic Major and Minor Scales for additional practice.

And take lessons!Oh man, I've been through so much gear over the years.

**First guitar:** 1972 cheap Espa\u00f1a **nylon string** folk/classical guitar that was my dad's. I'm actually really glad I started on a nylon string.

**First "real" guitar: Fender Standard Stratocaster** (MIM) from a pawn shop. I bought it because I knew nothing about guitars and the guy at the pawn shop told me it was a good guitar for a beginner.

**First pro-quality guitar:** My next guitar was a **Taylor Leo Kottke Signature** jumbo 6-string. Loved that guitar! I recently sold it to a friend of mine.

After that I bought a '98 Fender American Deluxe Fat Strat. It's the best Strat I've ever owned. I knew I wanted an American Deluxe Strat with a humbucker in the bridge, an ash body, and a rosewood fretboard. I really wanted a sunburst, but I went to six different stores in several cities and this one was the best.  I still have it. It's my favorite Strat, even after having a couple CS Fenders.

My next guitar was a **'98 Gibson Les Paul DC Standard.** It was my main guitar for a couple years. I still have it! It suffered a headstock break in 2001 and it only works with light strings now, but it's still a great guitar. The main reason I was interested in that model was that I was into Metallica at the time and I wanted a two-humbucker guitar, and this was the only Gibson I'd ever seen with 24 frets. And it was really pretty - AAA flamed top with a trans blue finish and gold hardware.

After that I custom ordered a **Carvin DC127T**, neck through, all koa with an ebony fretboard and gold hardware. I put an EMG 60 in the neck and an 85 in the bridge. It was a great guitar but not really for me. I sold it a few years later. Carvins are *fantastic* guitars if you've never played one. I would never hesitate to recommend one to someone considering a made-to-order guitar.

I have a whole bunch of other guitars now:

http://i.imgur.com/OhDUrOE.jpg

and these days my #1 is my Schaefer 16" custom made acoustic archtop with a floating pickup.

https://c2.staticflickr.com/8/7357/11678995335_0e27c01451_b.jpg

My main electric is a custom made Michael Rowan (left) and I also have a backup Rowan (right) that's very similar except it has a fixed bridge instead of a floating trem:

http://i.imgur.com/GftvU3r.jpg

I also have a Parker Fly Artist that I play a lot:

http://i.imgur.com/DyHIEzO.jpg

and a heavily modified Line 6 Variax JTV-69 that I mostly use for recording:

http://i.imgur.com/aMnQE6E.jpg

My main flattop acoustic these days is a Taylor 512e with a cedar top, and my main classical is a 1970 Martin N-10.

My taste has evolved to more jazz/blues/fusion stuff over the years, versus Metallica that I liked when I first started, and SRV that I got heavily into after that. But I play a lot of different styles, and so I keep a lot of different types of guitars on hand depending on what the situation calls for.

**There really is no "right" guitar; it just depends on what you're playing and what sound you're going for.** What type of amp you're using matters, too.It's really pretty simple and nothing you likely don't already know.

Unless you have some kind of legit anxiety issue, it's probably just stage fright. It's nothing to worry about. Just rehearse!

I'll tell you something about rehearsing, though. It's not the same as practicing. Rehearsing means practicing *performing.* Practicing is something you do on your own. Practicing means running scales and picking technique and so on. Rehearsing means going through whole songs, in the order of your set list, with your band (if you have a band).

Rehearse as much as you can, in addition to practicing. Get on stage as much as you can. Even a lot of pro players do tiny, unannounced or pseudonymous shows to warm up before they go on tour. Being on stage is different from playing in your basement or garage. Do it as often as you can and it'll get easier.Well, are you playing with a violin bow on guitar?

There's a difference between breaking a bow and breaking horsehair. Bow hair breaks. It happens.

One thing to keep in mind is that violins use ribbon wound (aka flatwound) strings, not roundwound strings like electric guitars use. These tear up horsehair pretty rapidly.

By the way you can rehair a bow. Unless you are buying dirt cheap bows, it's probably cheaper than buying a new bow. If either is too expensive for you, then frankly, stop playing with a bow, LOL.

Or try out an E-Bow!

http://www.sweetwater.com/store/detail/EbowThe MXR is vastly superior in terms of noise floor, signal-to-noise ratio, durability, reliability, and QC.

You get what you pay for.I highly recommend Jay Weik's "Daily Sight Reading Studies for the Guitarist."

Practice 10-30 min/day. It's a 30-day program. You'll be sight-reading full chords in real time in a month.

USE A METRONOME!

http://www.amazon.com/Daily-Sight-Reading-Studies-Guitarist-QwikGuide/dp/0786649895You might also consider a parametric EQ. What are you using it for, just tone shaping? Or are you trying to solve a specific issue?I mean is there something about your guitar or amp tone that you don't like that you want to improve in particular? Is it too thick, too thin, not brilliant enough, not bright enough, not sparkly enough, not fat enough, not full enough, not boomy enough...? If you can describe what the problem is, I can recommend the right gear, and the right settings.Makes sense, okay. Probably the best thing to do is upgrade your amp - your amp matters a LOT in terms of your tone. But that said, an EQ pedal is pretty much the "secret weapon" of a lot of pros, in addition to a compressor. A lot of people spend thousands of dollars and countless hours trying different kinds of pickups, strings, speakers, you name it, trying to solve problems that could be fixed with a simply adjust to a 10-band EQ.

I have one of these and I *love* it:

http://www.sweetwater.com/store/detail/10BandEQIf you have room on your pedalboard and can afford the extra cost (it's $40 more), then definitely.

A 10-band means 4 more bands; that's 66% more control over your tone than the 6-band version.That's totally fine, man. I wish I'd started guitar when I was 12! 

I will tell you one thing I wish someone had told me when I started: A good EQ will help your tone a lot, but frankly the most important thing is practicing. Practice your *ass off.* You will thank me later :)Well first of all, buy used. You'll get twice as much guitar for the money.

You'll get a better deal on Craigslist than you will at a music store or pawn shop because there's no middle man. And don't forget to negotiate! If you're not a beginner and know what to look for, then you should be okay avoiding the risk of getting a lemon that goes with that. Just make sure to check that the truss rod functions properly, that the fret ends aren't sharp and that the frets are seated properly and that the neck doesn't have anything serious like significant bow or backbow, that the top doesn't have any swelling or anything, that there aren't any cracks that haven't been repaired that could get worse, etc.

It's actually not too difficult to find a used acoustic on a $300 budget that's pretty decent. You can get a good value by buying the right brand.

Check out Eastman, Ibanez, Yamaha, Washburn, Carvin (if you can find one), Alvarez, and Seagull.

Avoid Taylors and Martins\u2014you are paying extra for the brand name if you're buying in the $300 range.Well in metal playing, except for playing clean parts, you probably don't need one. Part of what distortion does is compress the signal, so it's redundant.

For metal clean parts, I like a bit of compression and a bit of chorus. A bit of delay can be good too.Well geez man, if you can play most of Tool's discography, you should be teaching lessons, LOL.

Scales, modes, chord theory/inversions, voice leading, transcription, phrasing and cadences, yep. Lots of ground to cover. Depending on how involved you wanna get and what kind of music you want to play, and what you want to do with it, you may need more theory, or less. There's *always* more to learn.

If you're looking for advice on real progress, the #1 thing I can recommend is lessons. That's really the best way. There is no substitute for 1-on-1 instruction.

Also, go to jam sessions and/or join a band. There is also no substitute for playing with other people, especially people who are better than you.Hi!

**Short answer: Yes.** You get what you pay for.

**Long answer:** All budget amps are going to sound pretty much the same in terms of tone quality, and the difference in price for a cheaper one (like in the $100 range) versus a nicer one (like $250) is basically in features and wattage. You can get a decent amp with built-in effects, a built-in tuner, a built-in headphone preamp for silent practice with headphones, a built-in interface for direct recording to your computer or accessing additional features, built-in modeling of different types of amps, multiple channels, etc etc etc.

Or for less money, you can get an amp that does fewer of these things.

If you are getting an amp for home practice, and you are mostly playing at low volume, and you are on a budget, you want:

- A solid-state amp
- An amp with a headphone output
- An amp with built-in effects and probably a built-in tuner
- An amp that's no smaller than a 1x10
- An amp that's at least 15 watts or so, bare minimum

A very popular bedroom amp that has all of these things is the Line 6 Spider IV for $100 new. They have a ton of features and are EXTREMELY versatile. There are one of the most popular student amps/practice amps in the world for a reason: their bang-for-buck is simply unbeatable. And you can save even more money by buying one used. They are widely available on Craigslist and Reverb.com or eBay.

Blackstar also makes decent starter amps but in my opinion, you get more for your money with Line 6. 

You're not really going to see a major difference in tone until you start getting into hybrid amps and all-tube amps, around the $400-500 mark and up.

I recommend getting a cheaper amp (like the $100 one I mentioned above) and saving your money for whatever you want next, unless you are planning to play in a band or at jam sessions, in which case you should get a larger amp with more power. But if you are just using it at home at bedroom volumes, then save your money. Trust me, you will find other guitar-related things you want to spend it on as you get better, whether it's an upgrade to your guitar, a pedal, or any of a dozen other things.I'm not saying Martin doesn't make good guitars; of course they do! That's how they earned their reputation as a high-end brand. I have a vintage Martin myself.

But it's quite accurate that you pay a premium for the brand name when you buy one, same as Fender, same as Taylor, same as Gibson.There are a couple:

http://www.warmoth.com/Guitar/Bodies/BodyBuilder.aspx?style=88

https://monikerguitars.com/

http://www.schecterguitars.com/custom/configurator

Google "design your own guitar" for lots more.What specifically do you dislike about the tone of your Sheraton?Go to a Guitar Center and try a bunch and see what you like. Only you can decide what is the right amp for you.They certainly are; they are going for a bit of a different market niche though. Big Babies are somewhat between a full-sized guitar and a travel guitar. They have bodies that are about 7% smaller than a regular Taylor guitar, even smaller than their Grand Concert size, although they do have a normal 25.5" scale length.

If you aren't specifically looking for a small-bodied guitar for travel or busking etc, I think there are better choices out there (unless you find a really great deal on one).Lessons! *Lessons!* **LESSONS!**Muddy and thin/flat are kind of contradictory descriptors, but I think some adjustment can help.

Long story short, you can likely solve this issue for a LOT less than $450 and without any semi-permanent or permanent changes to your instrument.

**I highly recommend picking up an EQ pedal.** My favorite is the [MXR 10-band for $120](http://www.sweetwater.com/store/detail/10BandEQ).

If your tone is muddy, try cutting a bit around 120-200 Hz. Not too much, or your tone will lack warmth.

"Fatness" is basically code for lower mids. Boost a bit around 240 Hz up to around 3 kHz for a fatter sound.

You can also try heavier top strings (for example, if you are using a 10-42 set, try swapping your top 3 strings to an 11 set but keep your bottom 3 strings as a 10 set). You can also try raising your pickups a bit to get a better signal-to-noise ratio, or adjusting the individual pole pieces.

P90 pickups are known for sounding fat compared to, say Strat single coils, but frankly the stock humbuckers in your Sheraton are probably going to sound fatter than P90s, which are single coil. Because of the dummy coils in humbuckers, they don't hum like single coils, but the higher inductance of the two coils lowers the resonant peak, and the increased size of the magnetic field causes some cancellation of higher harmonics. In other words, humbuckers sound less bright, sparkly, crisp, and thin compared to single coils. If you like a fat tone, I definitely don't recommend switching from humbuckers to P90s (also, it's expensive).

A lot of guitarists spend thousands of dollars and countless hours tearing their hair out changing strings types and brands and gauges, changing pickups, changing speakers in their cabs, buying fancy cables, etc etc etc, when every studio engineer will tell you to just buy a damn EQ pedal.

Now, you can't fix everything with EQ - you should get it as close to perfect acoustically as possible first - but if your complaint is something relatively easy to fix like fatness, and your alternative is spending almost $500, try an EQ pedal first.

Here are some examples of what you can do with an EQ pedal. DO NOT listen to this video on laptop speakers; use real speakers or preferably, some excellent headphones:

https://youtu.be/JiwWM0viVH4?t=2m51sThose are just my electrics actually; I also have a number of acoustics, jazz guitars, and a couple of other basses too.

&gt;Did you start by finger picking with the nylon string?

I did, and I still play fingerstyle a lot! I play hybrid most of the time though, fingerpicking with my middle, ring, and pinky, and holding a pick with my thumb and index finger.

A background in classical guitar DEFINITELY influenced my gear choices later on and still does. I play very heavy strings (usually 12s or 13s) and tend to gliss rather than bend, although I bend, too. 

I greatly prefer flatter fretboards, wider nut widths, wider string spacing, etc, even on my electrics. I also wear my straps very short in order to simulate the playing position of a classical with a footstool.If it's possible to get the Expression 2 system, I *highly* recommend it. Second to that, the K&amp;K Pure Mini. I have tried *lots* of pickups systems for acoustic guitars, and second to an external mic, these are the two best available, with the E2 system quite a bit better than the K&amp;K, and everything else *vastly* inferior to those two.Never too late!My family used to have a family business that sold &amp; installed home theater equipment and constructed soundproof rooms. I can tell you firsthand that there is no way to "soundproof" a room that won't require renovation. Anything you do to the walls will not accomplish, even remotely, your goal of lowering volume significantly.

Treating the walls with acoustic foam, eggcrate foam, carpeting, etc is called deadening. This will reduce reverberation, not volume.

What you are hoping to do is called isolation. Isolation is extremely expensive and difficult to accomplish. Double walls, double floors, and double ceilings are effective at this; cheap eggcrate foam is near-useless at this. There is nothing you can do (cheaply/easily/reversibly) to the surface of a wall that will do what you want. That is a big part of the reason that recording studios are so ridiculously expensive to build and why so many home studios use software simulations of amps and cabs instead of iso booths or live rooms.

Some things that MIGHT help are actually things like bookcases full of books, though. Heavy drapes will help a negligible amount and in my opinion isn't worth even trying.

My advice is simple though. I'm also a former licensed Missouri real estate broker, and as a musician who has lived in many rental properties over the years with neighbors, I can tell you how I've dealt with this before myself:

Unless your lease says you've signed away your right to this, the fact is, you are allowed to practice a musical instrument during reasonable hours and at a reasonable volume in your own home. As a paying tenant/homeowner, you should not be embarrassed about this nor ashamed of this - you are paying for that right. If you are not making excessive noise, and you are not doing it late at night, your neighbors cannot reasonably ask you, nor legally require you, to stop playing.

Now, obviously you don't want to piss off your neighbors, but if you aren't playing late at night, I don't think you need to worry.

I'm not a lawyer and this should not be considered legal advice nor a substitute for competent legal advice. But if I were in your shoes, I would simply not worry about it. If they complain, ask them what they would consider a good compromise and go from there.

Hope this helps!

Edited to add, and tagging /u/HarrisDoug so you see it:

Often the loudest part of rehearsal is the drum kit. There are two relatively easy solutions to this; one is significantly cheaper than the other and both are *significantly* cheaper than anything you could to try to soundproof the room in anything close to an effective way. Bands I've been in have used both methods with great success.

If you need to lower volume a little bit, and your drummer really prefers the feel of his/her regular kit, I suggest lightning rods instead of drum sticks. They feel a little different, but they're much quieter. They are not at all like brushes, which use bunched wire to create an extremely soft sound at the expense of the feel of normal drumsticks. Lightning rods are basically 7 small dowels bunched together, instead of one big piece of wood like a regular drumstick. They have a similar attack and feel to ordinary sticks but aren't capable of the same volume. They're really fantastic:

http://www.musiciansfriend.com/drums-percussion/promark-lightning-rod-drumsticks

The second suggestion, which is more expensive but works really well, is a good electronic drum kit. Don't cheap out here or your drummer will hate it because it doesn't feel right\u2014make sure you get one with proper mesh heads and with good-quality triple trigger cymbals. Then you just need a keyboard amp or PA and you can control the volume the same way you would a keyboardist or singer\u2014a volume knob. Also, you can use them for near-silent practice, if you have something like a Line 6 preamp for your guitar and your bassist has a direct box. It makes it REALLY easy to record rehearsals as well since everything is already going through a mixer. 

This will require several thousands of dollars for a V-drum set (you can save a ***LOT*** by buying a used one or piecing it together yourself) and a mixer and PA system, if you don't already have a mixer/PA. A realistic budget for a used Roland TD-12, a used Line 6 preamp for your guitar, a DI for your bass, and 3 sets of headphones is about $2,000. Still 1/10 the price of soundproofing the room, easily, though!

My old band lived together in a duplex and practiced hours every evening this way. It was wonderful and we were incredibly tight without the neighbors even knowing when we were practicing. We went the headphone route but if you're permitted to make a bit of noise, you can do it just as easily with monitors. We also occasionally used the electronic drumset live for smaller venues or when we didn't want to haul the trailer - because the electronic drumset was so light and compact and didn't require road cases, we could fit the ENTIRE DRUM SET without breaking it down (just folding the rack in a bit) into a minivan, along with our guitar &amp; bass amps, guitars &amp; basses, and pedalboards, AND the three of us band members. Plus, set-up and tear-down is a breeze - because there is no setup for the drum kit and no tear down, and no need to mic up the drums (you just plug it in and hand the two stereo outputs to the soundman), you can set up your entire band in about 15 minutes. It's crazy.

I wrote about the first time my old band used V-drums for playing live on another forum here, if you want to read about it:

http://www.talkbass.com/threads/our-first-gig-with-electronic-drums-holy-crap.389151/A lot of heavy metal guitars are comfy for classically trained players, in my opinion. My Parker is probably the one I have that's the easiest to play comfortably with proper technique. Carvins, ESPs, Jacksons, Ibanezes, Strandbergs, etc are good places to start.Sounds like a grounding issue. Most guitars have this issue at least a little bit; goes with the territory.

Turning off fluorescent lights, neon lights, incandescent lights with dimmers, and computers can help.

You can also try a power conditioner or a Ebtech Hum X hum eliminator plug. 

A tech may also be able to help with a little soldering and foil to your guitar (improving shielding, etc).So-called "musician's earplugs" have built-in filters that reduce intensity of sound waves in a non-linear fashion that sounds more natural to the ear\u2014(flat attenuation). The effect is a reduction in sound level while still sounding like regular music, rather than muffling everything.

They are about $10.

Try these:

http://www.musiciansfriend.com/accessories/hearos-high-fidelity-ear-plugsHey /u/Doctor_Jimmy_Brungus. We just went over this in a recent thread. If you have a tube amp, **DO NOT** run your amp without a speaker cab or a dummy load attached, or you will blow your amp. You cannot simply plug in a headphone amp to the line out and unplug the speaker.

Read this thread for more info, read in particular my gilded comment for what you want:

https://www.reddit.com/r/Guitar/comments/3rl6v8/gear_headphone_jack_to_a_fender_hot_rod_deluxe/Amps can carry lethal power *even when they're unplugged.* If you don't know what you're doing, I highly suggest taking your amp to an amp tech.

If you want to test if a speaker is blown, use a multimeter and set it to measure the impedance. If a speaker is blown, it will read infinite impedance.You *can* but it will sound a lot better through a bass amp. It's a bass instrument. Your speaker will not last as long (before it blows), especially if you're playing at high volume, if you're playing a Bass VI or any other bass, compared to playing a guitar.

That said, there are plenty of guitar pedals out there that are 1) designed to play an octave down from a regular guitar and 2) designed to be used with guitar amps.

For example, the MXR Sub Machine is a fuzz pedal with two octave modes: an octave up and an octave down of your dry signal. You can even hit the "Series" switch to put the pedal in series instead of parallel, which runs the fuzz and the sub octave together, for a fuzzy octave down effect. Again this is a guitar pedal designed to be played through a regular guitar amp, as seen in the video, and he even plays it drop-tuned around 3:30:

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=3KmR7_QdEtI

Whammy pedals are also popular guitar pedals that can play very low notes and are designed to be used with regular guitar amps. And let's not forget whammy bars that also do dive-bombs.

And also, a lot of modern amps are designed with downtuning in mind\u2014especially among metal players, these days, it's not uncommon to play at extremely high volume, with a very distorted signal, and with your guitar tuned down two or three steps, or playing a 7- or even 8-string guitar. That's not an octave down like a bass, though.

As I said, you *can* play notes an octave down through your guitar amp, but if you are simply intending to play bass (which is what a Bass VI is), then get a bass amp and use that.Oh, if it has an integrated dummy loud then all you need is a headphone amp. Headphone amps are designed to accept a line-level signal. You don't even need a transformer, just an XLR to 1/4" adaptor (or whatever size the headphone amp accepts). You can spend as little or as much as you want on a headphone amp; there are headphone amps that are $25 and headphone amps that are $50,000 (no shit) for hi-fi applications. ART is a decent brand that makes good budget headphone amps.Forgot to mention that you will still need a cab simulator if the direct out doesn't offer it. Some headphone amps and loadboxes have cab/mic simulation built in.Gift card. 

I know it doesn't sound very personal, but unless you know EXACTLY what she wants, let her pick it out. Guitarists often have *very* picky taste and when they want something guitar-related, unless it's like a "Gibson" t-shirt, they often know *exactly* what they want and nothing else. It is a waste of money to get her something like a strap, or a cable, or a tuner, etc if you don't know precisely which type she wants. 

For example, even for something simple like a strap, I use only Levy's Leathers M8 polypropylene 2" straps. I didn't have to look that up; I know what kind they are because I have 15 of them. The reason I only use those kind is that they are the only kind that has a soft poly back (not suede or cotton) that fits Schaller Straplocks easily over the ends, but still has double-reinforced leather around the button attachment, AND has a plastic buckle slide that can be adjusted very short (I'm a 5'5" lady and I also wear my straps pretty high up). 

If someone gave me any other strap, I would never use it.

You can't go wrong with a gift card. Also, Guitar Center offers something called their String Club. For $20, you get a $5 gift certificate good toward strings once each month for a year. They do it as a gimmick to get people to visit their store every month, but it's actually a really good deal and makes a good gift. That way, she can pick out exactly what brand and gauge strings she actually likes.

Hope this helps.If she's been playing more than a month, she likely already has a tuner she likes. If she uses capos (not all guitarists use them, only those who have a need to transpose on the fly), she likely already has at least one that she likes.

These are not good suggestions in my opinion.It's not 12 sets of strings for $20. It's a $5 gift certificate, monthly, toward a string purchase. Most sets of strings are more than $5, but over the course of a year, you'll get $60 in gift certificates for one $20 outlay. It's a good deal if you ask me.No need for name-calling. I'm giving my opinion, same as you.You're welcome to your opinions; I'm welcome to mine.

I've been playing and teaching for many years. I've never met any player who's been playing more than a month or so who doesn't already own a tuner. And most guitarists have preferences about what kind of tuner they like anyway.

Capos are pretty uncommon except among acoustic guitarists, and even among acoustic guitarists, unless you have a need to transpose on the fly to play an accompanying singer in a different register, you probably don't need one. And if you do, they are only $15, and you probably have one. It's one of those "it's the thought that counts" gifts, in my opinion. The OP asked "What's a great gift for a guitar player?" A capo is a totally ordinary, unexciting, and actually probably not-very-useful gift\u2014not a "great gift."

No need to be sarcastic. All I said was that I don't think those suggestions are good suggestions, which I'm entitled to think. If you don't want your comments open to criticism, which is fine if that's what you're looking for, then consider posting them somewhere other than a public forum like Reddit. Kind, constructive criticism like mine is totally appropriate here.My comment was for OP, not you.No problem. Thanks for your response. And good point about learning songs if the artist uses a capo. Come to think of it, that's the only time *I* ever use a capo! I'm doing my best to be civil. We're both just trying to help OP get something nice for his girlfriend. I don't know how this devolved into name-calling, but I apologize for upsetting you. It was my intention to help OP with his question.I always have my new students get a copy of Jay Weik's "Daily Sight-Reading Studies for the Guitarist." Make sure you get the large-print version, which is actually just normal size, because the normal size one is actually a pocket edition.

It has 30 exercises designed to be learned 1 day at a time. Starting with very simple whole notes, you'll be sight-reading full chords in real time in 1 month.

The single most important piece of advice for learning to sight read: USE A METRONOME. #2 piece of advice: PRACTICE EVERY DAY.

Here's a link to the book:
http://www.amazon.com/Daily-Guitar-Reading-Technique-Studies/dp/0786682809/I don't use one personally, but I often recommend them to people. Killer amps, not even "for the money."I think there's definitely a difference between a $30 pedal and a $100 pedal, but here's Eric Johnson's current rig (updated 2013), direct from his website. Not saying he doesn't use any vintage/boutique gear (he certainly does!) but there's also an off-the-shelf Boss DD2, a Crybaby, his signature model Fuzz Face, and a Tubescreamer in there:

http://www.ericjohnson.com/images/amps/ejrigjbds.jpgHere are some additional tips for EQ'ing guitar. YMMV depending on your mix and exact gear:

- Roll off 80 Hz and below if you have a band for it. Guitar doesn't go that low and it can add boominess.

- To cut through a mix, boost in the 3-4 kHz range

- 120-125 Hz is where "warmth" lives. Not enough here sounds cold. Too much here sounds muddy.

- 240 Hz is where "fullness" lives, especially on acoustic guitars.

- 600 Hz to about 3 kHz is where "presence" lives. Some heads and combos have this onboard in the EQ section of the preamp as well. Fender amps that have an onboard "Presence" pot amplify and attenuate at 3.9 kHz. This is ideal for a rock sound.

- 2.5 kHz is where "bite" lives. Not enough here will bury your guitar in the mix. Too much here sounds harsh. Too much here will also bring out string noise.

- Between 2.5 kHz and 5 kHz is where "clarity" lives. Boost here to help a darker Martin acoustic sound more like a brittle Gibson acoustic, or for a humbucker guitar to sound more like single coils in a mix.

- 8 kHz is where "sizzle" lives. Personally I *hate* this frequency range and usually cut it quite a bit, but I'm a jazz/blues/fusion player. If you play country or shred metal, this is your jam.

None of this is hard &amp; fast. Experiment. There are no wrong answers and engineers/producers vary considerably in what they consider an ideal mix. As I said, EQ can't fix everything and your first approach should be getting it right acoustically, but these types of fixes can help a "good-but-not-great" tone sound excellent.Yep, very common in the studio as well\u2014if you're doubling a guitar part, or harmonizing, or even as you said just playing rhythm vs lead, you can bring out much more of your instrument by trying different EQ curves on different tracks. Similar idea to the more traditional route of switching pickups on the same guitar for rhythm vs lead as well: different pickup positions put different frequencies at the forefront, even if both/all 3 are the same type of pickup and you're playing the exact same parts.

And yes, for guitar, especially in a pedal format, 6 bands is really all you need. Some EQ pedals, like the Mesa/Boogie one in the video I linked to above, only have 5 bands.Yes, with jazz there really are no rules. That's what I play the most, and I've used everything from an ash Tele with single coils (articulate, brilliant, and clean) to a fully hollow archtop with flats and humbuckers (thick, fat, and full) with good results. It totally depends on what sound you're going for.

Also have to disagree on tube amps. They are EXCELLENT and ideal for blues and rock in a studio setting. For beginner and intermediate players, a solid state modeling amp is often a better value. Built-in effects, multiple amp tones to choose from, silent practice with headphones, cab-simulated direct out for recording (some even have onboard USB interfaces), lightweight, portable, indestructible, and inexpensive.

And depending on what kinds of music you play, a solid state amp can be a good choice for recording and performing, too. I have a boutique Fargen Custom Shop Blackbird that's similar to a Vibrolux circuit. It is single channel, SPARKLING clean no matter how high you crank it (30 watts 1x12), with spring reverb and a bright switch. A wonderful, top notch boutique clean tube amp. But frankly, I use my DV Mark Little Jazz just as much for ultra clean tones like that. It has a 3-band EQ, digital reverb, a single 8-inch speaker (not a typo), and it's TINY. At 45 watts, it's got plenty of headroom, and the thing is frickin' LOUD. It can keep up with jazz drums no problem, especially if you put it up on a table rather than pointed at your ankles (and it has a direct out, too). I love that thing. They also make a 1x12 if you accompany louder drums.

The Fargen retails for about $4k; I paid literally 10% of that for my DV Mark. And at 15 pounds, it's 1/3 the weight, too.Oh gosh, please ask questions! I'm not at all intending to say that learning about guitars, amps, effects, etc is not worthwhile. In fact I would recommend Dan Erlewine's "How To Make Your Electric Guitar Play Great!" and "The Guitar Player Repair Guide" books to any new player, along with Dave Hunter's "The Guitar Amp Handbook" and "The Yamaha Sound Reinforcement Handbook." Essential reading useful for a lifetime of tinkering, playing, performing, and recording.

What I am intending to say, rather, is that if you are *frustrated* with your tone, try an EQ pedal before you rip apart your rig and spend a bunch of money that you might not have to spend. And at the end of the day, understand that tone is in your hands, and the point is to *play* the instrument, emphasis on play. It's supposed to be fun, not frustrating.Cool! If you missed it, I wrote out some common EQ fixes for various complaints here:

https://www.reddit.com/r/Guitar/comments/3s3gkn/rant_mode_engaged_before_you_start_yet_another/cwtu2skWell something to keep in mind about the Spider amps is that they are budget amps. They are designed to pack a lot of features into a low price. They are *NOT* designed to sound great.

I think that Line 6 gets an unfair reputation by a lot of players as being substandard in the tone department. I think there are two reasons for this. One reason is that modeling technology, being computerized/digital, improves at a very rapid pace compared to most other types of amps. I mean, hand-wired tube amp technology hasn't changed substantially in 50 years! But if you tried out a cheap-o Spider II at a Guitar Center and swore off Line 6, you really owe it to yourself to go back and check out a Spider IV. While still a budget/practice amp, the sound has improved *substantially* versus the older editions. 10 years ago, when the Spider series was introduced, because they were so cheap, they flooded Guitar Centers and Sam Ash and other big chain stores, and lots of guitarists tried out a Line 6 amp for the first time, thought they sounded shitty, and concluded that Line 6 makes crap amps. Consider how much other computer-based technology has improved in the same amount of time. I mean, 10 years ago, there was no such thing as a 1st-generation iPhone, and [this was considered top of the line!](http://i-cdn.phonearena.com/images/phones/5219-large/LG-F7200.jpg) Modeling amps have similarly improved.

The other thing is that Line 6 makes a range of tech at various price points and people often mentally compare the cheapest Line 6 gear to the most expensive amps they are modeling. For example, if you dial in a Marshall Plexi on a Spider amp, and compare the two, yeah, a real Plexi is going to sound better. No shit\u2014it's a $2,700 flagship head and you're comparing it to a $200 practice amp. Hardly a fair comparison and you really shouldn't be surprised that the Marshall sounds better, even though the Spider is modeled after the Marshall.

But on the other hand, if you compare the studio tone (from the control room, through high quality monitors, I mean) of a top of the line $1500 Line 6 Helix processor that's modeling a Plexi and A/B'ed it with a real $2,700 Marshall head + $900 JCM1960A cab mic'ed up with a $3,700 Neumann U87A condenser mic, my guess is, you'd be hard pressed to tell with greater than 50% accuracy (which would be the same as guessing) which one is the model and which one is the real McCoy.

And that's saying something, considering that the Helix costs about $6,000 less that the amp setup.... AND that it can model dozens of other amps, plus dozens of other cabs, plus microphones, AND dozens of effects, too.

Bottom line: Line 6 amps are not at all garbage IMO and many pro studios have no problem using their high-end stuff, like the Helix processors and POD Farm. Many pro guitarists swear by the Line 6 DL4, one of the most popular delay pedals on the market. And a Variax is a common sight in studios, as well. They do make good stuff, if you don't make the mistake of judging them on their practice amps. Yep. Some of the most common amps you see for jazz players are Roland JC-120s and Cubes, especially among students and city-dwellers. Loud, lightweight, inexpensive, and built-in reverb and chorus with a line out. I'm also a fan of the Henrikson 110. It's under 25 pounds, pristine clean, and loud as a *mofo.*It depends on what you mean by "the same."

Clapton sounds like Clapton by definition, no matter what he's playing. Everything he plays sounds like him because he *is* him. Of course his tone is different when he's playing a Strat than it does on a 335, and he sounds even more different on a Martin! But my point is that he's a great songwriter and a great player, and *that's* what people care about, and why people call him "God."There are no rules. You can, or you can use both to further shape your tone. You can also use the tone knob on your guitar to shape your tone even more. Many guitar volume knobs also roll off a bit of high end when you turn them down to 8 or 7 instead of keeping them on 10. And you can shape your tone even more by using the pickup selector, of course. I suggest using your ear. 

It's like stacking any other effects: If your amp has a drive channel, you can stack it with an outboard drive pedal for a *really* over-the-top dirty tone. Or, you can keep your amp clean and do all your "dirty work" with just pedals. There's no wrong answer here.

Personally, I like a very fat, thick, warm, full sound. I use heavy strings, I play guitars with humbuckers, and I keep the tone knob on my guitars turned to 0. I usually turn the amp's presence control off (if it has one), and turn the bass and mid pots to 7 or 8 and the treble down to 3 or so. I pretty much only use the neck pickup (on one of my custom guitars, it doesn't even have a bridge pickup), and I use an MXR 10-band EQ to further roll of high end even beyond that. 

This tone is not for everyone. It sounds good for comping and chord solos for my style of jazz. For single-note lines and soloing, I turn off the EQ pedal, which brings back in high end, and I also turn my volume up on my guitar from 7 to 10. This is backwards from how most people use EQ pedals (as a boost in mids AND overall output for soloing). But like I said, there are no rules.

If I'm playing with a bassist or keyboardist, I shape my tone very differently so I don't interfere with their frequencies. It really just depends on what you're trying to accomplish and what result you're getting from your gear that isn't ideal without applying EQ.Yep, resolving those kinds of issues is exactly what they're for!It's both. Compare the audio in these two videos:

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=55nAwmVLQSk

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=15eu7ar5EKM

Both are older recordings so there's gonna be noise, etc. But Eric recorded the first one (the studio version) with a semi-hollow plywood Gibson ES-335 with dual humbuckers, a mahogany neck, and a rosewood fretboard. The second one (the live one) was recorded with a 1957 ash-bodied, maple-necked Stratocaster with single coils. Two guitars that really could not be more different if you tried. Yet they are both *unmistakably* Eric Johnson's signature sound.Are we talking about the same concept?

I'm saying they are both unmistakably Eric Johnson. I'm not saying they are indistinguishable in a blind test (although to any non-guitarist, they almost certainly would be).

I'm saying that if I were playing through Eric Johnson's rig, even if I were playing "Cliffs of Dover," I couldn't make it sound like *either* of those recordings because I'm not Eric Johnson. A big part of tone is technique, pick attack, where you play on the neck, what settings you are using, etc.Boosting either 100 or 200 will help your rig sound thicker/fuller, if it doesn't have enough warmth. Too much in that general range will make your rig sound muddy and thuddy. You just have to play with it to find what sounds best.

There are three basic types of EQs. Your pedal is what's called a graphic EQ, which means that it has specific, set frequencies that can be boosted or attenuated depending on where the slider is vertically. Moving the slider adjusts the gain. The frequencies listed on the pedal are called center frequencies and they are fixed (the bandwidth, or "Q," cannot be adjusted). The only thing you can adjust is the gain of each frequency.

The second type of EQ is called a parametric EQ, which lets you control which frequencies you are boosting or cutting by changing the center frequencies *and* the bandwidth, also known as "Q" (how "wide" the range of frequencies affected by each knob is). 

There are also semi-parametric EQs, which usually means that they allow you to adjust the center frequency but not the bandwidth. A wah pedal is basically a semi-parametric EQ that sweeps through the midrange frequencies using an expression pedal instead of a slider or a pot. With a wah pedal, you can't adjust the gain either, though, just the center frequency.

Which type of EQ is best for you depends on what you are trying to accomplish. Graphic EQs are the easiest to operate if you need to make quick adjustments, or if you need to see at a glance what exactly they are doing to your signal. But they give you less control over the specifics.

Your EQ pedal doesn't have a band that adjusts the 120-125 Hz band, but that's fine. These are approximate ranges anyway. Just experiment and you'll be able to hear what each slider does to your tone. For guitar, a 6-band is fine, or even a 5 like the Mesa/Boogie in the video I posted. I use a 10-band MXR but it takes up more space on your pedalboard, and I also play bass in addition to guitar.

MXR also makes a 6-band version of the same thing that's smaller and cheaper. It just depends on what your needs are.

If you are performing, the sound guy will likely have a 31-band EQ if it's needed, and if you're in the studio, there are fully parametric software EQs available too. 

If you are just using it for guitar, this one is $80 (new) instead of $120 for the 10-band. You can probably find it even cheaper used on Reverb.com etc:

http://www.jimdunlop.com/product/m109-6-band-graphic-eqJust for the record I do like boutique pedals and I have several that I like. Not trying to knock them. But I am saying, as long as you're not buying a total piece of crap that's noisy and fragile, it's important to keep in mind that there are *plenty* of pedals on the market that are totally decent, loved by professionals, and are not at all expensive, including some classics like the TS9 Tubescreamer, the Dunlop GCB95 Crybaby, the Boss DD7, etc, each of which is widely available for under $100.

Here are the 10 drive pedals I have around at the moment:

http://i.imgur.com/LQqOo0G.jpg

These range in price from $40 for the Daddy-O to $300 or so for the Sweet Tea. The EHX Soul Food ($78.20 MAP) is probably the one I use the most, and it's the second-cheapest one I have. More expensive isn't always better. You just have to try them out and see.

I'd hate to think that somebody reading this, who doesn't know much about pedals, would walk away thinking that you have to spend $1200 to get a great Univibe tone, because you definitely don't.

If you're playing live, it's a good bet that nobody, even other guitarists, can tell the difference\u2014you're really at the mercy of the soundman and the quality of the PA and so on, anyway.

And really, people go to concerts to have fun, not to analyze tone. 90% of them are not only drinking, but *wearing earplugs!* It's hardly a hi-fi audio scenario no matter how you slice it :)I also prefer to go straight into the amp, but you might be artificially limiting yourself to a very small number of perfect amps for you if you go about it that way\u2014and possibly a number so small that it's 0, lol. 

My perfect tone does not exist if I'm restricting myself to guitar + cable + amp. I've got [several decent tube amps](http://i.imgur.com/GftvU3r.jpg) (plus a few others not pictured) that I spent a lot of time and money picking out, but none of them sound absolutely perfect to me without some tweaking. My Fargen (center) has a hemp-coned Tone Tubby 40/40 ceramic speaker in it, for example. My Blues Jr (not pictured) has upgraded caps, upgraded JJ tubes, an upgraded Jensen speaker, upgraded input and output transformers, an added sparkle knob, an added presence knob, and a few other mods. And on top of those things, I use the on board EQ knobs on both amps to get my tone exactly where I want it.

If you're going to permit use of the EQ knobs on the amp as an acceptable compromise to a perfect tone out of the box, is there really any difference between that and giving a nod of approval to doing your EQ'ing in a pedal in addition/instead? It's the same thing, just at a different point in the signal path.No, I'm talking about tone. How you attack the strings with your pick, how you hold your pick, etc have a big effect on tone. Even if two guitarists play the same piece of music with the same rig and the same arrangement, the same phrasing, etc, their tone will be different because of these factors. You get a rounder tone by playing closer to or on the neck. You can a more brittle tone by playing closer to the bridge, etc. How high or low you wear your strap and how tall you are can actually make a difference in your tone because of the affect on where your wrist naturally falls over the strings, for example.Your POD XT Live has a 6-band semi-parametric EQ built in!#**Burn her*!**
:)I think this is a totally healthy and admirable way to look at it. If you enjoy chasing tone, as I said in the OP, then go have fun. But if your goal is to be a great guitar player, be careful not to conflate owning a collection of great gear, or having great tone, with being a good player. They are separate things and enjoyable independently.I disagree. I use EQ to fine tune my tone, depending on the room, the mix, the particular guitar I'm using for that song, etc. If you limit yourself to the onboard EQ, you are ruling out a lot of great amps unnecessarily. My entire point with recommending an EQ pedal (if you don't have one) is that it lets you expand on what you are already doing with the amp's own EQ knobs.

There is no substantive difference between an onboard EQ and an outboard EQ. It is the same thing, just more nuanced control. If you are already open to using an amp's EQ, there is no reason to be against an EQ pedal in principle.

No one amp is perfect for a four or five distinct styles, I would think. Unless you're talking about a modeling amp. That's why modeling amps exist! Or unless by 4-5 distinct styles you mean classic rock, blues rock, boogie-woogie rock, indie rock, and rock 'n roll. 

Especially in the studio, I often run 2 amps with an A/B box, and don't even use the same amp for my clean sound and my drive sound on the same *song.*Well said. By the way I'm a fan, Jim! Means a lot coming from you :)You can, or you can stack your amp's EQ section and an outboard EQ for even more tone shaping. You can additionally use your guitar's tone &amp; volume knobs to shape your tone. There are no rules; it just depends on what sounds best in the mix, depending on the room you're in, what gear you have, what style of music you're playing, etc. There are lots of ways to shape tone, including where you play with your right hand (toward the neck sounds rounder and fatter; toward the bridge adds twang), whether you're using a pick or not, etc. 

I went into more detail about here as well:
https://www.reddit.com/r/Guitar/comments/3s3gkn/rant_mode_engaged_before_you_start_yet_another/cwtwcgkHar har. Laptop speakers are designed to be extremely tiny. They are not designed for critical listening. EQ can't fix everything, but it can help. But it's not like I'm suggesting that you can slap an EQ pedal on a Blues Jr and have it sound like a JCM800 at full tilt. You start with the right equipment for the job you want to do, and use an EQ to tweak from there, if needed.Yes, I also recommend amp stands if your amp doesn't have tilt-back legs. They are $20-40 depending on the brand.

When you're listening to an amp that you're going to mic up for live performance or recording, get down on your hands and knees and listen at ear level. Put your ears where the mic(s) are going to go. That's what the mic is going to hear, and that's the tone you should be shaping on board first.

And learn mic technique. It makes a big difference. If you're weak on how to mic up amps, you'll probably be tempted to spend a bunch of money on a nicer mic or preamp or whatever. There's nothing wrong with an SM57 if you know what you're doing.EQ can't fix bad tone. It can only improve good tone if it needs a little tweaking. It's important to get your tone correct from the source first, and then tweak with EQ, as needed. To get your as close to ideal from the source, you need to get your signal chain right first. Then add EQ if necessary after that.It's both. Compression is not an effect in the same way that, say, tremolo is an effect. Often, when done properly, your audience won't really notice it's there, kinda like reverb - a dry guitar tone just sounds weird if it doesn't have a bit of reverb.

Just like reverb, depending on your situation, you may not need to compress your tone with a pedal at all. If you're playing in a room with good natural reverb, it becomes noticeable (in a bad way) if you also have reverb added as an effect.

Similarly, if you are playing on an amp that compresses your signal on its own, you may not need a compressor. Tube amps cranked up will drive your signal into a natural compression. It's not the same as a distortion pedal or a fuzz pedal or anything, but it does have a similar effect as far as leveling out dynamics and increasing sustain. You can also use a compressor to drive a tube amp harder and get more gain out of it, if you prefer a natural tube warmth versus a pedal-type warmth.

If you're using a distortion pedal, you probably don't need a compressor. Distortion also compresses; that's part of how it works. But if you combine a compressor and a distortion pedal, you can use *less* distortion and still get a similar increase in sustain. 

You *can* use compression as an effect if you really crank it up, so that instead of being a subtle difference, it's very obvious. It will make your guitar sound "squishy." Sometimes this is fun and useful. (Reverb is the same way\u2014you *can* use a lot of it, as an effect, for example the way you would in surf music. But most of the time, reverb is subtle.)

Most of the time, compression shines when you are playing clean, especially when you are going back and forth between using a pick and playing fingerstyle (as you might while hybrid picking), doing chicken pickin', or if you are alternating between single note runs and pedal-steel style diad bends to get a more even sound. 

It's also useful in funk to get shimmery clean staccato chords to sit better.

Edit:

Here's a good video with examples showing what compressors can do for guitarists:
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=8nM5GsNNbyA Q is the symbol for "bandwidth." It is pronounced just like the letter. A Q knob adjusts how *many* frequencies are affected by the "Mid" knob. A lower Q value will control a wider band of frequencies. Turning up the Q will zero in on how many frequencies are being affected when you turn up or down the gain using the "Mid" knob. The "Mid" knob itself controls how *much* those frequencies are boosted or cut.

There is a saying in audio that you should cut narrow and boost wide. What this means is that if you are having a problem with too much of some quality, try to zero in on the specific frequency that's causing the problem and cut it. If your problem is that you have too little of some quality, boost a wider range of frequencies for a smoother EQ curve.

Generally speaking, it is preferable to cut than boost, unless you are intending to use your EQ pedal as a boost as well (which many are additionally designed to do). EQ is for really for tone tweaking once you have your gain, drive, and sustain where you want them. If you are boosting too many frequencies, this will affect the gain, sustain, and drive qualities of your tone as well, especially if you're using a tube amp.

Edit:

Here is a great article with more info than you ever wanted about EQ'ing:
http://www.soundonsound.com/sos/1995_articles/mar95/eq.html

Edit again:

On rereading it sounds like your Q knob is not a "True" Q knob but rather a center frequency shift for the mid range, since it's labeled in Hz. It's basically the same as a wah pedal in that it moves which frequency the Mid (gain) knob boosts or cuts. Still useful but the way you apply it is slightly different.Thank you for your in-depth comment. I'm not plagiarizing\u2014I've never visited that link before now. I think it's more that a lot of this info is widespread.

As for disagreements about frequency ranges, I did say in my original post that YMMV, it's not hard and fast, that different producers/engineers disagree and vary widely about what they consider an ideal mix, and that it depends on your particular gear. What I posted is True in my experience.

I totally feel you on seeing an EQ pedal and cringing in the studio. I'm talking more about EQ fixes for people who are not satisfied with their own gear, rather than investing a lot of money and effort in switching up their gear, with the goal being getting a satisfactory tone, so you can get back to focusing on your playing itself. If you're in a recording studio and you have an expert on mixing available to you, obviously, it's good advice to defer to their judgment! That's also why I said that your tone will sound very different at home alone than it will in a mix.

The bigger point I was making is that practicing and being a good player, in the big picture, should not take a backseat to chasing tone. If you are in the studio, or playing at a venue with a soundman, and you're paying someone else to worry about getting your tone just right, or sitting right in the mix, then yeah, let them do their job!

Hope this helps.This should be higher. I mentioned this in another comment as well, but not in the OP. This is good advice.Oh yes! Dude, if you haven't listened to high-end modeling tech since the '90s, holy crap!

That's seriously like messing with [one of these](http://teatroblog.com/wp-content/uploads/2014/04/Nokia-6.jpg) and concluding that cell phones = bad.

Put on a pair of good headphones and listen to this. Line 6 has spent the last 6 years working on this unit, and it's a totally new type of modeling. All of their modeling is completely redone from scratch with new technology; this is not simply an upgrade from the PODs. This is their top-of-the-line model at a very different price point from their previous units; it's $1500 for the floorboard or $2000 for the rackmount version + controller.

Here are 5 comparisons (A/B) of the Helix versus real amps, with no effects:
http://line6.com/helix/sound.html

Video explaining how the challenge was set up:
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=zdQnrhUb-1M

Here's a short vid with less talking and more sounds:
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=4p7KKDyOY5s

Here's a longer one with more explanation:
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=MBVT0kDO4n4

This is also a fun vid: Pro session guitarists trying out the new Line 6 Helix for the first time
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=NGwj2BeXG_U

Another vid of pro artists trying the Helix unit for the first time. This one has more examples of the clean tones:
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=_q4mld6z8e8"Worth spending 4x more" really depends entirely on your budget and what kinds of complaints you have with your current tone. EQ is not a miracle fix for a *bad* tone; it can only tweak something that's already good. If you have a really crappy $150 practice amp, an EQ pedal is not going to fix it and you should invest in upgrading your amp first.

Personally, I think that it is worth buying decent pedals for the reason that they last longer and they have a better signal-to-noise ratio and a lower noise floor. I don't want to put something in my signal chain that's going to make everything sound worse, or what's the point?

Also,  I tend to look for gear that's manufactured with environmental and labor concerns in mind - I don't want to contribute to slave labor or destroying the planet just so that my guitar can sound a little better, you know? Dunlop is a trustworthy, US-based company with good customer service and they make solid kit that lasts a long time and sounds excellent.

If that's worth the extra money to you, then get the better one.

For what it's worth, there are alternatives. MXR also makes a 6-band EQ for $80 instead of the 10-band for $120. And these are widely available used on sites like Reverb.com as well for even less money, if budget is an issue. If you want to spend even less than that, check out something like a Boss GE-7, which is even easier to find used, and less costly in the first place as well, without being unreliable and noisy.I edited the top post to add a video explaining what compressors do and why they are useful. It's at the very bottom of the OP.Outboard preamps are usually used on acoustic guitars. [This page](http://kksound.com/support/pickups101/preamp.php) does a good job of explaining why you might want one. Many preamps have EQ sections as well. A lot of preamps for acoustic guitar have semi-parametric EQs or 3-band EQs with pots rather than graphic EQs with sliders. A 6 or 10-band graphic EQ, or even a 31-band, along with a preamp will give you even more nuanced tone shaping control and could also be used to filter out frequencies if you're getting feedback problems.

An acoustic guitar will not sound good through an electric guitar amp and EQ tweaking is not really going to fix that. An EQ might improve things but it's not a substitute for an acoustic guitar amp or full-range PA.

If you're having trouble with feedback at high volume, the electronic solution is a feedback suppressor. Most of the ones available on the market are rackmount units, but I think Behringer makes one that's smaller. Really though the best way is to use in-ears instead of a wedge monitor and keep your stage volume down. Yep, and further you should try to get your tone as close to perfect as you can first, and think of EQ as a way to tweak things after that.

Guitar-based tone knobs are usually just passive fixed frequency low-pass filters, unless you have an active EQ built into your guitar (with a 9V battery or whatever). They can cut out high-end response but they're really not a direct replacement for the tweaking you can do with a 6 or 10-band EQ.Yeah. There's no such thing as discount luxury\u2014if you're not paying for it, [someone else is](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Externality#Negative).An EQ pedal isn't a replacement for using the right speakers, but it can help drastically if your issue is a minor one that just needs some tweaking.Tone *is* in the fingers! A lot of people forget that. I was talking about the same thing on [another comment here earlier](https://www.reddit.com/r/Guitar/comments/3s3gkn/rant_mode_engaged_before_you_start_yet_another/cwtwuh2?context=10000).

I used to have an HD500X. They are fantastic. I only sold it to fund the purchase of the newer Line 6 Helix, but it's a really great unit."That" Fender tone could be anything from Dick Dale surf to Stevie Ray Vaughan blues to Eric Clapton hard rock. There's no one Fender tone. A "Fender tone" can be anything from a super bright, clean Twin to a searing Super-Sonic on the "Burn" channel. 

I do think that quite a lot of your tone is in your amp, and a cheap guitar through a great amp will sound a lot better than a great guitar through a cheap amp.

I do think that you learn something of value by teaching yourself all about modding guitars and amps and building up a collection of pedals. It's not a waste of time and money, but it is important to learn how to apply all of that info and remember that the goal is to be the best player you can be. 

If you are not performing or recording, a practice amp is all you need. If you're relatively new to guitar, the bulk of your time, money, and energy should, in my opinion, be going to learning guitar, taking lessons, buying books, etc. That's what's really important, and just about any practice amp will do for that purpose.

If you are performing or recording and you need a higher quality, louder amp, then the right amp for you depends on what kind of music you play and what exact features you need.

If you love the sound of a Deluxe and it's in your budget and it will make you happy, I'm hardly going to try to talk you out of it! But in my opinion, there are too many people who own Deluxe Reverbs who don't know how to play guitar well, and that's backwards. My 2 cents!&gt; Line 6 Spider III video by Fluff

If anyone is curious, this is the video he's talking about.

https://www.ultimate-guitar.com/news/general_music_news/can_you_get_a_killer_metal_tone_from_small_line_6_spider_amp_yes_you_can_heres_the_secret.html

Also, it looks like Glenn was trash-talking a Spider 2, and Fluff was using a Spider 4. The 4 is a newer version that sounds a lot better than the older Spiders. Modeling technology is digital/computer stuff and it improves at a similarly rapid pace to other digital/computer based tech. 10 years is a LONG TIME for computing and the original Spiders came out in 2004.You're entitled to your opinion. Personally I think there are too many guitar collectors and not enough musicians out there. If you're going to call yourself a musician and invest a ton of time and energy and money into guitar, doesn't it make sense to do everything possible to live up to your potential as, you know, a great guitarist? Seems like a no-brainer to me. If you love the instrument, learn to play it the best that you can.

Now, as I said in the OP, if chasing tone *per se* is part of the fun for you, then by all means, don't let me talk you out of it. But in my opinion, if that's what guitar is about for you, then you may consider calling yourself a guitar collector rather than a musician.

I recognize that it's not binary. Do what makes you happy. Guitar is supposed to be fun. It's an instrument. You *play* it, emphasis on "play." My point is simply that if guitar is *frustrating* for you because you don't like your tone, and you're not having fun, then you might be focusing on the wrong thing.LOL! Well an EQ pedal can't fix a *bad* tone. It's useful for tweaking a good tone to make you sit better in the mix, or sound better in the room, or for minor adjustments when switching instruments etc. It's not a miracle cure. You should still strive to get your source tone as close to acoustically ideal as you can, then tweak with EQ from there if/as needed.It already says:

&gt; "I'm certainly not claiming that you can fix everything with EQ'ing. You should get as close to perfect acoustically as possible before applying EQ."

Do you think that's unclear? I can edit if so.Haha, actually, just the other day, I was talking to a pro photographer friend about this! I also do a lot of shooting as well, and I feel the same way about a lot of hobbyist photographers who spend thousands of dollars on fast lenses and yet have never even considered buying a monopod.

I took these shots with a 6 megapixel (not a typo) Canon point-and-shoot which is so old and cheap that I was literally unable to give it away for free on Craigslist when I got a Canon G12 to replace it (I also have a DSLR):

https://c2.staticflickr.com/4/3421/3843090699_dba5569956_b.jpg

https://c1.staticflickr.com/1/66/156872898_6d3622ec2b_o.jpg

https://c1.staticflickr.com/1/58/156291699_0cfd7e86d7_b.jpg

https://c2.staticflickr.com/4/3386/3429401492_22a2518d7e_z.jpgIf you're satisfied with your tone as-is, then great! 

OP was really for those who are frustrated with their tone to the point that it's making playing guitar prohibitively expensive and not fun for them. I hate to think of someone putting hundreds or thousands on a credit card for new pickups or a new guitar or a new amp, when they could probably solve their issue just as well with an EQ pedal and some tweaking to whatever room you're in.Haha! [Not quite](http://billmaudio.com/wp/?page_id=1074), although that would probably look pretty cool along with my Crybaby:

http://i.imgur.com/qLZLBOb.jpg?1No need to apologize for the wall of text - look what you're responding to! ;)

If you are happy with your tone and don't feel like you've ever needed an EQ, than you probably DON'T need an EQ. They are useful for tweaking and fine-tuning your tone. If you like your tone as-is, then no, it's not vital and you don't need to spend any money on one.

I like having one for quick fixes to things like changing guitars, sitting better in a mix, and adjusting to the room I'm in. But if you're in a studio environment, you should leave that up to the engineers, and if you're playing live, it's up to the sound guys anyway. It depends on your application.

I don't think we disagree actually. As I said in my original post:

&gt;"Don't get me wrong. Tone matters. Your tone is your voice and it's important that you get it right... You should get as close to perfect acoustically as possible before applying EQ."

You get 95% of the way there with your hands, the right guitar for you, and the right amp for you. If, like many players, the other 5% feels like it's beyond the limits of what can practically be accomplished, *then* try an EQ pedal, before you rip apart your rig with expensive, invasive mods like switching pickups, tubes, or speakers.Generally speaking, an EQ pedal works best when it's the last thing in your signal chain before you hit the front of the amp, especially if you want to use it as a selective, footswitchable boost, say for mid frequencies to cut through during a solo, or to drive your preamp tubes a little more. Because it can boost frequencies, it can also overdrive other pedals in undesirable ways, which is why you put it last.

Feel free to try it in the effects loop, of course, but in my experience that's not the ideal place for it.As others have pointed out in this thread, you can also use it to make the same guitar sound like two different guitars. For example, if you're using a looper, you can lay down a rhythm part with your EQ settings one way, and then lay over another rhythm part with your EQ settings another way, to get a totally different tone. Then, switch pickups and play lead over that.I didn't say EQ is a miracle cure-all and I hope I didn't imply that. If you have put in the time and effort and money to get to the point where you're 95% satisfied with your tone and you've gotten it as close to perfect (acoustically) as possible, *and* you are tearing your hair out over that last 5%... I'm saying, don't spend thousands of dollars ripping apart your rig before you try an EQ. And if that doesn't solve your problem, quit worrying about it and focus on your chops!Most people who use EQ pedals put them immediately before the front input on their amp (last pedal on their board), not in the effects loop.

If you're using a processor, you can try it both ways and just see which you like better. Do you use the preamp section on your amp at all, or do you just use the processor as your preamp and bypass the amp's preamp? In other words, do you put your guitar's output into the processor's guitar input (when it's plugged into the effects loop, using a grand total of 2 cables), or do you plug your guitar directly into the front of the amp, and then run your processor with two more cables through the effects loop (for a grand total of three cables)?

I used to have a Line 6 HD500X processor, which I put in front of my amp, and I shut off the amp and cab modeling since I was using the amp's preamp.

There's really no right or wrong answer here. There are suggested ways to hook it up and alternative ways to do it. Do whatever sounds best to you.

If you're using amp modeling, you'll probably want to avoid doubling up on preamps by turning off the amp modeling if you're going into the front of the amp, OR if you're going into the effects loop, plugging your guitar directly into the processor and then plugging the processor into the power amp in (effects return) on the back of your amp.Frankly songwriting ability and skill are so much more important than tone.

I mean, if tone were the most important thing, we would NEVER listen to old Beatles records, right? Modern digital studios, even home studios, put out much cleaner recordings with signal-to-noise ratios and clarity *vastly* superior to anything recorded 50 years ago.

Yet if I'm offered the choice between listening to a random modern home studio recording of some hobbyist versus a recording by the Beatles, I'd rather listen to the Beatles, because I *like* the Beatles.

Tone isn't everything.Please do! Would love to hear differing opinions.Interesting; I've had the opposite experience. There are many players whose tone I actively dislike and it turns me off from their music, e.g. all Metallica guitars before Bob Rock started producing them in 1990, a lot of Steve Vai's stuff from the '80s (even though he is a MONSTER player and I do like quite a few of his actual songs), etc... Actually pretty much anything shriek-y and with the mids scooped out.In that case I think it's totally fine to put it in the effects loop. You can try it in front of your amp and see if you like it better but you're putting it where I would put it.Actually I don't think we're disagreeing here at all... see my comment from 4 hours before yours ;)

https://www.reddit.com/r/Guitar/comments/3s3gkn/rant_mode_engaged_before_you_start_yet_another/cwu22dd/u/dand gets it.Exactly.I recommend a used Boss 7-band. There are a number of them on Reverb.com right now:

https://reverb.com/marketplace?condition=used&amp;query=boss+ge-7Go to a store and try one out. If you like it, take it home. If it's not for you, no harm done. I find it's best for subtle fixes, like tweaking my rig to a particular room, or adjusting where I set in the mix, especially for solos and so on.The center frequencies and bandwidth of your standard 3-band tone stack on a guitar amp are different for every brand and kind of amplifier. I really can't tell you what your amp's knobs do exactly, although the manufacturer likely has that info if you email them.

Your ears are your best guide! Also check out Dave Hunter's book "The Guitar Amp Handbook" for more info about how amps work.eh... no amount of EQ tweaking is going to make a Gretsch with TV Jones PowerTrons sound like a Les Paul with PAFs. EQ might get you closer but those are very different guitar tones.Oh, he's just talking about unity during guitar changes. That's a common use for EQs - tone shaping and level adjustment. I talked about this in my original post, how to fake a humbucker sound with single coils and vice versa using EQ. But it's not like a Tele is going to sound like a Les Paul just because you apply an EQ curve to it, not even remotely!

You want the output level of different guitars to match, and if you want more consistency between guitar changes, you can analyze and adjust for that as he talks about in the video, but if they were really going for the exact same tone from song to song, they would use R9s, I imagine.Lucky for you, I'm also a bassist!

The same caveats apply - YMMV depending on your mix and exact gear. None of this is hard &amp; fast. Experiment. There are no wrong answers and engineers/producers vary considerably in what they consider an ideal mix. As I said, EQ can't fix everything and your first approach should be getting it right acoustically, but these types of fixes can help a "good-but-not-great" tone sound excellent.

- 60-80 Hz is where "thud" lives. Too little here and you lose fundamentals. Too much here sounds boomy.

- 700 Hz to 1k is where "attack" lives. Too little here and your tone sounds muffled. Too much here and you go from punchy to throaty.

- 800 Hz is, in my opinion, the most important frequency for electric bass guitar, but this will vary depending on your mix and rig. Cut is generally preferred to boost across the board when EQ'ing, but I *always* boost here. 800 Hz makes a bass guitar "punchy."

- 2.5 kHz is where string noise lives, but it's also where slap bass shines. If you play slap, try boosting here for real "oomph" and a "sticky" quality.

- 4 kHz is where "presence" lives. You can make a bass guitar sound breathy or "shiny" here.

I don't tend to do much with EQ above that. Leave it to the engineer otherwise. And remember, all of these are rough guidelines for *tweaking,* not for setting your initial tone.Yep! As I said in several comments throughout this thread, EQ is for tweaking, to get that last 5% of the way to your ideal tone. But you need to get 95% of the way there with your normal rig first, and adjust beyond that with EQ as/if needed.Grabbed the string with your right hand, where?Happy to help. Just keep in mind, like I said, that these depend greatly on your rig, your mix, and your individual tastes. I hate you.

Just kidding that's awesome.

You suck though.I don't think we're disagreeing here actually! From my original post:

&gt;"You should get as close to perfect acoustically as possible before applying EQ."

From several other comments I've posted in this thread:

&gt;"If you are happy with your tone and don't feel like you've ever needed an EQ, than you probably DON'T need an EQ. They are useful for tweaking and fine-tuning your tone. If you like your tone as-is, then no, it's not vital and you don't need to spend any money on one."


&gt;"You get 95% of the way there with your hands, the right guitar for you, and the right amp for you. If, like many players, the other 5% feels like it's beyond the limits of what can practically be accomplished, then try an EQ pedal, before you rip apart your rig with expensive, invasive mods like switching pickups, tubes, or speakers."


&gt;"EQ can't fix bad tone. It can only improve good tone if it needs a little tweaking. It's important to get your tone correct from the source first, and then tweak with EQ, as needed. To get your as close to ideal from the source, you need to get your signal chain right first. Then add EQ if necessary after that."


&gt;"Well an EQ pedal can't fix a *bad* tone. It's useful for tweaking a good tone to make you sit better in the mix, or sound better in the room, or for minor adjustments when switching instruments etc. It's not a miracle cure. You should still strive to get your source tone as close to acoustically ideal as you can, then tweak with EQ from there if/as needed."


&gt;"An EQ pedal isn't a replacement for using the right speakers, but it can help drastically if your issue is a minor one that just needs some tweaking."


&gt;"I don't tend to do much with EQ above that. Leave it to the engineer otherwise. And remember, all of these are rough guidelines for *tweaking,* not for setting your initial tone."


&gt;"Go to a store and try one out. If you like it, take it home. If it's not for you, no harm done. I find it's best for subtle fixes, like tweaking my rig to a particular room, or adjusting where I set in the mix, especially for solos and so on."


&gt;"EQ is for tweaking, to get that last 5% of the way to your ideal tone. But you need to get 95% of the way there with your normal rig first, and adjust beyond that with EQ as/if needed."


etc.If the humbuckers are splittable, that would be perfect for you. If not, it won't do the Jimi and SRV thing quite as accurately, but will still be versatile and cover all the sounds you listed quite well. Jimi occasionally used humbuckers as well, for example when he played a Flying V. It's just as much (or more) about the amp, effects, and technique you're using. Pickups make a difference but it's a bit less of the equation that amp &amp; technique.Just to be clear, price points on basses and guitars are pretty different. I'm also a bassist and you really need to spend about $2k before you start getting into great basses. That's not True on guitar. A $1000 guitar is not a student model guitar by *any* stretch; many pros use guitars at that price point. For guitar (not bass), $3k is not pro level; it's boutique/custom shop level. My #1 bass was just over $3k but my #1  guitar was about half of that. Both are handmade custom instruments from 1-man shops; it's just that guitars simply cost less.

You're going to have a difficult time finding a guitar with active single coils stock. That's a very rare feature. Although on bass, most modern instruments have a built-in preamp, with guitar, pretty much only guitars designed for heavy metal have active pickups (there are exceptions, but they're rare). None of the artists you mentioned use active pickups.

For RHCP and Hendrix, a passive single coil Strat is what you want. Despite his iconic Les Paul, Jimmy Page actually recorded a lot with a Telecaster, which sounds pretty similar to a Strat, except that a Tele has a bit more twang and less spank, but a lot of that is technique as well.

Keep in mind that your amp will have a huge effect on your sound. It's about half the equation if not more, so make sure to leave room in your budget for the right amp. If I had $3k to spend on a rig, and I was going for a Hendrix/RHCP sound, only about $1200 of it would go to the guitar. I'd spend about $1500 on the amp and the rest on pedals.

Is your budget of $3k just for the guitar or do you need an amp and pedals too?Yep! I didn't think anybody would know what I was talking about if I called it that, haha. I've developed a workaround of bending both strings, one much more than the other, in order to play those licks. I should get a Tele.No, your bass amp not work well for guitar, although it won't harm it. Really though, my gut is saying that if you are at the point where you're not sure if a bass amp will work for guitar, you're not ready to spend $1500 on a guitar amp. There are just so many personal preferences that go into what amp is right for you that I wouldn't feel right recommending that you go out and buy a pro level one if you're that new to the instrument. Your tastes will evolve and you will almost certainly wish you'd bought something else in a year or so.

If you insist on spending $3k now, please at least buy used, so that as your preferences develop and you have a better idea of what you want, you can at least get back most of what you paid when you're ready to buy what you really want.

I can tell you what *I* would buy if I were going for a Hendrix/RHCP sound and my budget was $3k, but really, it's different for every player, and I hope you take that advice to heart.

That said, what amp is right for you depends greatly on your application. Will you be using this for a loud stage, rehearsals/jam sessions/small gigs, bedroom level practice, silent practice at home with headphones, silent recording straight into your computer...? If I know what you're planning to do with it I can give you a better recommendation.Oh, okay, haha.

I would still not recommend that you spend a ton yet just because your tastes *will* change. When I started playing guitar I wanted a Strat just like Stevie Ray Vaughan. Fast forward about 20 years and my main guitar is an all-mahogany, chambered, set-neck, dual-humbucker guitar with a flamed maple top that's more like a PRS. If I'd had unlimited money to spend when I was 16, I probably would have wanted a sunburst early '60s Strat. Now, I wouldn't play one as my main guitar if it were free.

For bedroom practice/silent practice with headphones, I highly recommend the Line 6 Spider IV 75w 1x12. I know that's not what you want to hear, but they really are amazing for that application. They are light, small, inexpensive ($300) and have a built-in tuner, built-in effects like delay and chorus and reverb and so on, and a built-in headphone jack. If you want to get into computer recording, you can use them as an interface, too, without spending more on a microphone or worrying about mic technique or isolation. They can give you a variety of tones from a Marshall Plexi like Hendrix and Green Day use, all the way to a Twin Reverb sound that John Frusciante uses.  

I would stick with that for about a year or two until you have a really good idea of what kind of amp you want, and until you're ready to perform and need something bigger and louder. You're not going to find anything more versatile than a Line 6 at any price point.

For the guitar, if you want a maple fretboard, and are a Hendrix fan, this is a good choice:

http://www.guitarcenter.com/Fender/Jimi-Hendrix-Stratocaster-Olympic-White-Maple-Fingerboard-1437751895431.gc

It has American Vintage pickups that are voiced for a late '60s tone, a reverse-angle bridge pickup for a more Hendrix tone, a 5-way pickup switch, and looks pretty cool. Normally I would not recommend this model because it's basically a Mexican Strat that has a few gimmicky features and costs $300 more for no good reason, but if you know you like a Hendrix vibe, it's got that going for it in spades. These just came out, so they will be hard to find used, and the resale value will not be as good if you want to sell it later, just FYI.

If you want an American made guitar that's a little better built, and doesn't have a price premium for the name on the headstock, I recommend buying a used guitar, and not a Fender. There are a lot of great options out there but again I'm hesitant to recommend one because there *are* so many options and you really don't know what you want yet.

If you *know* you want something well made and that's important to you, it's hard to go wrong with something like an Anderson or a Suhr, which are both basically just boutique Fenders. You can find a used Suhr Classic Pro for about $1700 or an Anderson Classic for a little bit more than that. They are both about on par with Fender Custom Shop Team Built guitars, just for half the price, and if you buy used, you shouldn't have much trouble selling them for about what you paid (maybe a little less) in a year or two if you change your mind about what kind of body shape, pickup configuration, etc you want.There are no rules - music is all about experimentation - but there are definitely some guidelines that help with finding a great starting place.

Robert Keeley of Keeley pedals recommends this mnemonic: "Which chain of effects pedals makes life easier?"

(Wah, compressor, overdrive, EQ, pitch, modulation, level, echo)
What don't you like about the stock pickups?Instead of varying the thickness of your pick, which doesn't have a ton of real world application, you might consider varying between playing with a pick, playing fingerstyle, and hybrid picking.The grammar in this survey was poor and distracting. For several of the questions, I wasn't even sure what you were trying to ask.If you haven't already memorized the chromatic scale notes for each string, you need to do that, too. For example, on the first string, E, F, F#, G, G#, A....

Eventually you will get to the point that you stop thinking in scales and modes and just play by what sounds good. I never actually think about scales when I'm playing. I can tell you if you ask what scale degree I'm playing or what chord I'm outlining or whatever but that's not where my mind is.

It's like speaking. I can tell you that the first sentence in this paragraph is a simile, and that the subject of this clause is the noun "subject." But I'm not thinking about grammar when I'm talking to you. I'm just saying what I have to say.

Part of getting to that point, though, is knowing every note on the fretboard. There are only 12 of them (and their enharmonic spellings). There are only 7 modes, etc. Just learn them. Then forget them and play!I highly recommend the Fender Modern Player Telecaster.

It has 3 pickups, including a splittable bridge humbucker. You can combine the neck and middle pickups for a humbucker tone, or use them independently for a bluesy single coil sound. The 22 fret neck with a relatively flat fretboard, thinner profile, and bigger frets is very fast for rock, but it can still do a great Mike Stern/Bill Frisell jazz rhythm tone, too. And the honey burst finish is very pretty!

$399 new or cheaper used. They make a chambered F-hole version with P90s too if that's more your thing.

http://i.imgur.com/RuFIFDa.jpgGood to hear!What kind of effect are we talking about?

Favorite drive (at the moment): JHS Sweet Tea

Tremolo: Diamond

Fuzz: Zvex Fuzz Factory or Wampler Velvet Fuzz

Reverb: TC Electronic Hall of Fame

Wah: Dunlop Joe Bonamassa

Compressor: Keeley 4-knob

Tuner: Sonic Research

EQ: MXR 10-bandThere is no quality difference between a combo or head+cab. Many amp manufacturers offer a variety of models in either configuration depending on customer preference.

The advantage of a combo is that it's all-in-one and easier to carry and a bit lighter. You only need one road case. You can use an amp stand without your head falling off.

The advantage of a head+cab is that you can mix and match different cabs (loaded with different loudspeakers) to get different tones or achieve different volume levels. For example, you might have a 4x12 you use live and a 1x10 you use for rehearsals or in the studio, all with the same head.On a standard guitar, the intonation will be off if you tune to a different baseline. If you want to try it, make sure you set up your guitar for it; don't just recalibrate your tuner and retune the open strings.Lady but okay! :PIf weight is an issue, just use a dolly. This one is collapsible and holds up to 100 lbs:

http://m.uline.com/h5/r/www.uline.com/Product/Detail/H-1787/Hand-Trucks/Folding-Hand-Truck-100-lb-Load-CapacityI have a Fender 85 as well. Just wanted to say that despite owning about $12k of decent tube amps, I still reach for the 85 on occasion for jazz gigs because it is light, loud, has built-in reverb, and gets the job done. Sure. There are countless songs where one guitar is playing slide in an open tuning and the other is playing in standard, or where a rhythm guitarist is playing a downtuned guitar and a lead guitarist is playing in standard, or where one guitarist is using a baritone and the other isn't, etc. 

My main recording guitar has a thumbwheel that lets me change the tuning electronically instantly. I can change tuning in middle of a song if I want, say for a bridge, or an intro, or a slide solo, etc.Just to double check that you're aware, many nylon string guitars have side inlays, even if they don't have them on the fingerboard.

Carvin will make you whatever you want for relatively cheap if you're looking for a custom guitar.

Godin is another possibility.What on earth do you mean, the frequency that resonates with the physics of the universe? Sounds like textbook pseudoscience to me. What are you referring to?I'm not super picky. I like flatter fretboards; my background is in classical guitar (classicals have completely flat fretboards). My favorite electric radius is probably on my Parker, which is compound 10-15".I have a big guitar collection, including multiple vintage and custom instruments, and I actually rent them out to recording studios/producers/session players.

There are a few that I don't rent out because they are extremely rare and special to me, but for the most part, I have no problem with other ~~people~~ musicians playing them. They're wood and metal. With few exceptions, there's not much someone can do to them that can't be fixed by a skilled repair tech.

Edit: Musicians are welcome to play my guitars. Children and non-musicians, sorry.Guitar is actually not my first instrument (I already played piano, violin, clarinet, and sax when I started guitar). 

As long as you know your theory, transitioning to a new instrument is actually pretty simple. That's *simple,* not *easy.* You will need to practice a lot to get up to the same level of proficiency that you're used to, but as long as you have a good ear, good knowledge of theory, and good fine-motor control and dexterity, it's really just about how hard you're willing to work for it and how much practice you're willing to put in.Why is it so hard to get my students to practice with a metronome??

This is the #1 thing you should be doing for at-home, alone-practice time as far as learning scales/modes, picking technique, etc.There was a similar thread here recently. Might help you out:

https://www.reddit.com/r/Guitar/comments/3uu805/gear_help/

Edit: Just saw that you are the same person, hahaLine 6 JTV-69. Here are some pics of the tuning thumbwheel:

http://i.imgur.com/40Wo1Ix.jpg

http://i.imgur.com/18BUbwW.jpg

http://i.imgur.com/tpDB5ty.jpg

It has 11 settings total, even though I only showed 9 of them in the pics. The other two are a "mode" one that you can program to whatever you want (each string is programmable up to an octave in either direction), and the last one is a full step down (whole thing tuned 2 frets down). I currently have the custom one programmed to an octave down for the low E and the A strings, and standard tuning for the other 4 strings. It's great for fingerpicked solo jazz and solo acoustic stuff; it sounds like you're playing with a bassist even though you're not. You can actually program 5 custom ones using the pickup selector switch (see video link below) while on this setting.

In addition to normal magnetic pickups with a 1/4" output, it has a totally independent piezo pickup in the saddles with an RJ45 digital output jack. The digital electronics use 6 individual piezo pickups in the bridge, one for each string, and from there, the guitar uses modeling technology to simulate the sound of magnetic pickups on various famous guitars like a Les Paul, Tele, or Strat (or acoustic instruments like regular acoustic guitars, 12-string guitars, banjos, resonators, etc). Then, it sends the modeled signal out to the amp in the specified altered/drop tuning. Here's an example; watch to the very end to see something really cool:

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ngaBmMd8aqA

And, here's how you program the custom tunings &amp; guitar models:

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=5XkVEDmU_S0FYI, YouTube has this feature built-in. If you can find the track on YouTube, click on the little gear wheel at the bottom right of the frame. You can choose various speeds from there.Yep. Excellent point about the role that instrument plays in music.

For example, a non-musician might think it would be relatively easy for a guitarist to pick up bass or vice-versa, but they fill completely different niches musically, and you can always tell a bassist who's messing around on guitar, or a guitarist who's filling in on bass, not only because bassists tend to dig in a lot more and guitarists tend to be more gentle, but because guitarists play too many notes and bassists don't play chords ;)

Seriously though, if you are going from one melody instrument to another melody instrument, it's easier than going from a bass instrument to a melody instrument etc. Learning drums is quite different from learning guitar, etc. But it's really all about practice no matter what instrument you're talking about. Having good ears and developing your musical sense, and having knowledge of theory, will speed up the learning process\u2014but at the end of the day, it comes down to how hard you're willing to work and how many hours you're willing to put in.Your Mustang is *better* for your apartment. The Blues Jr is a great little gigging amp, but with a fairly efficient 12" speaker and a 15 watt rating, like all tube amps, it doesn't do the low-volume thing very well, and it doesn't have a headphone jack or built-in effects (except reverb). I love my Blues Jr but if I lived in an apartment, I would never use it.

Edited to add:

The used market for Blues Jrs is *huge.* They are popular for modding. For the same price, you can easily find one with an upgraded speaker, upgraded tubes, upgraded transformers, etc. They are really not worth buying new in my opinion. I paid $550 for mine, barely more than a new one, and it came with an upgraded speaker, upgraded tubes, upgraded input &amp; output transformers, new caps, a jewel light instead of an LED, a sparkle knob with push/pull bypass, a presence knob with push/pull bypass, a 3-way switch (on/standby/off), Switchcraft jacks, an octal conversion to run 6L6s at 30 watts instead of EL84s at 15 watts, and several other upgrades. That's an organ (Jon Lord playing), but if you want that sound from your guitar, consider an Electro-Harmonix B9 Organ Machine. They track even better with a compressor in front:

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=98u-MDTKAWUSure you can. There's a 1/4" jack for the main speaker; you'd just run the attenuator between that and the speaker, same as any other combo. There are a total of three jacks on the Blues Jr: The main speaker jack is right next to the jack for the "Fat" footswitch and the jack for the auxiliary 8 ohm cab output.The tweed version has a closely woven textured cloth wrap and a 12" Jensen C12N loudspeaker.

The regular one has a water-resistant vinyl wrap and a 12" Fender "Lightning Bolt" speaker by Eminence.http://billmaudio.com/wp/?page_id=295Friends asked me to show them stuff, eventually I started getting requests from friends-of-friends who I didn't know well enough to offer free lessons, so I started charging. A year later a guitar store I frequented was seeking a new teacher, so I applied. Or... shocker... search r/guitar first ;)

Every week there's a new thread titled "I have $400 - recommend me an acoustic guitar?"

I literally have my response to that one saved as a text file so I can just copy &amp; paste.

If you're asking for people's opinions, I can definitely understand starting a thread about it. Subjective opinions are just that. But if you're asking about specs, or any kind of "how to" question, at least check Google or the manufacturer's website first!If you don't like reddit's search function, you can use Google and restrict results to reddit. For example, if you google this:

    site:reddit.com guitar ask jeeves

it returns this thread as the #1 result.The C9 is technically newer, but it's not more advanced that the B9. It offers different organ models than the ones in the B9. There are legit physical reasons (acoustic physics I mean) for playing single notes in the bass frequency range, rather than chords, though. When you play 3 or more notes simultaneously and they are very low notes, the long wavelengths interact with each other in ways that our ears have trouble separating out. The result is a huge muddy mess and inarticulate chord qualities.

Ideally you want to spread out your voicings. On a piano, this is easy - you can just play the root and maybe a perfect fifth above with your left hand, and do the third and seventh and 9th or whatever with your right hand. But on bass, if you try to do, say, an E minor with a flat seventh and an added 9th, it will just sound like a jumble of notes.

When you're voice leading on bass, generally instead of playing chords, you choose the most important note and play that. So for example, if you're doing a walking line, you might start on the root, but then when the guitar goes to the IV chord, you might play the flat seventh of the IV chord instead of the root, to imply a major-minor 7th without actually sounding the whole chord, so it doesn't get muddy.I've never heard of them, sorry!

My background is in jazz.Jazz doesn't exactly have a hoity-toity reputation. As a genre, it was pioneered by people with zero musical training, although the people who study it tend to approach it more formally nowadays.I play a lot of jazz, and I use bass amps for that, too. They are fantastic for acoustic guitars and jazz guitars. Aside from my guitar amps, I also use a Markbass MicroMark 801 solid state 50-watt 1x8 amp, a Markbass LittleMark II head and Schroeder 1210L cab, and a Crown K2 power amp that I use with an outboard preamp and a Schroeder 21012L cab. That's not a secret weapon; that's like 400 of them! ;)'58 Strat, handmade Ed Schaefer carved archtop (he's retired now), '64 Gibson ES-345. They're all insured but irreplaceable or very hard to replace.Well lend and rent aren't synonymous. If someone wanted to pay me $1000/day I'd say sure, but that's not exactly market rate!Ah, the Fab Tone! That was my first ever pedal like 20 years ago (I've never been much of a pedal user).

My next pedal was a Crybaby and then I think my third one was a Daddy-O. I still have the Daddy-O actually.

Here's 10 of my current 12 drive pedals:

http://i.imgur.com/LQqOo0G.jpgI mean, where to start?

Christopher Parkening, Robert Bluestone, Andres Segovia, Paco de Lucia, Carlos Santana, Rodrigo y Gabriela, the list goes on.I should get another Fab Tone. Those were a blast. Despite owning a lot of pedals I rarely actually use them. Really the only pedals I use anymore are a bit of compression and EQ, and some drive and maybe some tremolo. That's really about all. Here's my current setup:

http://i.imgur.com/QorWtvW.jpg

I'm having a custom pedalboard made for me at the moment. My guy is just waiting for me to decide if I want to include the volume pedal, the wah, the Soul Food, and the Wampler Velvet Fuzz, or if I want to leave those out and just go with the tuner, the compressor, the EQ, the JHS Sweet Tea, and the Diamond Trem. I almost never use the fuzz, the wah, and the volume.There are entire degree programs in it, lol. You can get a PhD in music theory if you want.

For a classical approach, Kostka &amp; Payne's "Tonal Harmony" is the textbook used by many high school music theory teachers.

If you go to Berklee College of Music and take Music Theory 101, this is the textbook you'll be using:
http://www.amazon.com/Berklee-Music-Theory-Book-Edition/dp/0876391102

There's also a Book 2.

For a bit of an easier approach, here's Music Theory for Dummies:
http://www.amazon.com/Music-Theory-For-Dummies-Audio/dp/1118095502A Marshall Class 5 is a 5-watt amp. Your Blackstar is a 1-watt amp. If you can't crank it up, and you don't use pedals, you are going to get a lot more gain at the same volume from your Blackstar, assuming relatively the same loudspeaker efficiency and the same speaker size, than you would from the Marshall.

But in actuality, your Blackstar will get even more gain than that at the same volume, since your Blackstar is a 1x8 and the Marshall is a 1x10.

The Marshall will get a bit more low-end response from the 10" speaker, but it's not a huge step up in terms of sound quality or anything.

I would not listen to this guy. A Class 5 is not really a serious upgrade to what you have now and will probably be too loud for your bedroom. What you have is great.

If you want something with much better sound quality than what you have, and you are truly a bedroom musician who does not perform, *and* you are prohibited from being really loud, *and* you play a variety of music from metal to jazz, you might consider something like a Line 6 HD500X or a Line 6 Helix, or a Fractal preamp, plus a pair of powered near-field monitors like some JBLs or Mackies etc.What kind of music do you play and who are some guitarists whose tone you like?

If you can name some specific songs with a tone you like, we can help you recreate that sound.

Some more info will help us give you better advice. What are you going to be using it for?

Are you going to be using this for performing (big stages or small?) or just for playing in your bedroom by yourself? Are you going to be using this for jamming with others and/or for rehearsal? Do you need to be able to practice silently with headphones? Do you need to be able to record directly to your computer? Do you need built-in effects and a built-in tuner? Do you need to be able to play at low volume, even if you're not using headphones?Okay, cool.

Most amps in that price range will be combos (the amp and the speaker are both in one enclosure) so you won't need to budget separately for an amp head and a cabinet. That will also save you a little bit of cash on a speaker cable, and you won't have to worry about impedance matching or anything.

The two main types of amps are solid-state amps and amps that use vacuum tubes. The upside of tube amps is that, generally speaking, they sound better. The downsides are that they cost more, they are heavier, they are louder and cannot really be used quietly very well, and they generally don't come with as many features (for example, usually you can't use them with headphones, they don't come with built-in effects or a built-in tuner, they don't come with the capability of direct computer recording, etc). Tube amps also, generally speaking, only really make one type of sound, and they can do it loud or louder, whereas solid state amps can often do a variety of sounds.

At your budget, normally I would recommend a solid-state amp, but if you don't need to play quietly or with headphones, then a tube amp might be better for you, even if it's a cheaper one. 

My first piece of advice is to buy used. You will get twice as much for your money. Just be on the lookout for things that may need replacement soon, such as tubes and loudspeakers. Generally though, a tube amp will last a number of years without heavy maintenance if it's used properly and taken care of.

My top recommendation for you is this:

http://www.andertons.co.uk/combo-amps/pid19293/cid691/blackstar-ht1r-1w-1x8-tube-guitar-amp-with-reverb.asp

It's a 1-watt 1x8 tube amp with Blackstar's signature "ISF" (infinite shape feature) knob, which allows you to adjust the tone from a more Fender-type tone to a more Marshall-type tone. This is ideal for getting different types of sounds even though you're using a tube amp, which normally can't do that. Since it's 1 watt, you'll get a decent amount of tube grit even at bedroom volume, but it can still get loud enough to jam with friends. If you need to get louder than that, say for playing a small or large club, you can easily plug in an extension cab or mic it up.

It's right at 200 pounds or slightly cheaper used. They are popular amps and you shouldn't have trouble finding one on the used market.

Unlike most tube amps, this particular one also has a cab-simulated direct out if you later want to start using your computer for recording or as a learning tool, and it has an aux input if you want to play along to MP3s for ear training or jamming. Unlike most tube amps, it also has a headphone jack if you do decide you want to use it for silent practice. And, it has digital reverb.

If you want something with more power, this is the 5-watt version. It has channel switching and a 12" speaker and is much better suited to playing live on stage in addition to being a bedroom amp (the 1-watt version, as a 1x8, will have trouble keeping up with a drummer). It's 349 pounds but you may be able to find one used within your budget:

http://www.andertons.co.uk/combo-amps/pid20685/cid691/blackstar-ht5r-5w-1x12-tube-guitar-amplifier.asp

Having two channels is a really great feature because you can use a footswitch to go back and forth between a clean sound and a driven sound depending on what part of the song you're in or what you're playing. You can also do this on the cheaper one but you'll have to purchase a separate drive pedal, and finding the right one for you can be a challenge (although for many people, it's a fun one). 

Hope this helps.###SLIDE GUITAR

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=N65cP52NC8s

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=sJ3IVTPPPLw

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ezPZxfS1jys

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=f56_Eg4i89cIf you don't know how to sightread, this is a good time to get good at that. Pack a metronome and a replacement AA battery or two and you're set for 6 months no problem. For books, try:

Jay Weik's Daily Sight-Reading Studies for the Guitarist, Large Print Edition:
http://www.amazon.com/Daily-Guitar-Reading-Technique-Studies/dp/0786682809

Make sure you get the large-print edition, because the "normal" edition is actually a pocket-sized "Quick Guide" that is tiny.

This has 30 daily studies that will have you sight reading full chords in 1 month if you work on it every day. 

Another great resource for sight reading is this one from Berklee:
http://www.amazon.com/Reading-Studies-Guitar-Positions-Multi-Position/dp/0634013351

I also recommend a theory book, for example Berklee's Music Theory 101 books 1 &amp; 2 as used at Berklee College of Music:
http://www.amazon.com/Berklee-Music-Theory-Book-Edition/dp/0876391102

Get these, a Real Book for jazz standards, and some note-for-note transcriptions of albums you want to learn for the metal stuff. Books are available for lots of major label albums if you search for them. Make sure you use a metronome to practice. You don't need anything fancy; something like this will work just fine:

http://www.amazon.com/Qwiktime-QT3-Qwik-Time-Metronome/dp/B0002F75EM/ref=zg_bs_11965901_9

Hope this helps! Have fun.No offense intended but a Crate Palomino is not a boutique amp by any stretch. Even their all-tube flagship amps are mass produced in China. Their slogan is "The Best Value in Professional Tone." They are self-admittedly not a boutique amp company. Not that there's anything wrong with that, at all, but Crates are budget amps, not boutique amps.Yeah I was really hesitant not to recommend some stuff for ear training, which is just as important as theory and sight reading, but with limited access to electricity I decided to leave it out. Good point though.In case anyone else is reading this, NEVER EVER use the speaker output from your amp to run into your computer. You will fry both your amp and your computer.

If you have a cab-simulated direct out or a headphone out, there are ways to connect it to your computer. But never connect a speaker out (a connection that is expecting a load) to a line-level input.A... stompbox? You mean like a foot drum?Are you American?

In guitar parlance, as far as I know, a stompbox is a synonym for a guitar pedal (like a Tube Screamer etc).Yes; in America we have two kinds of guitar pedals: stompboxes that you turn on and off by stepping on them, and expression pedals, like wah and volume pedals.TIL!Well, basic doesn't mean anything formally.

There are seven modes, so if someone says learn your basic scales and modes, they likely just mean your major &amp; relative minor scales, your modes, and maybe your major and minor pentatonics. There are some other scales that are useful for blues and jazz like the melodic and harmonic minor scales and whole tone scales etc but if you know the basic diatonic scales and pentatonic scales that's really all you need.Those pickups are not exactly niche. I've used them for everything from funk to speed metal to jazz (I had them in a neck-through, all koa Carvin).

I would suggest trying an EQ pedal before changing pickups:

https://www.reddit.com/r/Guitar/comments/3s3gkn/rant_mode_engaged_before_you_start_yet_another/Sure. Lots of musicians do this. I use three amps live:

http://i.imgur.com/GftvU3r.jpg

The one on the left is a single channel dirty amp. The center one is a single channel clean amp, and the one on the right is a dual channel backup.

Eric Johnson is another example of someone who uses a multi-amp setup for rhythm and lead. He uses Fenders for his clean sound and Marshalls for his lead sound.

There are countless others.Guitarists are quick -- too quick, usually -- to want to rip out the stock pickups in their guitars. Those pickups were chosen by the manufacturer out of hundreds of available options to be a good fit for that instrument. Unless you are playing a style of music that's very different from the genre usually used with the type of guitar you're playing, or you have a really specific, unusual tone that you're going for, you rarely *need* to change pickups. Most of your tone comes from your amp and amp settings and your technique. Unless you can pinpoint exactly what you dislike about the stock pickups, and unless it's a major problem that you tried and failed to solve with an adjustment to your amp settings or with an EQ pedal, you're probably fine with stock pickups.

A hollow Les Paul comes with pickups that are great for jazz, reggae, and R&amp;B. What do you dislike about them? (Are you sure it's the pickups?) The more specific you are with exactly what you don't like, the more we can help.I have one of their little Purple Wind amps. It's a fun little toy for the studio to get a totally different tone for layering, or as a tiny, cheap backup amp for playing live, if shit hits the fan and it's either your Hotone or you end the show early. They are small enough to throw in your mic case or gear bag and do the trick if you need them.Every guitar store sells them. They are cheap. If you want them to match, either buy a temporary cheap one to use until the matching one arrives, or buy a full set at the store. Don't use a broken one.American here. I think of an "effect pedal" as a specific category of stompbox that does some kind of modulation or colored effect, for example a delay or a fuzz, and that doesn't use real time expression - it's on or off. Effects can also come in rackmount form, but then I'd call them "outboard effects" as opposed to "effects pedals."

I would not count a boost or EQ in with "effects pedals," nor wah or volume pedals, which I would label expression pedals. Boost, EQ, etc I would just call stompboxes. "Guitar pedal" is the umbrella term for anything you plug your guitar into and control with your foot, with switchers perhaps as the only exception.Assuming your head is single channel (nearly all are - I don't mean clean and drive, I mean that it has one power section, mono not stereo), if it's labeled with a range, that usually means it will detect the impedance of the cab and automatically adjust to within that range. Some amps have different output jacks for different impedances, or a switch, but a lot of modern amps just do it automatically.

If you are only hooking up one cab with a single speaker, it's pretty simple: if it says 8 ohms on the amp and your cab says 8 ohms, just use a speaker cable (not a guitar patch cable) and you're most likely good. It gets tricky when you're hooking up multiple cabs or using very high power heads through low-rated speakers. Basically, when you hook up more loudspeakers, for example two 8 ohm cabs, you're now running at 4 ohms. The way the power is distributed depends on how they are wired, but basically, just make sure all your cabs are the same impedance; amps don't like it when you mix 'n match.

As for the power handling, it's a bit complicated but basically you want a speaker that can handle the continuous output allowing for some degree of distortion, which is actually preferred for guitar amps (unlike PA or hi-fi setups). If your speaker is rated for 60 watts and you're using a 20-watt head you have nothing to worry about.If they're wired in parallel, right. Here's more info:

https://www.tubesandmore.com/tech_corner/guitar_speaker_power_handlingThe "blues" scale is really just the minor pentatonic scale with some accidentals (tritone specifically), and you can also add some chromatic stuff for flavor like the major 6th or the major 3rd or the major 2nd or the major 7th, especially if you're using them as passing tones. In blues just about anything goes. A lot of walking bass lines are more or less chromatic!What's your relationship to Empress?/u/SavePlantsEatVegans is right. I got to interview Joe Bonamassa in August 2009, 3 months after that video was recorded at Royal Albert Hall in London. (He signed my Les Paul, too!). 

Joe is using some $100k+ of gear to get that sound\u2014multiple vintage Marshalls, Friedman, etc, a sizable pedal board, one of the most expensive Gibson guitars on the planet\u2014and even then, he'd be one first to tell you that tone is in your fingers.

Also, you are listening to a mix that's been through post-production and mastering, and was recorded while pushing some *serious* air. Even his rig with his fingers will not sound nearly as good at low volume. These are 100-watt hot-rodded tube amps with 4x12s and cranking them is a big part of the sound.

You're simply not going to be able to nail it at &lt;10% of the cost\u2014especially if you're not him\u2014even though the amp you have is an excellent starting place.

That said, yeah, EMGs are not going to sound as close to that tone as a PAF-type humbucker. But it's important to be realistic in understanding that there is a practical limit and that there are diminishing returns.

If you play a variety of music, EMGs are a great choice. If you specifically want this tone and don't care about versatility, PAFs are a good choice.

If you are asking if you should change your pickups because it is impossible to get this tone with what you have, but also saying that you play "a lot of stuff, from old 70's rock to modern trash metal," then I'm going to just tell you that, yes, it is impossible to get that tone with what you have AND get a good '70s rock tone AND a modern thrash metal tone from the same rig. 

If you want pickups that are versatile, you have them already.

Hope this helps!Am I the only one who couldn't make it past 1 min because his high E string was flat? Ouch!

It was interesting to watch muted though, lol.&gt; listen to this gal*

FTFY ;)heeheeThanks for the transparency, though it's ex post facto. For future reference, it would be greatly appreciated if you'd disclose in the video itself and/or in the OP if you received a pedal directly from a company and are doing a demo for them (rather than a customer review for something that you've bought at retail).

Thanks!I don't *know* if your opinion is biased or untrusthworthy unless you disclose your relationship.

I didn't say you were required to do anything. I said it would be "greatly appreciated." And if you have nothing to hide, you should have no problem disclosing that there's a quid pro quo here.

This is not simply a demo. It's a review. You said in the post title your subjective opinion ("One of the best high-gain tones I've ever heard in my life...") and more throughout your post ("Holy shit!" "simply amazing" etc).

The fact that you received something for free biases you and in the interest of honesty, should be disclosed if we want to be able to trust what you're saying or otherwise weigh your opinion.

The sidebar also says:

&gt;Spam and self-advertising are not allowed in /r/Guitar, even as a proxy. This means no linking to your blog/web site/YouTube channel. Sharing a video of your playing from Youtube is ok as long as you do not ask people to subscribe etc.

and more importantly,

&gt;If you have questions, ask the moderators.

so maybe we should do that. I'm going to shoot them a brief message asking if they think that paid reviews or in-kind compensated reviews (free gear) need to be disclosed as paid/in-kind compensated.

Frankly the fact that you're even fighting me on this instead of simply agreeing to disclose any compensation going forward is pretty suspect.###OTHER THINGS THAT HELP US HELP YOU:

-What style(s) of music you play or want to play

-Some specific artists or even specific songs with tones you like

-For amps, we need to know your application. Bedroom player with headphones? Studio recording? Silent computer-based recording? City gigging where small footprint and light weight are a priority? Loud stage or rehearsal where you need to be heard over a drummer?

-For amps, we need to know if you are a heavy user of effects or not.

-For amps, we need to know if you have a bad back, live or gig somewhere with weather extremes, travel a lot, or have any other special circumstances that might rule out the more common (fragile, heavy) tube amp recommendations.

-Tell us if you live in a city with an active music community where used gear is widely available, or if it is easier for you to buy new/online

-Tell us what country you're in so that we can recommend specific brands or retailers based on distributionIf you already have a guitar you love, and you already have a versatile amp that can hook up to your computer as an interface, you're in pretty good shape.

Here are  some of the best things you can own to improve your playing, if you don't already have them:

- Metronome

- Tuner pedal

- Looper pedal (TC Electronic Ditto or Ditto X2 are popular choices)

- Sight-reading books like [this one](http://www.amazon.com/Daily-Guitar-Reading-Technique-Studies/dp/0786682809) or [this one](http://www.amazon.com/Reading-Studies-Guitar-Positions-Multi-Position/dp/0634013351/)

- Music theory books like [this one](http://www.amazon.com/Berklee-Music-Theory-Book-Edition/dp/0876391102) or [this one](http://www.amazon.com/Music-Theory-For-Dummies-Audio/dp/1118095502)

If you only have 1 or 2 pedals you don't need a pedalboard.

If you are interested in pedals but don't know what you want, a multi-effect unit is a great choice.

If you're looking for an all-in-one effect unit &amp; guitar trainer, [this is a good choice](http://www.guitarcenter.com/Korg/Pandora-Stomp-Multi-Effect-Processor-Tuner.gc). It has a built-in tuner, metronome (rare on pedals or multi-FX units), pre-programmed rhythm patterns for jamming, an aux-input for playing along to MP3s, a whole bunch of effects that you can use like a standard effects pedal, and a bunch of other stuff.What don't you like about the necks? Maybe we can recommend something you'd like better.

A small amp with a headphone jack on a $150 budget will mean a solid-state or digital modeling amp. I highly recommend the Line 6 Spider IV for $100 or a Roland Cube 10GX for slightly more. Both are just fine for bedroom playing, versatile, can do the Chet Atkins sound well.

For most of his recordings, Chet used his 1954 Standel miked with an RCA 44 ribbon mic. It had a JBL D-130 loudspeaker in it. It was only 25 watts but Paul Rivera said it was a loud 25 watts.^[Source](http://www.misterguitar.us/cbimg/PaulFAQ.html). He also used Fender Deluxe and Fender Princetons modified by Rivera. 

The Line 6 and the Cube can both model a classic Fender clean sound, although since they're modeling a Twin, it will be a bit brighter and cleaner than you're going for. You can fix this with the EQ section and drive knobs very easily.Just to put my two cents in for others reading this...

A solidbody electric guitar under $250 is not cheap; it is substandard. Unless you are buying used, you really shouldn't spend less than about $300 on a guitar, ideally more like $350. If you do, you are very likely to deal with things like high action, sharp fret ends, trem systems that are just for show, electrical shielding and noise problems, poor intonation, etc.

For my students, I recommend an absolute minimum of $400 for a new guitar or $300 for a used one, with a little flexibility if you find a really good deal or have a coupon or something.

An "expensive" guitar depends totally on the kind of guitar you're talking about. For example, a carved archtop jazz guitar for $1,500 is almost certainly going to be made in China from cheaper woods with unsavory labor and environmental/wood sourcing practices, etc.

I would consider an "midrange" archtop to be about $3000 and an "expensive" one to be $5000 or higher.

This is totally different for solidbody electric guitars like Teles or Strats. You can get a best-of-the-best Suhr or Tom Anderson for $3000, for example. A mid-level solidbody electric Strat or Tele is about $1200-1500 and a totally workable midrange one is somewhere in the $800-1000 range. I would consider "affordable" to be $500-800 and "cheap" to be $300-500.

For amps, again it depends on what kind of amp you're talking about. There are LOTS of great solid-state bedroom amps that are perfectly fine that are well under $200, for example from Line 6 and Roland and Blackstar.

At $300 but well short of $600 you start getting into tube amps for small gigging and rehearsal or possibly even recording. I would consider an "affordable" guitar amp to be one between about $400-500 (on the Blues Jr side of things) up to about $1300-1500 (on the Fender Super-Sonic side of things). For expensive amps, I would consider that to be in the $2k-3k and up range. Above that are boutique amps in the $4-10k range. Really the only amps that cost more than that are going to be vintage or celebrity-owned ones. The only amps cheaper than $100 new are basically going to be toys or starter pack amps.Well I'm actually a lady, so maybe that explains it ;)

*Most* but not all jazzier guitars will have thicker necks. There are exceptions. Generally if you see an instrument that says something like "'60s neck" or "'60s slim taper" or "'60s reissue" it's going to have a much thinner neck than your standard jazzy/hollowbody guitar.

What's your budget? I can help you narrow it down to some specific models you might check out.Well there are plenty of choices within your budget, especially if you buy used. If you like the Ibanez Artcore is there any reason you're not going with that one?

Or more to the point, what *don't* you like about it?Nope:

&gt;"Chet didn't like flatwounds. He said they are dead as a doornail\u2026no sustain. He hated the sound those jazz players got and they used flatwounds. Chet once said that Johnny Smith was the greatest musician he had ever met. Johnny got a better tone than most of the jazz guys who, for the most part, sound like they had a quilt over their amp."

Source:
http://www.misterguitar.us/cbimg/PaulFAQ.html#FlatwoundsIf you like Artcores, they come in a variety of price points. You could simply get a nicer one for the same price. For example, I just searched Reverb.com (no connection to this sale and I can't vouch for the seller), and found this Artcore on sale for $700. This model is normally $1000 new:

https://reverb.com/item/1178844-ibanez-as-153-artstar-antique-cherry-sunburst-ohsc-mint-christmas-sale-699-00-free-shipping

If you like Chet Atkins you will probably want a model with a Bisby or other trem system. Something like this is a great choice (again no relation to seller and can't vouch for them):

https://reverb.com/item/730051-store-demo-gretsch-electromatic-g5420t-sunburst-hollowbody-electric-guitar

This one is a store demo model and so it's a little cheaper than a brand-new one, and just barely above your $700 cap.

Another great brand is Eastman. They are underpriced in my opinion. I own an Eastman T186MX as a backup for my '64 Gibson ES-345 and it's a *great* guitar for well under $2,000 used. They make cheaper models too, and they are an especially good value used if you ask me:

https://reverb.com/item/1325717-eastman-t386-2014-cherry-red

This one has upgraded pickups and is currently marked down 24% from the original asking price. If you message the seller and negotiate you can probably get it for even less. Again, no relation to seller and I can't vouch for them, but I have a similar guitar and *love* mine. It has a pretty thin neck, although it's thicker than my '64 Gibson ('60s Gibsons are known for having extremely thin necks).I think there might be some confusion because "that Chet Atkins/Jazzy tone" as OP asked for is really two very different things.

A traditional jazz tone is very warm, fat, thick, and full. Flatwound strings are ideal for this. However, this is actually very different from Chet's "Country Gentleman" tone, which was *extremely* clean, clear, and bright compared to most jazz guitar tones. So if you are looking for a guitar that can cover both Chet Atkins tone and a traditional electric jazz tone, you're going to have trouble unless you make gratuitous use of the tone knobs. 

I would suggest using two different guitars for those two tones. I have a '69 Gibson ES-150 fully hollow guitar with dual humbuckers and a master volume knob (like a Gretsch) that does a great Chet Atkins thing, and I string it with 10-46 roundwounds for that reason. For jazz, I use a carved archtop with a floating pickup strung with 12-53 flatwounds. The tones they produce could not be more different, if we're talking about the range of sounds you can get from a hollowbody guitar.

The guitar I use when I need a Chet Atkins tone:
http://i.imgur.com/MxvfgbE.jpg

My main jazz guitar:
http://i.imgur.com/o0y7wku.jpgThere is no relationship between fretboard material and neck profile. 

A stiffer material like carbon glass composite makes it *possible* to use less wood for the neck itself, but a composite fretboard does not mean that the neck will be thinner. It totally depends on the style of guitar and the specific model.Ooh! Commenting so I can come back to this on my computer later. I went through the same thing 15 years ago.I bet you could. I'm primarily a jazz guitarist, but I also play bass, and I mostly use a very modern 6-string active bass. Despite this, I know with 100% certainty that I can tell apart a '64 Fender Precision from a '75 Fender Jazz in a blind test because I did it once during some downtime at a session. We recorded multiple sound samples (5 as I recall) on each bass through the exact same amp and mic setup and I got them all right. The chances of doing that with random guessing are about 3%.

If I can do it with a bass, and you're an acoustic guitarist, I'm sure you can do it with acoustic guitars.Well, it almost certainly has a truss rod or some other stabilizer in the neck. But I'm guessing they went for the Bullet 9s rather than the 10s, too!Well, I don't know what you're talking about, actually. It is *very* unrealistic to expect to find a Standard Stratocaster for $160 used unless it has a broken truss rod or something. That's far below market value for that guitar. Same with the Epi.

According to Reverb.com's Price Guide, which is based on real final sales prices of recent transaction over their site over a rolling 2-month period, the estimated price range for a used Fender Standard Strat is $275 to $400, which is about in line with my recommendation for a budget guitar for a beginner.

As just one example, here is one that's 5 years older than your 2006 model with an asking price of $330 ($350 shipped):

https://reverb.com/item/1405640-fender-standard-stratocaster-in-lake-placid-blue-finish

There are only a handful of Epiphone Les Paul Goth models on Reverb.com at the moment, not enough for their software to calculate an estimated used value, but looking at the ones they have available, it looks like they are going for an average of $291.25 + shipping used. Again, that's pretty close to my recommendation for a minimum of $300 for a used guitar, with some wiggle room if you can find a really good deal.

If you go to Guitar Center you are likely to pay more than you would on Reverb.com for either guitar, since they have a retail markup to include.

I don't get any pushback from parents because I don't teach children. Spouses, sometimes ;) But if you're serious about learning guitar, it doesn't make sense to buy a starter pack. I would much rather take my student to a store and help them pick out a much better used guitar and amp that are a much better value than anything you could buy new pre-packaged like that. Those Fender GDEC 10-watt amps are toys. A used Line 6 Spider IV for $70 not only sounds better but has built-in effects and amp modeling, a built-in tuner, a headphone jack, an aux input, and better resale value when you're ready to upgrade.You win some, you lose some. You lose more than you win. Finding the right band isn't easy. It can be like trying to find three or four girlfriends at once. I've known plenty of guys whose marriages didn't last as long as their bands, lol. Just try again.I have dozens of guitars so I need to be able to ID them without opening the cases. The cases are on shelves and they're labeled on the back edge (like where the bottom strap button is), but not with like, people names.

The labels are names I understand, for example "Schaefer 16" is my main jazz guitar, a 16" Ed Schaefer carved archtop. "Rowan 1" is my Michael Rowan PRS clone with a floating trem. "Rowan 2" is its backup with a fixed bridge. My '97 Parker Fly Artist is labeled "Artist" etc.

Some of them are just numbered, eg "58" is my '58 Strat, "64" is my '64 Gibson ES-345, "69" is my '69 ES-150. "512" is my Taylor 512e.

There are only two with proper nicknames but it's nothing intentional. My '98 Fender American Deluxe Fat Strat with a rosewood fretboard and an ash body has a transparent red finish. It's labeled "Red." The other is my Taylor Leo Kotke 6-string signature model, labeled "Leo."Yes, my brother's old music store sold them. They can get decent volume for their size, more than you would think. Certainly not enough to play with a drummer, but loud enough for low-volume busking or campfire playing. They do not do a clean tone at all, or at least not unless you back way off on your volume and play very quietly. They are fun to have around the studio to add novelty if you need to layer something\u2014they can actually pull off that '70s Led Zep "Black Dog" tone pretty well\u2014or just because they're cute, but they are not at all a substitute for a mini-amp like the Blackstar Fly, for example. 

Here's a video:

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Uu2523PQ9toFYI these are amps not effects units so you shouldn't plug them into the front of your amp or into your effects loop return. If you want to use the extension cab output, just use a speaker cable and run it directly into your cab.I would suggest actually not learning scales via intervals nor patterns.

*Learn them by their actual note names.* For example, a C major diatonic scale is C, D, E, F, G, A, B ascending in Ionian mode. From there, learn scale degrees. When I'm performing, I'm usually not thinking about theory at *all,* but when my head goes to theory, it goes to note names. This is ideal if you later intend to get into arranging, composition, and sight-reading.

Start out by playing a standard scale, for example the Segovia scales:

http://www.amazon.com/Diatonic-Major-Scales-Andres-Segovia/dp/1598060597

As you play them, say aloud "C," "D," "E..." with each one. Watch yourself do it. Feel your fingers do it. The idea is to engage as many of your senses as possible. Doing so will help with your memory.

Once you get a feel for how to play all the notes in C major around the fretboard, skip around the fretboard playing all the notes in the key. As you do, say the note names out loud. Then play them ascending. Then descending. Switch it up. Starting on the low E string, you should be able to play (while you say aloud) "E F G" (then onto the 5th string) "A B C" (4th) "D E F" (3rd) "G A" (2nd) "B C D" (1st) "E F G" and then back down to the open low E. Do this with a metronome while gradually increasing speed. 

Then do the same thing, but this time say the scale degrees. C is 1, D is 2, E is 3 etc.

The idea is that you should eventually be able to play any note on the fretboard at random and instantly know what the actual note name is (e.g. F) and what the scale degree is (4). Eventually you will do this for all keys.

Running scales is good for working on picking technique and fingering, but you don't actually play those patterns when you're performing.

When performing, you play licks, and to improvise licks, you need to have an intuitive feel of what notes you're playing as they relate to the key you're in. That means knowing the note name and the scale degree without having to think about it.

If you don't already have the entire fretboard memorized (chromatically I mean), you should work on that as well. Play a random note on the fretboard and figure out what it is\u2014count up the chromatic scale if you have to at first\u2014and say it out loud. Do this as quickly as you can without making any mistakes, **using a metronome** to force you to do it at tempo. Gradually increase your speed until you instantly know every single note anywhere on the fretboard. The goal here is to be able to play any note at random and instantly be able to say "This is an F#" or "This is a C#" etc. If you set your metronome to 120 and play quarter notes and can randomly play any note on the fretboard and name it aloud, 2 per second, you're very well prepared to read any music you're going to face in the real world.

If you don't know how to read music, I recommend this book before the Segovia one from above:

http://www.amazon.com/Daily-Guitar-Reading-Technique-Studies/dp/0786682809

It's designed for absolute beginners to reading music on guitar and has 30 daily studies, just simple whole notes at first without any movement, on up to reading simple lines, and by day 30, you're sight reading whole chords.

###USE A METRONOME.

If you don't already have one, my favorite is the Boss DB-90, although they're expensive. It's such an important practice tool, though, that I think it's worth it. They're $160 new or cheaper used. You can get a simple electronic metronome that doesn't do subdivisions for closer to $10 if that's more in your budget:

http://www.amazon.com/Qwiktime-QT3-Qwik-Time-Metronome/dp/B0002F75EM

###USE A METRONOME!Dude, what are you talking about?

Squier Classic Vibe Strats are not MIM Strats. As I recall they are made in China. They are $379.99 brand new; it's no surprise that they are $275 used. That makes perfect sense. But that isn't what we were talking about. I also didn't say that you can't find a MIM Strat for under $300; in fact I said that the average used price on Reverb.com ranges from $275 to $400.

Where did this Squier business come from? You said a 2006 MIM Strat, which I called a Standard Strat, which is what Fender calls their normal Mexican ones:

http://www.fender.com/guitars/stratocaster/standard-stratocaster/product-014460.html

They retail at $599.99 new and are available for somewhere around half of that used. Just like I said. I didn't say it was unrealistic to find one for sub $300. In fact I explicitly said they go used for $275-400 on Reverb.com. I said it was unrealistic to expect to find them for $160.

And, just like I said, it *is* unrealistic to expect to be able to find them for $160 used (unless you find one with a broken truss rod or something). See Guitar Center edit below for proof. I'm hardly saying I don't believe you that you found one for that price, but I'm not going to tell a student to go into a store and look for a Strat for $160 and expect him to walk out with a functional MIM Strat. That's, as I said, unrealistic.

In my experience, spending less than about $300 on a solidbody electric is asking for trouble if you're a beginner. A $200 guitar might be playable if you know how to do some simple guitar repair, fret dressing/setup etc, but off the shelf I do not recommend guitars in that price range to beginners. The action will be higher than what is ideal, the intonation will be imprecise, and the hardware will be cheap. It is more likely to turn a beginner off from frequent practice, which is the last thing I want to do to my students.

You are welcome to disagree with my opinion, but it's not like I'm *wrong.* This is my opinion as a teacher with 15 years of experience. If you disagree, explain why, but that doesn't mean I'm wrong.

I didn't say sub-$300 used guitars are junk. I said they are substandard. That means below the average or usual standard for whatever you're talking about. In this case, they are cheaper than I would recommend. It doesn't mean they're junk. Don't put words in my mouth.

Edit: I'm looking at Guitar Center's used inventory online right now. MIM Fender Standard Stratocasters are going for about $250-350 plus tax, which is very similar to what they're going for on Reverb ($275-400 average, no tax on private sales). 

http://www.guitarcenter.com/search?Ns=r&amp;Ntt=standard+strat#pageName=search&amp;Ntt=standard+strat&amp;N=0+18135+1076&amp;Nao=0&amp;recsPerPage=100&amp;v=g&amp;Ns=pLH&amp;postalCode=07016&amp;radius=100&amp;profileCountryCode=US&amp;profileCurrencyCode=USDTIL. Thanks.I didn't agree with you. I posted first; you argued with me for some reason even though you didn't actually say anything that was factually different from anything I wrote, except to say that you think your $200 guitars are great. That's your opinion and you're welcome to it.

I don't recommend guitars that cheap to my students. I didn't say they were junk. I didn't say they were crap. I said they are substandard, because they are. I never said $300 guitars are substandard; actually that's my minimum recommendation for beginners. I said *less* than that is substandard. This is like the 4th time you've misstated what I've said.

If you disagree, I don't care.Nothing wrong with low-cost gear. My first guitar was a no-name classical with action about a half-inch off the fingerboard. It's a learning experience. But I don't recommend that to someone who's paying for lessons and wants to take it seriously.

No beginner should spend anywhere near $1k on a guitar. There are just too many options, you don't know what you want yet. I knew one of them was a '64 P and the other was a '75 Jazz. I didn't know which sound files were which; the engineer was keeping track for me and only told me afterward.

The probability of this is really easy to calculate. It's the same way you calculate coin flips, if you've even take a probability statistics class. Since there are two possible outcomes for each sound sample (Precision or Jazz) and there are 5 sound samples, you just multiple 0.5 x 0.5 x 0.5 x 0.5 x 0.5, or put another way, (0.5)^5. It's a little over 3 percent.

If you wanted to do this a little more visually, consider it like this. Here are your possible outcomes for a coin flipped 5 times, with H representing heads and T representing tails.

TTTTT, TTTTH, TTTHT, TTTHH, TTHTT, TTHTH, TTHHT, TTHHH, THTTT, THTTH, THTHT, THTHH, THHTT, THHTH, THHHT, THHHH, HTTTT, HTTTH, HTTHT, HTTHH, HTHTT, HTHTH, HTHHT, HTHHH, HHTTT, HHTTH, HHTHT, HHTHH, HHHTT, HHHTH, HHHHT, HHHHH

There are 32 possible combinations there. In order to get all 5 right (if you are guessing between two sound samples, if one is the Jazz or one is the P, five times in a row), it would be the same probability as any of those 32 being correct.

The probability of a complete guess for any of them is 50/50 so if you can consistently do better than that, the more consistently you can do it, the more likely you are to be actually hearing a difference and not just getting it right by coincidence. Getting them ALL right by coincidence would only happen 1 out of 32 times.

Hope this helps!If you wanted to do this yourself and you can go to a guitar store, you don't need to record anything. Pick out whatever guitars you want to compare and ask a salesperson to play them for you while you listen with your eyes closed and take notes about which you think is which. Have him switch randomly several times and see how consistent you are. That's really all there is to it.Right. I can imagine this conversation:

Person A: "I've been sick for three days now. I should go to the ER."
Person B: "I've been sick for a week. You never heard me complain. If you're still sick on Sunday, then make a doctor's appointment for Monday."

The implication for Person B isn't that he is currently sick. There's an implied "before" after "week."

The "now" from Person A makes it clear he means that he is currently 3 days into his illness. It further implies that he's frustrated about it and doesn't expect it to resolve itself just yet.Heyo, so the Dyna-Touch feature attempts to address the exact reason that you likely say you usually prefer tube amps.

It's supposed to respond the way a single channel tube amp does. You might ask why someone would want a single channel amp, like an old Plexi, since that only gives them one sound.

Well, some players prefer to go from clean to dirty and back using their volume knob or with changes to their playing dynamics. You can only do this on tube amps that are cranked, which is easier with lower rated ones like a Plexi or a Champ (versus, say, a Dual Rectifier or a JCM800). Mark Knopfler and Eric Clapton are two artists who are known for this. These types of players keep their volume knob on their guitar down a bit, say at 6 or 7, and turn it all the way up only for soloing when they need a boost.

Most players prefer keeping their volume knob all the way up all the time, and having multiple channels that you change with a foot switch instead. This is reflected with the popularity of multi-channel amps (and/or drive pedals or boost pedals that you engage or disengage for different parts of the song).

One of the chief complaints that people have with solid state amps is that they don't have the same "feel" as tube amps. What they're talking about is the way tubes, when pushed harder, respond with more drive. Most solid state amps don't do this; they just get quiet when there's less signal.

The Dyna-Touch amps, as well as digitally modeled tube amps from Line 6 etc, are programmed to do this. Some drive pedals, like the TC Electronic MojoMojo, are specifically designed to be left on all the time if you're using a single channel clean amp but don't want to rattle the rafters, and you control the amount of drive with your technique or with your volume knob.

Here's an example:

https://youtu.be/30ppGXYHV5kIt didn't happen, though. No one says it except ironically when they want to make fun of her.

Actually, the amazing thing is that although "fetch" didn't happen, "Stop trying to make 'fetch' happen. It's not going to happen" *itself* happened.Just to get things started, I like a rounder, softer tone that's very fat and warm. Live, I usually use a Shure SM7B on a short stand slightly off axis about 3 inches from the grill and just at the cap edge. My second favorite for electric guitar is a Sennheiser MD421 mk II. I'm also a fan of the classic SM57.

In the studio, some of my favorites are the Blue Baby Bottle, the Shure KSM44, and the Royer R-121 but I generally let the producer/engineers deal with that side of it.&gt; Royer r122

For those curious the 122 and the 121 I mentioned above are [pretty much the same mic](http://www.royerlabs.com/faq.html#r121vsr122) except that the 122 is better suited to recording lower sound pressure levels like acoustic guitars or voiceover stuff. If you are recording a guitar cabinet, the 121 can handle it better.&gt; Sennheiser e609

What do you like about it? I've never used one.&gt; the sm57 is..well completly flat

Yeah? I guess it depends on your placement too and what you're doing with it but 57s roll off on the low end pretty good, especially if you're recording heavier downtuned stuff. It's perfect for a snare mic if you don't want to pick up the kick drum but it wouldn't be my first choice for a budget mic on a metal guitar unless we're talking like lead guitar only.Right-o. Yeah, the 5-6k bump on 57s is part of what I like about them in a mix for electric guitars, lots of clarity, especially with a humbucker guitar - the higher inductance of the double coil lowers the resonant peak and the bigger magnetic field cancels out some of the higher harmonics. It's nothing you can't do with a big of EQ on a flatter mic though.

57s are cardioid. You can hang them over the top of an amp too and they work just fine. In fact I mentioned that in my OP.I never do live. In the studio I love using a KSM44 for that.Behind the guitar? Like, the back of it?

I *love* the tone of my carved archtop from the rear - sometimes when I'm goofing off at home I actually like to sit it up on the armrest of my couch and put my head right behind the body and play it like that, just because it sounds so good from the back. I've thought about trying to record that somehow but I don't see how I could play it well from that position.Oh no, I was just saying that for the benefit of others reading, just because a guitar is built from newer materials doesn't necessarily mean you should expect it to have a thin neck, although Parkers etc do have quite thin necks.

For example, many Rainsong guitars actually have quite thick necks. I just didn't want somebody to read this and think that a Rainsong was going to have a thin neck since it's made from carbon fiber. BB King used to wind the ENTIRE string onto the post rather than cutting it. It does keep more mass there and arguably makes your tone a little fatter but it seems like a negligible difference if you ask me, if we're not talking about the part of the string that directly vibrates when you play.

Edit: Not sure why this is being downvoted. It's relevant and accurate. My source is [Dan Erlewine's book "The Guitar Player Repair Guide" page 11](https://books.google.com/books?id=zF24JMkjSpQC&amp;pg=PA11&amp;lpg=PA11&amp;dq=bb+king+wind+entire+string&amp;source=bl&amp;ots=DwAE9rGVV2&amp;sig=AeW_fVVyAR_ACm_UOcWdHH_tGxI&amp;hl=en&amp;sa=X&amp;ved=0ahUKEwiKndHLqcXJAhWCNSYKHZwmA_cQ6AEIKjAC#v=onepage&amp;q=bb%20king%20wind%20entire%20string&amp;f=False) if you want a citation.No worries! I like ebony boards too, although rosewood is probably my favorite. I much prefer thinner necks myself which is why I was disappointed when I tried a Rainsong for the first time. They make a couple shapes nowadays though I think.Like I said it seems like a negligible difference to me. I think we agree on this.Yes. They are the definition of substandard. You are welcome to disagree. You are entitled to your own opinion. The definition of substandard is below average. Both Mexican Fenders and Asian import Epiphones are designed to be budget guitars and they are a good value. They are not designed to be great guitars. Sometimes by chance you'll get a good one but they are shooting for inexpensive, not great, and they succeed at this. That's their market segment. That's their business model. That's the point.

I get that you are attached to your guitars but you're coming off awfully prideful here. There's nothing *wrong* with budget instruments and you really need to stop acting like I said there is something wrong with them. I don't know where you got that, but it wasn't from me.

"Don't reproduce"? Name-calling? What are you, 12? Grow up.For live playing, for most situations, isolation and freedom of movement matter so much that it's not worth the tone improvements you get from using a mic rather than a DI + careful EQing.

That said, condenser mics are generally best for acoustic guitars.Where'd you hear that?

It doesn't make any sense. If a string snaps, it's going to snap either at the saddle, tuner, or somewhere in between (the most common other place is the nut, but it can happen anywhere else in between too).

Having extra length *beyond* the tuner will not do you any good in any of those cases.How would extra length at the tuning machine help if you break the end  with the ball off at the bridge?No relationship. I buy these at full retail on Amazon. I like Surefire flashlights too but they cost more.

Edit: Just to be clear, I appreciate the question and it's an appropriate one. I should have mentioned in my original post that I have no relationship with the company. I'll make sure I do that from now on.I'm not hiding anything. I said I *don't* have a relationship with the company. The reason I was suspicious of your post\u2014rightfully, as it turned out\u2014is that you *do* have a relationship with the company. In any case the mods have already said, *according to you yourself,* that it's not an issue as long as I'm not selling them. And I'm not; I linked to Amazon, the same place I buy them myself. 

And I didn't say anything about *deleting* your previous post. I asked if you would, *voluntarily, in the future,* disclose compensation you are receiving for reviews. The fact that you refuse to do this speaks volumes about your ethics. Separately I asked the mods if they thought a rule needed to be added about disclosures *for future posts.* They said no, *as you yourself said.* Jesus man, reading comprehension. Get some.

You're hijacking this thread out of pettiness. Grow up. I'm a hypocrite for failing to disclose a relationship that *doesn't* exist? *Even after the mods said it isn't required?*

What is wrong with you? Grow up. Stop hijacking this thread.LOL. Grow up. You are a shill, you got called out on it, and you're bitter.For what application?

Chromed steel looks great on a motorcycle but I wouldn't want concrete reinforcement rods made out of it.

Copper is great for guitar pickups but totally inappropriate for rocket launchers.

I think we can all agree that heavy metal is the only metal that rocks though.

Unless we're talking about gold ore. That('s) rocks, too.If she didn't come with papers she's almost certainly not a purebred anything. Nothing wrong with mongrels, though! They live longer, generally speaking.

She has a coat coloring similar to a Russian Blue though.No that's "Bless your heart."

"I'll pray for you" is "But I am le tired."When you're citing cases orally, it can sound repetitive to pronounce "versus" over and over. It also takes longer because it's two syllables. "vs." is pronounced "versus" but "v" is pronounced like the letter. It's more efficient.Well it's important to keep in mind that pro recordings are not only using millions of dollars not just in amps and microphones and pres but also isolation rooms etc. When you listen to a pro recording you are hearing it with post-production and mastering. You can get great results from a home studio if you have great ears and really know what you're doing, but a budget unit like that simply isn't going to sound the same. A lot of it comes from things like mic technique and lots of other things that are beyond the scope of this post.

Let me start by asking what kind of amp you're using? If it has a direct out with cab simulation, that's a good starting place, unless you have a good ability to isolate and a good mic. You can use plugins in place of a lot of gear that bigger studios use, things like preamps and processors and so on. You can even plug your guitar in directly and skip the amp altogether if you use amp, cab, and mic modeling software. This will have a lower noise floor and a better signal-to-noise ratio and better isolation than you're likely to be able to get at home or in a project studio, too.

To answer your question, most pro studios record live amps although this is changing as modeling tech improves. I'd say in the studio I record direct maybe 50% of the time. I use a Line 6 hybrid tube amp with a direct out so it's not like I have to choose just one or the other, either - you just record it on different channels. Bassists are more likely to go direct than guitarists. Keys almost always do.Source? To my knowledge he used his own Gibson signature strings in a custom 10-54 set, that's 10s on top and 13s on the bottom:

http://www.musiciansfriend.com/accessories/gibson-seg-bbs-b.b.-king-signature-electric-guitar-stringsLawyers spend a *lot* more of their time reading and writing than they spend speaking to crowds. They're not politicians.Oh, where the strap button is. I thought you meant the rear of the guitar.Ah, Billy Gibbons - he is well known for telling tall tales! I actually found a source for that, but it doesn't match up with the strings BB actually used, so who knows:

http://www.premierguitar.com/articles/String_Myths_Part_1In short, yes; a judge has authority over sentencing. A judge can even suspend a sentence entirely.I believe that's where the term originated in the early '80s.Actually judges have methods to avoid mandatory minimums, although they are not easy to utilize. Skirting mandatory minimum sentences is better understood as a question of ethics rather than possibility. 

______
Citation:
Nathan A. Greenblatt. 2008. "How Mandatory Are Mandatory Minimums? How Judges Can Avoid Imposing Mandatory Minimum Sentences" ExpressO
Available at: http://works.bepress.com/nathan_greenblatt/1Haha, well yes, it can get pretty complicated. People apprentice for many years, get degrees in sound engineering, etc to be able to do this. But that doesn't mean you can't learn as you go and get good results from home.

Something important to understand is that guitar tone is not simply your guitar and your pedals or even just your guitar + your pedals + your amp. A big part of guitar tone is the sound of actual loudspeakers moving air, and the kind(s) of microphone(s) you use, and where you place them, also makes a big difference.

If you aren't using an isolation booth and a microphone(s) to record this in real life, you will need to simulate it with software. If you record without any kind of cab or mic simulation, your tone will sound very cold, dead, and sterile.

There are software plugins that are designed to replace the need to mic up a real cab in an isolation booth. 

If you like your Marshall and you want to use the sound of its preamp, you can use the line output (I believe it's on the front right of your amp) to go into your interface using the line level input, and then digitally simulate the sound of the power amp, loudspeakers (cabinets), and microphones.

Frankly it is a lot easier to do this, and a lot cheaper, than micing up your actual amp. Your interface is designed to accept a guitar signal directly, and if you're digitally simulating everything else, you might as well do the amp too instead of using your Marshall - you will get a better signal-to-noise ratio, a lower noise floor, and you will have the choice to reamp later if you choose.

The way to do this is to plug your guitar into your pedals, and then instead of going into your amp as usual, go into the guitar input on your interface (make sure it's set to "instrument" level rather than "line" level). This will give you what's called a direct sound, which does not sound very good (yet). The next step is using plugins to add in whatever amp sound, cabinet sound, and microphones you want to simulate.

What DAW software are you using?Hi!

Lady guitarist here. I totally understand the desire to give a surprise gift, but as a guitarist, I can tell you that the choice of a specific instrument is a VERY important one. There are *hundreds* of factors that go into choosing the correct guitar; it's not as simple as "is this a good guitar?" It might be the perfect guitar for one player and totally wrong for someone else. Your heart is definitely in the right place but unfortunately it's not like choosing the right car, where you can surprise your 16-year-old and you know they'll be thrilled no matter what you choose. It's more like choosing makeup, where we almost always have very particular preferences for the specific product.

I would strongly suggest you skip the surprise aspect and "surprise" him by taking your husband guitar shopping so he can pick it himself! If you want to present him with something, a gift card is an option, but trust me, surprise guitars are almost never the right one unless you happen to know a particular, specific instrument he's always wanted.It doesn't sound like she bought it yet? I could be wrong. From her wording it sounds to me like she's saying that she found a deal on one, but was asking if it's a good choice before she buys it.

We can't really tell her if it's a good choice or not. We can tell her if it's a good price but that's really about it. Whether it's a good choice or not depends entirely on her husband's preferences.FYI you have embedding disabled, so we can't watch the video from Reddit.

I have the exact same guitar, except mine is the 6-string version. They're so perfect! Sitka spruce top + Honduran mahogany back &amp; sides + a jumbo body is really an unbeatable combination for heavy rhythmic fingerstyle playing, and I love the clean look of the fretboard with no inlays and the understated African greenwood purfling.Yep! For awhile I kept mine tuned down 2 whole steps and it really sounded incredible like that.

I also have a 512e with a 12-fret neck, a Western red cedar top, and mahogany back &amp; sides. With its tiny Grand Concert body it's very similar except much more intimate sounding for fingerstyle playing. Between those two I can really do everything.Yamaha makes underpriced guitars, in my opinion.

Gibson makes overpriced guitars, in my opinion.

Gibsons tend to have a characteristic bright, brittle sound. If you like that tone (a lot of people do), they're great. Personally I go for a darker sound.

In any case, you're going to get a better deal on a Yamaha, almost certainly. With acoustics, really, you have to play them and listen to them. It's not so simple as "which brand is better?"

Go to a store with a big selection and pick out a couple in your price range, new and used. Play them and see which ones feel the best as far as the body size, the neck shape, etc. Of the ones you really like, ask a salesperson to play them for you (so you can hear them from the front) and pick the one that sounds the best.

Used guitars are generally a better value, especially with acoustics I think, because as wood ages, it sounds better. Just be sure to check for things like bowed or back-bowed necks, swollen tops, loose frets, sharp fret ends or other fret dressing issues, wonky tuners, high action, cracks (repaired or unrepaired), etc. If you can find one in great condition for a good price, you're all set!I'm sure he will love anything you get him, if for no other reason than because it's from you! Like I said it's really not so simple as a "good" guitar or a "bad" guitar; Guilds have a good reputation, they have a nice sound and are solid instruments that are a good value. I have one (an electric), actually. Whether they are the *right* guitar just depends on the player!&gt; 514ce 

Yep, mine is very similar except it has a smaller body and a 12-fret neck, and no cutaway. What's the body on yours made of? I know they make a couple of different versions.
Well if you wanna get technical, that's what negligible means by definition: technically there, but so insignificant that it can be treated as though it's not there (e.g. dust)!Just curious, as someone who does a lot of writing and is interested in semantics and linguistics\u2014what word would you think is a better fit?I disagree actually. Gibsons used to be very high quality but these days they are really hit-or-miss, and new, they are extremely overpriced, especially since their 29% price increase 11 months ago.

Yamaha makes budget guitars but so does Gibson (they sell them under their subsidiary label, Epiphone). Yamaha hardly makes *only* budget guitars, though. They make classical guitars costing as much as $3,600 (which in my opinion are comparable to some other brands' classicals that cost as much as $5k). Their electric basses are some of the nicest out there, with signature models in the $2-3k range for guys like Nathan East (Eric Clapton, etc), Billy Sheehan (Steve Vai, etc), and John Patitucci. I used to have a Yamaha Mike Stern signature model Tele that was about $2k. I don't think you did actually. Guilds are pretty middle-of-the-road guitars that almost everyone will like. They don't have any weird features or anything that is likely to polarize someone strongly. The one you picked is a standard dreadnaught size, the most common size, and it's the CE model, so if he wants an acoustic-electric, it's the right model to get. I think he will like it. And if worst comes to worst, and he really hates it, you can always just sell it - there is a huge market for gently used guitars!

My guess though is that you're gonna be just fine.I think this is actually not a great idea. I'm a guitar teacher and also a musician myself, and the type of guitar I would recommend to a student as their first guitar is VASTLY DIFFERENT from what I would want personally.That's a very good deal for that guitar. I think you did the right thing. Absolute worst case scenario, he hates it and you can sell it for the $600 you paid for it (they are going used online for $500-650 or so). But like I said above, I think he will like it :)You're entitled to your opinion of course. I have three Gibsons at the moment (a '64 ES-345, a '69 ES-150, and a '98 Les Paul DC Standard). I'm also a collector and I've played literally thousands of vintage guitars as well as newer guitars in collections everywhere from California to London to Rome. In my opinion, vintage Gibsons are *much* high quality than anything Gibson has put out in the 2010s, although I certainly wouldn't call them crap or whatever. They are just not as good as they used to be, and there are better values today if you're going to pay Gibson prices (e.g. PRS, Heritage, ESP, Baker, Quicksilver, etc).I also keep almost all of mine in cases for the most part. I keep a couple hanging around on stands for easy access so I can practice. Here's a shot of my living room at the moment:

http://i.imgur.com/Y7iom3h.jpgIt seems like that would be a poor choice for a blues or jazz jam regardless of the headstock, I would think, especially if you have a Tele or Strat or Gibson. Is the neck shape really that much better?The exception proves the rule, huh?

I have a Parker that I often use for playing jazz. Despite the sitka spruce body with natural finish, it's quite modern looking and sometimes gets funny looks. But it's very clean and clear sounding and actually really great for electric jazz:

http://i.imgur.com/Ts8GqiX.jpgOh, the Lonestar Strat!

I have a Big Apple Strat from the same series, same year. It's exactly like yours except that it's HH instead of HSS. They also made a SSS version called the Roadhouse Strat.I never knew PRS made a guitar with EMGs. TIL.

Bare Knuckles are great. I'm thinking about putting a Black Dog in the bridge of my main recording guitar (right now I have a James Tyler custom spec in it). Which model(s) do you have in yours?Haha, maybe that explains why I feel so differently about this. I'm poly :PThey don't? Guitar Center is expecting a new shipment in January:

http://www.guitarcenter.com/Fender/Artist-Series-John-Mayer-Stratocaster-Electric-Guitar-3-Color-Sunburst-1273888000096.gcCool.I heard about the split, yeah; that doesn't necessarily mean they stopped producing them though\u2014Fender still makes Stevie Ray Vaughan signature models, for example. But thanks for the info.

Just as a point of accuracy, John Mayer endorses PRS, not the other way around (an artist gives an endorsement; a company receives one).Albert King played a Flying V!###GIFT CARDS PLEASE

Guitarists are notoriously picky about these things. *PLEASE* don't give things like strings, picks, straps, cables, etc as gifts. Unless you happen to know the *exact* brand and model the person uses, you're almost certain to choose something they won't like and/or won't be able to use.

There are a few things that you can give that make good presents. Guitarists tend not to have as strict preferences about things like brands of guitar polish and polishing cloths (they are all pretty much the same), or things like swivel barstools for guitarists (which are great for practicing, and you can get them with various guitar company logos on them). There are other things that can be handy to have for working musicians, like briefcases (for keeping your music, iPad, etc) or Velcro cable ties (for coiling cables), but really, your best bet is a gift card.It depends. Yes, a mic will almost always sound better, but tone quality isn't always the only factor. If you are in a home studio and have zero ability to isolate, an acoustic electric (especially one designed for this purpose like a Godin Multiac or a Gibson Chet Atkins or a Taylor T5 etc) could be better than a normal acoustic + a microphone. This is even more True if you don't have the budget for a great condenser mic + a good preamp.It really is amazing how versatile those are. Named after and co-designed by jazz legend Les Paul, and used by everyone from heavy metal pioneers like Jimmy Page and Ace Frehley to blues giants like Warren Haynes and Eric Clapton and Jeff Beck to prog guys like Alex Lifeson and Peter Frampton to modern heavy rock guys like Kirk Hammett and Zakk Wylde to pop rock guys like Neil Schon and on and on and on.

There's nothing they can't do!On a guitar with exposed coil pickups without mounting rings, if you use the trem system to do deep divebombs, the high E string gets super loose and can get caught underneath the plastic bobbin on the neck pickup. The tape keeps it from getting caught on the way back up.lol

They put glam rock on the map, man. Sad but True.No problem :)Back-bow is bad. Usually it can be fixed with some adjustment to the truss rod, but if not, it might need serious repairs. Ideally you want a teeny bit of relief (bow), not much - Fender Strats leave the factory with 0.010" of relief (the same thickness as a 10 gauge high E string). If you sight down the neck like a rifle (looking from the nut down toward the body), it should be *almost* dead straight.I used to have one of those, same year too. They're pretty cool. If you want to know exactly what year it is, you can look up the serial number here:

http://www.guitardaterproject.org/gibson.aspxI used to have a '52 American Vintage reissue, butterscotch finish:

http://i.imgur.com/FUAR9kB.jpg

It was a great deal (they're about $2k new, I paid about $1200 for mine in excellent condition) and it came with upgraded Joe Barden Rails pickups. Really wonderful guitar, but just wrong for me with the U-shaped neck and 3-piece saddle. I'm really picky about neck shapes and intonation, and I just couldn't make it work. I sold it and got this American Select Tele instead:

http://i.imgur.com/93WbVIK.jpgJB is a great pickup. I have a JB Jr in the middle position of my main recording guitar.You *can* but there's a reason neck-position low output floating humbuckers in archtops are ideal for jazz and bridge position single coils in solid body Teles are ideal for country.Not bad at all. Good job on the string noise; that piece has a lot of position changes. Missed a couple of notes here and there and you let some open strings ring when they're not supposed to but overall very nice. How do you like that leg rest?If your gift-giver knows exactly what you want, then sure, by all means... Like I said, "Unless you happen to know the exact brand and model the person uses, you're almost certain to choose something they won't like and/or won't be able to use."Came here to post this. Excellent!

To be clear, the Time Person of the Year is supposed to be the person who has had the biggest influence on the course of human history, for better or worse, in the past 12 months. Bernie garnered about 10% of the vote, authenticated by Facebook or Twitter login. And to further clarify, Time editors choose the Person of the Year, so it's not a done deal, but they do solicit input from the public and take the vote-winner into consideration.

For those who think Malala was more deserving (she got about half as much of the vote as Bernie at 5.2%), let's keep in mind that although she is an amazing person, she was already a Nobel Prizewinner when 2015 started and although I think it's a mistake that she has *never* been Person of the Year, the fact is that she hasn't had the biggest influence on human history *this year,* which is what the vote was for.

If Bernie wins the nomination/presidency, he will be the first candidate and Person of the Year to be named *before* being elected.Obama was 30% behind Hillary in Oct '07.

By the time of the Iowa caucuses in early Jan '08, she came in 3rd and it shocked everyone. 

We just need to keep at it!Thanks! I'll delete &amp; repost.Here's the repost with the correct title:

https://www.reddit.com/r/SandersForPresident/comments/3vs7c1/progressive_group_holds_online_vote_for_2016/It's supposed to be the person who has had the biggest effect on the course of human history, for better or worse, for the past 12 months.

Trump is not even reliably the Republican frontrunner. He's causing the Republican party to implode but I think Ben Carson is nearly as responsible for this as Trump, and frankly the Republican Party in the USA is not exactly hugely influential throughout all of humanity, not the way for example the Pope is (leader of 1.2 billion people). 

Pope is a possibility but I don't think he's been hugely influential in 2015 compared to, say, 2013.###Direct link to vote: http://2016.democracyforamerica.com

You need to enter your email address and ZIP code to vote. ***In order for your vote to count, you MUST click the authentication link in the verification email they send you after you cast your vote.*** Please note that if your email is already registered with DFA, you will just get a thank-you email, not a confirmation email.

Bernie needs a 67% supermajority to win their endorsement. Voting ends on Tuesday, December 15 at 11:59 PM Eastern.

Please vote, and ***PLEASE SHARE*** this on your Facebook, Twitter etc, and in every pro-Bernie and progressive FB group that you're in.

DFA has a huge network of activists, a lot of money, and a lot of influence. They put serious work from their 1 million members into electing the candidates they endorse. They do campaign training workshops, scholarships, conferences, all sorts of stuff. This would be a major windfall for whichever candidate gets it.

Let's make sure that's Bernie. Spread the word!The thing is, so has Carson - remember the pyramids thing, or saying that Muslims should be disqualified from serving as President, prison turns people gay, etc?

I really don't think what you're talking about is unique to Trump and therefore shouldn't qualify him having that big of an impact on the GOP or American politics. Frankly this isn't even new - a lot of that argument could just as easily apply to Sarah Palin.Yes, that's what I said.A lot of Republican establishment folks AND analysts are also saying that Trump was never going to be the candidate, even though he's doing well in the polls. Just google "The Republicans' Trump Problem" for a thousand articles about this.

I think the only thing we can really take away from this is that it's too soon to tell!ughhhh... I just saw the "short list" thing. This is ridiculous.I'm a trans woman myself and I don't think Caitlyn Jenner is great. She was a multi-millionaire who can't really be representative of the struggle that most trans people face (40% of us are unemployed because of discrimination, a lot of us have to deal with extreme depression, etc). She's a ***conservative Republican***. She's not doing anything to really help trans people. She hasn't started any kind of foundation or donated any significant money to trans advocacy etc. I hope that she does this in the future, but frankly she's not a hero to trans people if you ask me. She's no Laverne Cox, that's for sure.Despite winning the public poll, he's not even on the top 8 shortlist that the editors will use to choose the Person of the Year:

http://time.com/4136910/person-of-the-year-shortlist-2015

Trump is, though.Yes, we do. This time around, Iowa is a month later than it was in '08, but that's still not much time. We effectively have 7 weeks here.

That said, Bill Clinton lost both Iowa and New Hampshire and not only got the DNC nomination but went on to serve two terms as President. It's really too soon to say.Well Donald Trump is on the short list of the top 8 (and Bernie isn't). I don't think Trump has had any kind of major influence in 2015 outside the US either, except maybe to Mexico.http://time.com/4136910/person-of-the-year-shortlist-2015I didn't say Bernie should win. I think it's great that he won the popular vote, especially by such a wide margin, because it will help him with name recognition, which I think is one of his biggest problems in winning the DNC nomination.

I don't think Malala should win because she was not hugely influential in 2015.

My money is on Abu Bakr Al-Baghdadi.Agreed.Brave my ass. She's rich and gorgeous and can afford whatever surgery and other medical care she wants, and private security to protect her from harassment and threats, and never having to worry about being unemployed or broke or discriminated against.http://www.huffingtonpost.com/entry/caitlyn-jenner-conservative_55be5945e4b0b23e3ce31979FYI gay and straight are sexual orientations and totally independent of and irrelevant to gender identity.

But yes, most trans people face all sorts of discrimination and horrors that Caitlyn Jenner will never have to worry about in her worst nightmares. And she's not really doing ANYTHING to make life better for trans people. All she did was come out, and because of her high public profile, it raised awareness. She hasn't done any activism to speak of, unlike e.g. Laverne Cox, Janet Mock, or any number of other activists. She is a trans person, not a trans activist.Upvote it here, post it to your Facebook wall and any pro-Bernie groups you're in, tweet it repeatedly, etc. Not to nitpick but if you are interested in learning more about how to talk about these things, for future reference, please say "gay people" (not homosexuals) and "trans people" (not transsexuals). Also, it's "sexual orientation" (not sexual preference). 

Also, a lot of (if not most) trans people don't identify with gay activism or the "gay community." We have similar political goals of acceptance and freedom from discrimination etc, but being trans doesn't mean we're gay and a lot of the political battles that gay people fight for (like marriage equality etc) have absolutely nothing to do with us.I disagree. Laverne Cox, trans woman (and ACTIVIST) and one of the stars of "Orange is the New Black," was on the cover of Time Magazine with the headline "The Transgender Tipping Point" in May 2014, a full year before Caitlyn Jenner came out in April 2015.To vote, you need to put in your email address and ZIP code, and click a link in a verification email to authenticate your vote. You could game it if you wanted to, but at least it's not as simple as an Incognito window or whatever.http://2016.democracyforamerica.comWell sure. She's known to a different generation (she was huge in the '70s), she's white, and she was famous before she transitioned. But I hardly think it's accurate to give her credit for some kind of revolution of awareness here when Time Magazine had already named 2014 as the "tipping point" for trans awareness an entire year beforehand.Check any other inbox filters and your spam folder. I got mine in about 45 seconds.Which is odd considering that he belonged to an all-white golfing club while he was the governor of Arkansas.Malala should have been Person of the Year in 2013, but the Time Person of the Year is supposed to be the most influential person in human history over the previous 12 month period. Malala was already a Nobel Prize-winner when 2015 started (she won the Peace Prize in 2014) for activism work she did in 2012 and 2013.It'll work just fine. Some jazz players and acoustic players use bass amps for guitar because they have a flatter, cleaner tone and a faster response. 

You can use pedals with bass amps. A lot of bassists use pedals with bass amps, too.&gt; Can't blame Clinton for the society he lived in at the time.

Oh? Bernie supported gay rights when it was *very* unpopular in the '70s and '80s, holding one of the nation's first gay pride parades when he was mayor of Burlington VT during the height of the HIV scare. 

He's been fighting for Black civil rights since the '60s.

If you really support civil rights like that, you go against the grain if necessary. It's not like Bernie wasn't around in the '80s, but he never belonged to an all-white organization.Are you even a Bernie supporter? What are you doing in this sub, trolling?I hope so; I'm a musician! :PYou should get two emails from "DFA Presidential Endorsement." The first one is confirmation email with a link to authenticate your vote, and then after you click the link, you should get a second email asking you to share the poll with friends on social media.

The subject line for the first one should be: "(IMPORTANT) Make your vote for Bernie Sanders count: Confirm your email NOW"

The subject line for the second one should be: "Your vote has been confirmed! Now ask your friends to vote for Bernie Sanders"

Here are screen shots of what they should look like:

First email with confirmation link: http://i.imgur.com/OgFSmf5.png

Second email asking you to share: http://i.imgur.com/4lrURv8.pngTry it without a ZIP code at all and see if it lets you submit it without one. It may not actually be restricted to Americans\u2014they may just be collecting the codes for demographic purposes.

If it is supposed to be restricted to Americans, let's not encourage cheating.

Edit: I left a voicemail with their Communications Director, Neil Sroka, asking if you have to be an American to vote, or if they are just collecting ZIPs for tracking purposes. I'll update when he calls me back.Joseph Stalin was Time's Person of the Year twice (1939 and 1942), although it was called "Man of the Year" back then. Pretty sure Time survived.This is the link you're using?

http://2016.democracyforamerica.com/Sweet! Love this sub; glad to see it getting wider exposure.Now spread the word! :)The TC Electronic MojoMojo is a good example of this: It's designed to be an always-on, amp-like drive pedal for single-channel clean amps, so you can get cranked tube-amp breakup at low volume. You can control the amount of drive with your playing dynamics and/or guitar's volume knob:

http://www.tcelectronic.com/mojomojo-overdrive/

Another good example is the BBE Sonic Stomp (Sonic Maximizer in rackmount format). It's basically a specific EQ/boost that helps your guitar cut through a mix better:

http://www.bbesound.com/products/stomp-boxes/Sonic-Stomp_ss-92.aspx

Some units, like the Dallas Rangemaster Treble Booster, don't even have on/off foot switches and are designed to sit on top of your amp:

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Dallas_Rangemaster_Treble_BoosterEthicsIf they already have your email on file, from what I understand, they only send the second email.I originally posted it with a call to action but was informed that it would be removed if I didn't post it with the exact article title, which is why I deleted my first post and reposted it that way. Sorry!Hey, you're dead, right? So which religion was right?It can be harder. I'm hypothyroid, but I take medication for it. The real reason for me is chronic back pain. It's with me 24/7 and it's almost all I think about. It keeps me from sleeping, which also slows down your metabolism. 

I can only stand for a few minutes at a time; going for a walk is out of the question. Depression partially caused by the pain makes it worse, and actually reinforces it (depression causes you to focus more on chronic pain), and it saps my motivation to get in shape, eat better, or even do the types of exercise I can do, like exercise in a swimming pool. Even grocery shopping is difficult because of my back, and just leaving the house takes a lot of effort, so I tend to order delivery a lot more than is even remotely healthy and I'm very sedentary otherwise. I used to run a lot (did three half-marathons in 3 weeks once, and that was only 5 years ago) but that's completely out of the question now.

Not all diseases are visible.A lot of players use two pedal boards, especially if they have one going into the front of the amp and another for the effects loop.Bigotry means that you are intolerant of people who are different from you.

Prejudice means that you judge people before getting to know them. For example, if you meet a white person and assume they can't dance, you're pre-judging them.

Bias means that you have an existing, often subconscious, preference or aversion to something or someone. Parents, for example, often believe their children are smarter than average.

Discrimination is the act of treating someone unfairly or differently from others because of some quality they have (refusing to date someone who is black, refusing to hire someone because of their religion, etc).DFA has a huge network of activists, a lot of money, and a lot of influence. They put *serious* work from their 1 million members into electing the candidates they endorse. They do campaign training workshops, scholarships, conferences, all sorts of stuff. This would be a major windfall for whichever candidate gets it.I checked and that's actually wrong. We're unemployed at about double the rate of the general population (17% to about 7% according to what I found). We're *underemployed* at over 40%. Here's more info:

https://www.hrc.org/blog/transgender-workers-at-greater-risk-for-unemployment-and-povertyDone.Hey /u/ccroyalsenders! Very cool. I really enjoyed it except that I wanted you to know that the mix was a bit distracting. In a real orchestra, a big part of the conductor job is to make sure that the relative balance of the volume and tone of different instruments sounds right. Flutes for example, although they are higher pitched and carry well, and actually quite quiet instruments unless you're playing very forcefully. Trombones are quite a bit louder just naturally, etc. I though it was great *except* that the flutes were WAY TOO LOUD and distracting from the experience, especially because the flute parts had so many notes even during quieter parts. If you ever do another guitorchestra thing, I thought you'd like to know. Thanks and I enjoyed it otherwise!**I disagree** that the lack of amplification is the biggest divide between gigging musicians and home players.

Almost any amp, with the exception of REALLY crappy bedroom amps (I mean like $70 ones) and mini-amps (like battery-powered $40 ones), can be used for gigging. All you need to do is slap a microphone on it, unless it has a cab-simulated direct output, in which case just run it to the snake with a patch cable. Most venues provide monitors and mains.

If you don't even have a small gigging amp (virtually any $200 amp will work for this), you can even get something like a Pocket POD available for about $60 used. Or you can borrow an amp from a friend or another band on the bill or rent one from a rental company.

Some venues even provide backline, especially if you live in a big city, so that bands don't have to cart their gear with them.

**No, the real reasons** that some people don't play live are that

1. they don't want to
2. they can't play solo and they're not in a band
3. they're not good enough yet or
4. they can't get a booking.

The ways to remedy these are different and rarely have to do with equipment.

If you don't want to, then nevermind, this post isn't for you.

If you're not a solo player because you can't sing, then get a vocal teacher or watch some YouTube videos. But try a teacher first, or at least get a few lessons from one before you try to start teaching yourself. Also, practice a lot.

If you can't find a band, put an ad up on Craigslist or respond to other ads, ask your musician friends if they know anybody who's looking to start a band or if they have any band openings, put an ad up at your local music store or ask the employees, etc. There are also websites like bandmix or join-a-band that can help you find other musicians near you. It's easier to join a band than to start one. If you can't find a full band, at least hook up with someone who can sing so that you can do duo gigs. Duo gigs tend to pay better anyway, at least at first, because you only have to split the money two ways and you can travel more easily and play quieter gigs, which tend to pay better than loud gigs. It will also give you experience on stage if you need that.

If you're not good enough, take guitar lessons and/or teach yourself using YouTube channels like JustinGuitar etc. Practice a lot. Read some theory books and teach yourself songs by ear. But mostly practice.

If you can't get a booking, there are a few things you can do to get started. One is open mic nights. The point of these is not that they directly lead to bookings but that you get stage experience, you can network with people, and you can use it as an opportunity to get photos and video recordings of yourself on a stage for use online in order to get *other* bookings. Plenty of demo recordings were recorded during open mics - there's nothing wrong with that if you have an enthusiastic audience and you play well, and it's a lot cheaper to borrow a decent video camera and stereo field mic than it is to go into a project studio.

You'll need a set of songs you can play - covers are fine for starting out - probably 2 hours of material is good for getting started. That's only 20 songs or so, just sit down with your bandmate(s) and pick out a bunch that you like that you think will appeal to audiences live, learn them, and practice them on your own as well as rehearsing them together. 

You'll need a social media presence and some people you can bring with you. It takes work but at the beginning you will have to bring your own audiences and you will probably not make any money at all. Next, approach other bands and ask if you can open for them and make sure to tell them that you are bringing your own people and you don't need much time, say 25 minutes to play 4 songs. 

Once you have a few real gigs under your belt as an opening band, and you have a good mailing list and a good social media presence started, and some good photos and video of your band, then you can start looking for headlining gigs. This is harder if you live in a big city because there will be a lot of competition for stage space, you may have to travel to areas with a lighter population.

From there it's really just about building a following until you can start being taken seriously when seeking bookings at better and better venues. Opening for other bands is always a great way to get started\u2014even major label acts open for other (bigger) major label acts, it's just how it works. But before you're ready for that, there are always open mics.

You can also create your own gigs by playing at house parties or fraternity/sorority parties or, depending on where you live and the weather, even just playing outside. I have played everywhere from children's clinics at hospitals to streetcorners to restaurants to public school auditoriums to basketball arenas. There are gigs everywhere if you know where to look and you ask.Use this link to find your local NBC station, if you don't already know:

http://www.nbc.com/local-stations

Just search the page (control+F) for the name of your state to see local listings.Weird answers here...

- Cost? That didn't stop Gibson from raising their prices 30% this year. Guitarists don't shop exclusively on price. In fact, a lot of guitarists shop on prestige and think of guitars as [snob goods](http://www.economicshelp.org/blog/790/economics/different-types-of-goods-inferior-normal-luxury/) - we want something more the more it costs. A PRS 10 top sounds no better than a plain maple cap - they are the same species of wood. Guitarists are regularly willing pay many hundreds of dollars extra for things like binding or inlays that have zero effect on tone. I don't think $300 is make-or-break for a flagship guitar costing $3500 like a Gibson or a PRS (an 8.5% difference in price).

- Latency or reliability? Hardly; most pro touring musicians who play big stages use wireless units live. And the bigger problem with latency is actually between the mains and the audience; in fact this has to be taken into account for larger venues with multiple sets of mains and [there are devices that offset the sound distribution](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Ouv2COeoQWw) to account for it.

The real issues are probably that...

- Guitarists don't like battery-powered novelty crap on their guitars. Look at how annoying the robotic tuners on the new Gibsons are. Guitarists, despite being artists, are actually pretty vintage obsessed and dislike change when it comes to those types of things. We like subtle changes like locking tuners, but even something like active pickups are disliked by the majority of players.

- Guitars are designed to last decades, but wireless tech advances much more rapidly than that. Also, frequency bands change according to FCC rules pretty regularly.

- A lot of players prefer playing with cables, either because of tone reasons or because they don't want to mess with setting up a wireless receiver on the other end, or changing batteries/recharging batteries all the time. One of my guitars is a battery-powered guitar (Line 6 Variax) and it is a pain to make sure that I always have a charged battery when I'm ready to play. I actually bought two backup batteries for playing live in case one dies or I don't have time to charge it.Yep! My thinking exactly. I mean what do I know, it's not like I've been playing and teaching for 17 years, been to 160 cities in 8 countries or been featured in Rolling Stone, Billboard Magazine, Entertainment Weekly, People, Time, and on MTV, VH1, Howard Stern, etc, or anything ;)I'm a musician; we have giant egos :D&gt;Most electric guitars have passive pickups. That means that they don't have power sources within them and rely on power from the signal cable to make the pickups work.

?

Passive pickup-equipped electric guitars do not rely on power from the signal cable to make the pickups work.

The pickups have magnets in them that create a magnetic field around the strings. When the field is disrupted with vibrations from the ferrous strings, it sends a passive signal to the amplifier through the cable.

At no point in this process does power go from the amp to the guitar.Actually there is an example of a company that's vertically integrated\u2014they make guitars, wireless units, pedals, multi-FX pedalboard units, AND amplifiers that are all designed to work with each other.

Line 6 makes [guitars with digital outputs](http://line6.com/guitars/) (in addition to standard 1/4"), [wireless transmitter/receiver units](http://line6.com/wireless/#guitarwireless), [pedals](http://line6.com/pedals/#stompbox), [multi-FX units](http://line6.com/multi-effects/), and [amplifiers](http://line6.com/amps/). 

There is no reason that a Line 6 Variax guitar could not have a Line 6 Relay built-in wireless guitar transmitter, nor any reason that a Line 6 HD500X multi-FX unit or Line 6 DT25 amplifier could not have a built-in wireless receiver.

In fact considering that the ideal/recommended way to hook up a Variax to an HD500X floor unit is with a Variax digital cable (looks kind of like an Ethernet cable), there is *really* no reason that they couldn't equip these guitars and multi-FX units with all-digital transmitters and receivers built-in.

My guess is that they don't do this simply because a lot of people would prefer using a $30 Line 6 digital cable to a $200 wireless unit with a battery pack that has to be recharged, especially since most guitarists, most of the time, would be using it for home practice/rehearsal or in home studios or recording studios, and the wireless part is really only needed when performing live.We did it!

Next, let's nail the DFA endorsement:

https://www.reddit.com/r/SandersForPresident/comments/3vt7n4/call_to_action_this_poll_matters_more_than_the/It has to do with grounding. I'll just quote sound engineer Jody Coleman of AudioBahn Productions, since he explained this already so well:

&gt;At times, electric-guitar players can receive an electric shock when they simultaneously touch their guitar and a microphone. This is caused when the guitar amp is plugged into an electrical outlet on stage, and the mixing console (to which the mic is grounded) is plugged into a separate outlet across the room. These two power points may be at widely different ground voltages, so a current can flow between the grounded mic housing and the grounded guitar strings. This occurrence is especially dangerous when the guitar amp and the console are on different phases of the AC mains. It helps to power all instrument amps and audio gear from the same AC distribution outlets. That is, run a heavy extension cord from a stage outlet back to the mixing console (or vice versa). Plug all the power-cord ground pins into grounded outlets. That way, you prevent shocks and hum at the same time. Also, put a foam windscreen on each vocal mic to insulate the guitarist from shocks. As a bonus, a foam windscreen suppresses breath pops better than a metal grille screen.Floyds can be a pain if you are not used to them but they are not so bad. Here's a tutorial that's presented at a total beginner level:

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=YN7qF6JLoIcOP and others reading this:

Don't try to do that unless you're playing a venue that has a very decent monitoring setup, or you use in-ear monitors like /u/gibsondawg does. For bars and small clubs with shitty monitors and an asleep-at-the-wheel soundman who's doing double-duty tending bar &amp; mixing your set, you don't want to rely on a direct output for 100% of your (and your bandmates') ability to hear your guitar.

If you're playing a larger venue with a good PA setup, especially if you have a dedicated monitor engineer, then by all means, everyone loves less stage volume!At some point we all oughtta put our heads together and post a big epic thread here about gigging/touring advice and tips for booking, promotion, money management, etc. If you do, and you find yourself in a situation without good monitoring, it's easy enough to manage.

All you need is a powered monitor. Line 6 makes a series of full-range powered PA speakers called the StageSource lineup that are designed to work as a wedge, a main, a side-fill, or backline depending on what you run into them. They are designed to integrate seamlessly with the POD series or you can run your acoustic guitar, vocals, keyboard, or full mix into them. They have built-in feedback suppression and all sorts of other features.

Or if you're on a budget, you can just get something like a powered wedge in the $150 range.

If you're really stuck, you could even use any guitar amp with an effects loop and just bypass the onboard preamp by going into the effects return, and use the amp's power section and loudspeaker as you would any other guitar amp. Just make sure you turn off the cabinet modeling on your modeler, or it will sound funny.

I've been using modeling preamps live (without backline) since about 2001. Not exclusively, but that's when I started using them live without backline. I have a couple of JBL Eon 15 powered monitors that work just fine for when the venue doesn't have a decent monitoring setup. Usually if that's the case, I will just bring my Line 6 DT25 amp though.You don't play a 2-hour set when you're starting out. Like I said, when you're getting started, an opening set of 25 minutes is just fine.

You need two hours of material because when you bring your friends to see you over and over and over, you don't want to bore them with the same 4 songs each time while you're trying to build a following. They will quickly stop coming if all your shows are exactly the same, especially if you are just the opening act and they had to pay to get in and don't really care about the headliner, ESPECIALLY if they know you are not getting any of that money.

Also you want different songs so you can try them out and see what your audience responds to. Depending on the venue and the night and the band you're opening for (restaurant? house party? opening for a blues band? opening for a heavy rock band?), you will need a variety of sets: some heavy, some alternative, some high-energy, something background-y, etc.I don't have any specific videos to recommend but I'm surprised that you weren't able to find anything on YouTube. I just searched "beginner vocal lessons" and this channel with 350k subscribers came up first. I have no relation to this guy and can't vouch for his videos but it appears that they are similar to Justin Guitar but for voice:

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Q5hS7eukUbQ&amp;list=PL2D20B0E1A509CA38By the way, for others reading this, don't think that Princeton Reverbs are practice amps. Even the reissues are $1000 ea and if he's playing through a stereo setup, that's a couple thousand dollars of backline. Low watt does NOT mean low cost nor does it mean that an amp is designed for budget/bedroom use.Cool. I have some work to get to today but I will start a thread this afternoon, I think!Yeah, 2 hours of material. Even most headliners don't play 2 hour sets these days.Mm, I think that's a bit harsh. David Gilmour certainly doesn't sound like shit. The guitarists for Toby Keith and Miranda Lambert and REO Speedwagon and countless others use them, in addition to the more well-known metal guys like Kirk Hammett etc. 

I have an EMG version of a P90 in one of my jazz guitars. It's a *great* sounding pickup. I think people just assume they sound like shit because they rose to prominence in the '80s where guitar tone generally was scooped-mid shit and that's the association people made. But in a blind listening test, I'm skeptical that you or most others who say they dislike them would actually think they're so bad, if you could even tell reliably which was which.Disagree. Leave them feeling wowed. If you leave them wanting more they will just call for an encore and be pissed when you don't deliver.

The person you want to leave wanting more is whoever booked you, so that they hire you again!I've gigged with a $100 Kustom solid-state 1x8 practice amp before. It's not ideal but you can make it work in a pinch. They are super light, indestructible, easy to dial in a workable tone, and it doesn't matter if they get beat up or stolen.That was a joke, yeah... I meant that the idea is that the audience should love you because you rocked their socks off, and the venue should love you because you made them a boatload of money.That right there is the reason I hate them. I had a [custom neck put on my main recording guitar with specially designed frets](http://i.imgur.com/ZT43Dvs.jpg) that have better intonation than normal frets, because of tuning issues when recording. Why the hell would I pay thousands of dollars for a pro-quality guitar that's only accurate to 5 cents?!Sure. Also, about your comment about pickups, there is one very specific exception to power for pickups coming up the cable, but it's not for passive pickups.

Since active pickups require power, and sometimes there's no way to fit a battery into your guitar without routing it out, EMG makes a pedal that supplies 9V power to your pickups:

http://www.emgpickups.com/pedals/power-supplies/power-supplies/es-9.html

It uses a stereo (TRS) cable to carry the power, unlike a normal guitar cable (TS).&gt;cost is an issue for everyone

Highly disagree. If that were True than there would be no such thing as "guitar collectors" and the "vintage market" would not exist. There are plenty of people who are ready, willing, and able to spend tens of thousands of dollars on a single guitar and $300 means absolutely nothing to them.

Obviously, if we're talking about an expensive, fancy feature like a built-in wireless unit, we are not and never were talking about guitars where budget is an issue. Similarly, you don't see neck &amp; body binding on beginner guitars, etc. We're talking about high-end guitars, so the cost issue is virtually or actually irrelevant.

&gt;Gibson raised their prices to up margin and stay alive

I agree with some of what you wrote about economics but you're looking at this the wrong way. Gibson guitars, like all other consumer products, have an equilibrium price where supply meets demand. If Gibson raised their prices higher than the market would bear, their profit would go *down* because their sales volume would decrease so much that their total revenue would decrease, so that even if their profit margin on each unit was higher and their cost of goods sold remained the same, they would make less money. It's simple price elasticity of demand. Gibson guitars are luxury goods economically speaking, meaning that as income goes up, demand goes up more than you'd expect otherwise, all else being equal. Most Gibson owners are buying for prestige (if they weren't, they would buy an Epiphone). This is different from, for example, necessary goods, where price can go up and demand doesn't really change, because people need to buy it regardless and will economize elsewhere (this is why gasoline can change from $1.89 to $2.49 and people don't suddenly cut their gas consumption by 1/3 - they still have to get to work and they know it).

What keeps price levels where they are is, as you were saying, competition. If Gibson raised their prices *too* much, people will buy used Gibsons instead, or PRS guitars instead. Gibson know this\u2014they did intensive market research on it, in fact. They gambled on a 30% increase - they could have tried a 40% increase or a 20% increase but their market research showed that 30% was a workable number. They have entire marketing departments devoted to this kind of research. The nice thing about raising prices like crazy is that you can always put them on sale if people balk at the prices, but it's a lot harder to raise the price if you're below equilibrium than it is to lower the price if you're above it.

&gt;If cost isn't an issue, I'm sure your collection is made up only of multi thousand dollar custom shop guitars?

[If you're truly curious, actually, yes.](http://i.imgur.com/OhDUrOE.jpg) Not pictured is my main custom-made carved archtop jazz guitar (it was getting a fret dressing when I took this picture), which incidentally is my most expensive guitar. I also have multiple nice acoustics not pictured. The only non-custom-made guitars in this picture are the red '98 American Deluxe Fat Strat in the back right, the Parker Artist Fly in the middle, and the two Gibson hollowbodies, which are a '69 ES-150 and '64 ES-345, left to right.

My point is very simple, though. When we are talking about an expensive unnecessary feature on a guitar, we are not and never were talking about budget instruments. This discussion only applies to flagship guitars in the first place. Gibson doesn't put body/neck/headstock binding on their $700 SG Faded guitars either, because they are budget-minded instruments. They put it on their $4800 Les Paul Customs because those are their flagship guitars and they put everything they have into them, virtually regardless of price.

If we're talking about an expensive feature like a built-in wireless unit, it makes no sense to argue that it's too expensive for budget guitars. That's uncontested. But that doesn't mean cost is the #1 reason it's not on their $4800 guitars. Otherwise those guitars would not have binding or gold hardware etc either.

People who are willing to spend $4800 on a Gibson Les Paul don't want a battery pack for the same reason they don't want robot tuners or active pickups.

Buyers of these guitars, rather, want a guitar that is extremely similar in features and looks and sound to the instruments their childhood guitar heroes played on rock 'n roll hit records when they were teenagers 40 years ago. That's why Gibson hasn't significantly changed the design of the Les Paul for many decades. Gibson has an interesting problem with design in that they need to make small enough changes year-to-year that they have something interesting to show off at NAMM, but not such a radical departure that everyone hates them for messing with a legendary design.

If there were a market demand for instruments with $300 wireless units built in, Gibson would offer them, and so would many other companies. There isn't, though, because there's no huge advantage to having such a system built-in, and a lot of disadvantages (recharging batteries, etc). I can personally testify to how much of a pain it is to have a battery-powered guitar because [I have one of those, too](http://i.imgur.com/ZT43Dvs.jpg)\u2014and they *are* a pain, but it just depends on what you prioritize.

Again, we're talking about high-end guitars here, not budget ones (cost would be a factor on the budget ones). It's the same reason McDonald's\u2014a burger joint\u2014started offering salads and coffees. They were losing business to Subway and Starbucks. McDonald's doesn't actually give a rat's ass if people buy french fries or salad, as long as they are spending their money at McDonald's and not somewhere else. Their goal is to make money for their shareholders.

Major guitar companies are the same.There's no reason Line 6 couldn't offer a wireless digital output (for those connecting to an HD500X etc) *and* a 1/4" output (for those connecting to a regular amplifier).

In fact Line 6 already does this\u2014the Variax guitars have two outputs, a digital RJ45 output and a 1/4" output.&gt;He sounded far better in the 70s-82 than he has after.

Well, that's your opinion. He obviously disagrees or he wouldn't have switched.

&gt;Not artists I listen to a great deal, to be honest. So I can't really make an accurate comment on their tone.

Me neither but my point was simply that there are many EMG users who are not metalheads.

I am willing to bet that in a blind test, if you had 5 guitars equipped with various types of EMGs and 5 guitars equipped with various types of passive pickups, controlling for things like hum and so on (that is, humbuckers or an Ilitch system etc for the passive ones), that you couldn't do significantly better than 50% (the same percentage as random guessing) as far as which were the EMGs and which were the passives. Your chances of getting all 5 right randomly guessing would be about 3% if you listened to each pair of guitars once. Most people's ears aren't as good as they think they are when they actually sit down to do these kinds of tests, in my experience. I encourage you to try it sometime if you are ever in a position to do so.Well, that's your subjective opinion. I grant (and I'm sure so would he) that he's not a guitar prodigy, but he's made a very successful career and defined a generation of metal tones. You can call him overrated if you want but there's a reason they've won 8 Grammys and sold 90 million albums. I'm not claiming that popularity = good tone or that popularity = good musicianship, but it's certainly nonsense to argue that Kirk Hammett is not a guitar god. Something like that!I'm not sure how you (or anyone) can say that someone is "objectively" a shit guitarist considering that is a textbook subjective opinion, and musical ability is an artistic talent that can't really be measured scientifically. What scientific studies are you using to say this objectively? Can you cite your source? Or is this your opinion?

Don't get me wrong; I'm not saying there aren't better guitarists, but your opinion is your opinion, or in your words, "as far as I'm concerned."

If you want something *close* to an objective measurement for something that can't be scientifically measured, the next best thing is expert consensus. Rolling Stone's editors named him the 11th greatest guitarist of all time, and I think it's fair to say they are experts in music, so there's that. Even if you disagree with the ranking as #11, I don't think you can reasonably argue that he doesn't belong in the top 500 or whatever just because *you* don't like him.

Edited to add: Many of the greatest musicians in history did not write their own parts. Guitar is an odd instrument in that it has a folk background rather than a classical background, and performers are often expected to fill two or more roles (composer, arranger, performer, and sometimes even producer when they are in the studio). Itzhak Perlman, Joshua Bell, YoYo Ma, etc do not compose their own parts and they are unquestionably some of the best musicians to ever live. Not writing your own music doesn't make you a con artist unless you don't give credit to the person who actually did write it. And even then, as the great artist Pablo Picasso said: Good artists borrow; great artists steal. &gt;A $6000 CS strat sounds just the same as a Mexi

I agree that there are diminishing returns but it happens way above the Standard Strat (MIM) level, even just talking about tone.

Regardless, the reason to spend $4000 on a CS Strat (the $6k ones are gonna be the masterbuilt one-offs, most are not that expensive) is not just tone but also feel. Great guitars with better fretwork and tighter tolerances in construction can have lower action without buzzing, and they will have things like better shielding, better intonation, better wood (resonates better, lighter weight) etc too.

Rob Chapman and The Captain from Andertons did a shootout between a Squier Strat, an American Strat, and a CS Strat if you are interested in more about this:

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=QnUuUjqHEMU

and here is a blindfold test between a Squier, Mexican, American, and CS Tele:

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=QCEdT2d43jU

Edited to add: The difference between a $4k CS Fender and a Mexican Fender is not nearly as much as the difference between a $4k Suhr/Anderson etc versus a Mexican Fender. CS Fenders are well known to be very high-priced compared to other brands, mostly just because they can.The Line 6 JTV-69 US guitars are $3899 street (MSRP $5599). I'm sure if Line 6 felt like it was a feature people wanted, an extra $300 for built-in wireless would hardly be considered breaking the bank.

It's probably more just that they don't think it's something people really want.Okay, I'm gonna put some serious effort into this, because that's a great question. In no particular order, here are the 10 things that took me from hobbyist level to pro level:

1. Jamming with people better than me.
2. Private lessons with a truly great teacher
3. Practicing with a metronome (it will transform your playing)
4. Learning the difference between practicing, noodling, and rehearsing
5. Learning songs by ear
6. Buying a nylon-string and learning to play some classical
7. Using MUCH less overdrive
8. *Teaching* private lessons
9. Learning about guitar repair and modification
10. Learning how to mix and run sound, mic technique, etc

bonus:

#11. Understanding that playing at a pro level requires multiple hours of daily practice and that *there are no shortcuts*I've got a Trio but I need to pick up a looper. Thanks for the reminder.Agree with /u/OldFrets. Check out a Fluxtone mod:

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=iWINn9sy8xQIt's not going to be easy. He doesn't just have to beat the other candidates; he has to get 67% of the vote or they don't endorse *anyone.* We have to slam-dunk this if we want to get it. That means spreading the word far beyond /r/SandersForPresident - but we can do it!If you're getting tired (NOT pain), then it's just a stamina issue. This will get better with practice.

You are probably pushing down too hard with your fretting hand. For stamina reasons *and* intonation reasons, you should play as gently WITH YOUR LEFT HAND as possible without getting fret buzz. The way that I teach this to my students is as follows:

Pick a string, say the high E string, and fret a note (say the 3rd fret) by pressing down extremely gently, in fact too gently to properly fret the note. Do this while picking about once a second on just that string. Each time you pick, press down baaaarely a bit more. Keep doing this, gradually pressing down harder, just until you get the note to come out cleanly without buzz. THAT'S how hard you should fret with your left hand, and no more. The absolute minimum to get the note to ring out without buzz and without accidentally muting it.

Now, the tough part is that you don't always play that gently with your right hand. With guitar, you control volume in two ways: playing dynamics and electrically. That is, by strumming or picking harder with your right hand, or by the guitar's volume knob/boost pedals/your amp/etc. You DO NOT control volume with your left hand.

In other words, you have to mentally disconnect playing loudly with your right hand (strumming/picking hard) with pressing down hard with your left hand. ALWAYS press down very gently with your left hand, even when you're playing fortissimo with your right hand.

If you play gently with your left hand, it's just a matter of working your way up to playing a few hours a day.

To be clear, all of this advice ONLY APPLIES if you have NO PAIN and the problem is just a sore muscle. A tired hand (a sore muscle in the fleshy part of your palm, at the base of your thumb) is a stamina issue, but if this is a joint issue or any other kind of pain, DO NOT PLAY THROUGH THE PAIN. See a doctor.Gotchya. If you're looking to save some cash and you are truly a bedroom player, my top recommendation is probably the Yamaha THR series or the Roland Cube GX series. I have a Roland Cube GX 40-watt combo myself and it's really great for your application (I use it for teaching lessons). 

If you have no need for portability, there are LOTS of great options that you can hook up to your computer and use with powered monitors (or even just directly to powered monitors), like a Line 6 POD-HD desktop unit or the multi-fx HD500X floor unit, that do a lot more and/or are even less expensive. You will need some good computer speakers/powered monitors to use them, though, or good headphones if you want to play silently. You can get a decent set of powered monitors or good headphones for $150.It's a national organization though. The real advantage of their help is grassroots organizing in the South. Bernie's doing fine in Vermont.If you think my comments are irrelevant or don't contribute to a conversation, you know what to do. From the reddit official wiki:

&gt;If you think something contributes to conversation, upvote it. If you think it does not contribute to the subreddit it is posted in or is off-topic in a particular community, downvote it.

I don't know what pic you're talking about; I haven't posted any pics in this entire thread.Just quickly went through my last 200 comments and didn't see any pics that I posted more than once, unless I missed something. Truly have no idea what you're referring to.Oh, gotchya; I know what pic you're talking about! [That is my usual live rig.](http://i.imgur.com/GftvU3r.jpg) I've posted it a few times, usually in reference to gigging with a backup amp (I gig with 3 amps - a single-channel dirty amp, a single-channel clean amp, and a dual-channel backup). The guitars are made by this guy Michael Rowan. 

I have dozens of guitars and I think 11 amps at the moment. At some point I need to take new pictures, but yeah, sometimes it's a lot easier in a discussion to just to post a photo than to explain what I'm talking about!Very cool! I bet it's a feather. What does it weigh? Do you have any balance problems with the neck diving down when you have it on a strap?There are a million online articles from Guitar Player Magazine, etc that do this already. Not to mention a million forum threads on thegearpage.net, fenderforum.com, harmonycentral, etc etc etc.

If you want to know the tone differences and hardware differences, the manufacturers list this info on their website, or you can just google "Strat vs Tele" and [you'll find half a million hits](https://www.google.com/webhp?sourceid=chrome-instant&amp;ion=1&amp;espv=2&amp;ie=UTF-8#q=strat%20versus%20tele) including full articles from Sam Ash to forum threads on The Telecaster Guitar Forum to even threads right here on Reddit.

Same for different brands. Same for amps.

This would be a LOT of redundant work considering that Google exists and not particularly useful, I think, because of the vast amount of data it would need.Not being a bigot =/= being an ally.Also, uh, see Point #1. The book this talk is based on was published in 1988. The video is obviously not from 2014 or even the last 20 years - 2014 is simply the date this particular file was uploaded to YouTube.

Futher, this is not a documentary; this is a video of a lecture given at American University by Noam Chomsky about political indoctrination and democracy. The uploader doesn't seem to be affiliated with American University and I suspect doesn't have permission to upload this.

How can you even call this a documentary? It's a recording of a single lecture.***If you can afford to donate more upfront rather than spreading it out***, a greater dollar amount in the beginning will help Bernie's campaign more than small donations spread out over time.

It is nice and all to have a PR bragging point of lots of donations, but what he really needs is lots of ACTUAL DOLLARS in order to compete with Hillary's corporate donors. Bernie has already bested her in terms of reaching 1 million donors first and it seems that that he's also beating her in terms of number of individual donors (650k for Bernie; Hillary's team decided not to release their number of donors this time around, which probably means it was less than Bernie's and they don't want to draw attention to that).God dammit. I recently sold my first guitar, had it for 15 years, because I'm unemployed. 

Before I clicked on this thread, I thought to myself, "Man, I hope nobody said 'My first guitar.'"

Top post is "first guitar." Argh!Right but I mean the fact that her team didn't announce them in a mass email or to the press shows that they are not proud of them. They released her total donations in dollars to the press, but not the number of donors.I'd say a person who doesn't particularly care and treats you like anyone else is just a decent, normal person. 

An ally is, specifically and explicitly, an *activist* for LGBTQ rights who is not, themselves, LGBTQ.No. It is a substantive adjective in this case. That means it's an adjective that's acting as a noun (or more accurately, it is substituting for a noun). Your sentence has an implied noun phrase "twelve o'clock" but is only using the adjective "twelve" instead of the whole thing.

A common example of a substantive adjectives is "meek" here:

"The meek [people] shall inherit the Earth."This isn't a dad joke. The point of dad jokes is that they use puns and plays on words so that children can understand them without a knowledge of cultural references and history, and they have to be clean, firstly because that kind of joke is inappropriate for kids and secondly because kids won't get it.I enjoyed the joke, it's just not a "dad joke." It's a regular pun. Dad jokes are a special category of puns that are both clean and don't make use of cultural references.In 2004 I moved to Philadelphia. I only knew two people in the entire city: my aunt and her boyfriend, although I hadn't met the boyfriend yet. They both had to work the night I got there, though, so I wasn't able to hang out with them yet.

My internet wasn't hooked up yet and I didn't feel like unpacking, so I thought I'd drive my car around the city and explore. After maybe half an hour of driving, I gave up on poking around because it was starting to snow really badly. I decided to head home.

I saw a guy walking with his hands stuffed in his pockets and his head down, who was clearly cold and underdressed for the snow. I'm from a smallish town in the Midwest and had never lived in a big city before (the population of metro Philly is about 6 million people). I didn't know you aren't supposed to just randomly offer rides to people in those situations, but naive little me pulled over and asked the guy if he needed a ride to wherever he was going, since I had absolutely nothing else to do. He was heading home from work. I drove him the 6 or 8 blocks or so to his home, which was kinda on the way to my new house anyway.

The next night I had dinner with my aunt and her boyfriend. It turns out that the guy I'd given a ride to was actually her boyfriend.You've clearly never been to Europe.No, that's not True. He has joked about it since the '80s but 2015 was the first time he filed the FEC paperwork.Capsaicin, the chemical in peppers that makes them taste spicy, is activated by water. Water is absolutely the worst thing you could bring someone who is eating something spicy.

Capsaicin is chemically neutralized with dairy fats. The best thing to combat spiciness is something like heavy cream, whole milk, half and half, or as is usually the case in Mexican etc restaurants, sour cream.

If you can't find any dairy fat, the next best thing is just drying out your mouth by holding your mouth open and breathing through it, so that your saliva evaporates (the water in your saliva activates the chemical).

But yeah, don't bring people water in those cases. The ice in ice water may provide artificial, temporary relief by numbing their taste buds, but they will have to continually suck on ice cubes for that to work.

A better idea is to bring them a side dish of sour cream, or hell, even *actual* sliced bread (with butter).

Edited to add:

If you ever get hit in the face with pepper spray or Mace, for the love of god, don't cry. It's the same chemical that's in peppers. The best thing you can do is sit in front of a fan with air blowing into your face. If you can't find a fan, hold your eyes open to dry them out. How long afterwards?Well water on its own is clear.

Ocean water varies depending on where you're getting it from because it has all sorts of crap in it.

Usually it's greenish brown, though. But I wouldn't say it's *wrong* to call it blue. When you look at it from the top of a cliff, or from an airplane window, it is in fact blue. It's just not blue if you get some and put it in a bucket.

I mean, at night, it's black. It's not *wrong* to call it black at night. It depends on your vantage point.That's what an urban legend *is.*You're a blogger, Wikipedia contributor, YouTube personality, etc?The Person of the Year is awarded to whoever has the biggest influence on history. It explicitly is value neutral.Sure, but I think a much more useful - and True - title would have made it clear that this is an urban legend. That's the exact opposite of what your title says right now.&gt;All posts must make an attempt at humor.Here's a version you can actually read, for those having trouble with the dark image:

http://i.imgur.com/YOFIyUk.jpgSource:

Debate transcript
http://www.nytimes.com/2015/10/14/us/politics/democratic-debate-transcript.html

Results in text format:

- Lincoln Chaffee: 282 words, "I" mentions: 16
- Jim Webb: 352 words, "I" mentions: 10
- Martin O'Malley: 384 words, "I" mentions: 10
- Hillary Clinton: 435 words, "I" mentions: 14
- Bernie Sanders: 261 words, "I" mentions: 1

P.S.

Bernie's sole mention was in this context:
"I think most Americans understand that our country today faces a series of unprecedented crises."Here's another way to visualize the same information. This is charted as a percentage of total words in each 2-minute opening statement that were "I," "I'm," or "I've:

http://i.imgur.com/xMcPlIW.pngGood call. Martin O'Malley said "My" once:

"My name is Martin O\u2019Malley, former Mayor of Baltimore, former governor of Maryland, a life long democrat, and most importantly, a husband, and a father."

and Bernie Sanders said "me" once:

"It seems to me that instead of building more jails and providing more incarceration, maybe \u2014 just maybe \u2014 we should be putting money into education and jobs for our kids."

as did Hillary:

"But for me, this is about bringing our country together again."Time.com's poll got a similar result.Actually I'd argue that's not quite True. Most voters are 45 or older:

http://www.pewresearch.org/files/2014/11/FT_2014.Midterm.Exit_.Poll_.Ages_.png

Source:
http://www.pewresearch.org/fact-tank/2014/11/05/as-gop-celebrates-win-no-sign-of-narrowing-gender-age-gaps/I can but it would take awhile. I'm not sure how useful that would be actually: Counting the "I" mentions is actually likely not the ideal measure of how much someone talks about themselves versus the issues, because there are a lot of ways to use the word "I" and still talk about the issue as the core point of your sentence or phrase. A better (but much more subjective) measure would be to count each statement point-by-point, but that would take a really long time. Also you'd have to figure in how much screen time each candidate had if you wanted an accurate representation of the ratio, rather than just absolute mentions, which means you'd have to watch a recording of the debate rather than use a transcript, or do it by word count, which is even more subjective. I completely agree, however the more you look at context, the more subjective your measure gets.Sure. What it really means is that a Sanders win would require a better youth turnout than in the '14 midterms or in the 2012 election. He has said so himself on the campaign trail as well. A lot of his policies disproportionately matter to and affect young people so it makes sense that 1) they are more fired up in support of him and 2) they will turn out in better numbers than in the midterms. Examples of these policies include universal health care, tuition free public colleges, Black Lives Matter, and many others.I disagree. I wrote about why a month ago and he's actually doing even better since then, having picked up two active political endorsements, breaking the record for passing the 1 million donations mark, and increasing his donations from 1st quarter by 70% (while Hillary's are down by 40% from Q1):

www.midmoforbernie.org/can-bernie-win-the-democratic-nomination/The only time any of the candidates referred to themselves in the third person in their opening statements was when Jim Webb said:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."To clarify I was counting mentions of "I," "I'm, and "I've," not necessarily "I-messages," which are "assertion about the feelings, beliefs, values etc. of the person speaking." There may be some uses of "I" that are not assertions about feelings, beliefs, or values, but rather about the issues, depending on context.Yes. This chart does not take context into account. For example, Bernie Sanders' sole mention of "I" was in this context:

&gt;"I think most Americans understand that our country today faces a series of unprecedented crises."I saw that, but it was too late. Oops :P I only looked at opening statements for this chart.

The only candidate who talked about themselves in the third person during their opening statement was Jim Webb, who did so once. Here is the context:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."Good point, thank you for your comment.As another Redditor pointed out, I also didn't take into account "me" or "my," which would count for 1 more for O'Malley, 1 more for Clinton, and 1 more for Sanders.This chart is explicitly only looking at each candidate's 2-minute opening statement.This chart is explicitly only looking at each candidate's 2-minute opening statement.Yes, the labels are reversed by mistake. I apologize.Is that for the whole debate? Did you count "I'm" and "I've" as well? Someone else also suggested "me" and "my" as well as mentions of oneself in the third person.

Thanks for your comment.No. This chart is only looking at each candidate's 2-minute opening statement.The labels are flipped. Sorry about that.Sanders didn't refer to himself in the third person during his 2-minute opening statement, which is the only wording analyzed for this chart.

Of the other candidates, Jim Webb was the only one who referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement. Here's the context:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."This chart is only looking at each candidate's 2-minute opening statement.It's Reddit!This chart only looked at each candidate's opening statement. During their opening statements, only one of the candidates referred to himself in the third person (Jim Webb). That was not counted in this chart though, because it wasn't an "I" mention.I'll take that into account for future submissions here. Thanks for your feedback.This chart is only looking at each candidate's opening statement. The only candidate who referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement was Jim Webb. Here is the context:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."This chart is only looking at each candidate's opening statement. The only candidate who referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement was Jim Webb. Here is the context:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."This chart is only looking at each candidate's opening statement. The only candidate who referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement was Jim Webb. Here is the context:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."I'll take your suggestions into account for future submissions. Thank you.I agree. Please draw your own conclusions about the meaning of this data. It would have been better if I didn't say "as a measure of how much they talked about themselves versus the issues" because this is not an ideal way to measure that, especially considering it's absolute mentions rather than taking context into account, AND although each candidate had the same two minutes, their word counts varied by some 40%.This chart is only looking at each candidate's opening statement. The only candidate who referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement was Jim Webb. Here is the context:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."I agree actually, I talked about this in some other comments here. Context matters, and also this doesn't take into account differences in word count, although each candidate did have the same 2 minutes to speak. The word counts varied by something like 40% between Clinton (who said the most words in her opening statement) and Sanders (who said the fewest). This chart is only looking at each candidate's opening statement. The only candidate who referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement was Jim Webb. Here is the context:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."This chart is only looking at each candidate's opening statement. The only candidate who referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement was Jim Webb. Here is the context:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."I agree; if you take into account "me" and "my," then O'Malley gets +1, Clinton gets +1, and Bernie gets +1.

If you take into account third person mentions, then Webb also gets +1.

Keep in mind that this chart is only looking at each candidate's opening statement. The only candidate who referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement was Jim Webb. Here is the context:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."

Other shortcomings of this chart:

- It only accounts for absolute mentions, not a ratio of "I" words to total words spoken during their opening statements. Although each candidate had the same 2 minutes, they weren't abruptly cut off at 2 minutes, and some candidates didn't use all of their time. In fact the word count varied by about 40% between Sanders (who said the fewest words) and Clinton (who said the most).
- It doesn't take into account context. It's very possible to talk about an issue using "I" and to talk about yourself not using "I."This chart is only looking at each candidate's opening statement. The only candidate who referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement was Jim Webb. Here is the context:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."If you take into account "me" and "my," then O'Malley gets +1, Clinton gets +1, and Sanders gets +1.

If you take into account third person mentions, then Webb gets +1.

Keep in mind that this chart is only looking at each candidate's opening statement. The only candidate who referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement was Jim Webb. Here is the context:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."This chart is only looking at each candidate's opening statement. The only candidate who referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement was Jim Webb. Here is the context:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."I agree. Taking context into account, although subjective, would give a more accurate picture if you're trying to see how much someone talks about themselves versus the issues. For example, most people would agree that saying something you believe is talking about yourself. It's explicitly an "I-statement." Saying you are committed to something is also a values statement, another explicit "I-statement." So do those count as talking about themselves or talking about the issues? 

There are shortcomings whether you count absolute mentions or context. This chart counts absolute mentions.

More info on "I-statements":
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/I-messageThis chart is only looking at each candidate's opening statement. The only candidate who referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement was Jim Webb. Here is the context:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."This chart is only looking at each candidate's opening statement. The only candidate who referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement was Jim Webb. Here is the context:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."Unfortunately I don't; I used an online bar graph tool and would have to recreate it. It would be faster to just photoshop them into place.This chart is only looking at each candidate's opening statement. The only candidate who referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement was Jim Webb. Here is the context:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."I also posted that chart in the comments but it got buried. Here's another link. I apologize that the axes are again reversed, but the hard numbers are there:

http://i.imgur.com/xMcPlIW.pngI'm not a paid shill. I have volunteered for my city's local volunteer group that supports Bernie Sanders. That group is not officially part of the Bernie Sanders campaign and none of us are paid. 

I agree that there are shortcomings in the way the data are presented here. Mostly that it doesn't take context into account, but the usefulness of counting "I" statements as a measure of talking about oneself versus the issues is for you to judge. I simply counted the absolute numbers and posted them. The takeaway is up to you. Feel free to criticize the methodology but please don't assert things as fact that are False, eg that I'm a shill, and that you would have no way of knowing, anyway.

Thanks.Actually both parts of that are False. Keep in mind that this chart only examines each candidate's opening statement. Sanders didn't refer to himself in the third person at all during his opening statement. As far as your "only person" part, one other candidate actually did refer to himself in the third person during his opening statement, and that candidate was Jim Webb. Here is the context: 

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."she/herPossibly. Part of the problem with taking "context" into account is that it's subjective. For example, Bernie Sanders' sole mention of "I" was in this context:

&gt;"I think most Americans understand that our country today faces a series of unprecedented crises."

Is that a statement about what he thinks - and therefore a statement about himself? It would appear so.

Or is it a statement about the issues - specifically that America is facing a series of crises?

There's no clear answer, and that's why I opted for absolute mentions of "I" rather than getting into the mess of context.

One thing that might have helped, though, is looking at the RATIO of "I" statements to total words, since as I said, although each candidate had the same 2 minutes, they weren't abruptly cut off at 2 minutes, and some candidates didn't use all of their time. In fact the word count varied by about 40% between Sanders (who said the fewest words) and Clinton (who said the most).

If you want to look at the percentage of use of the word "I" (or "I'm" or "I've") versus other words, here is that chart:

http://i.imgur.com/xMcPlIW.png

Note that this doesn't take into account "me" or "my," nor third-person mentions of oneself. 

If you take into account "me" and "my" then O'Malley, Clinton, and Sanders each get +1 on the absolute chart.

If you take into account references to oneself in the third person, then Webb gets +1.This chart is only looking at each candidate's opening statement. The only person who referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement was Jim Webb, who did so once, in this context:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."Having volunteered for some cause doesn't equal being a shill. The fact that I've never been paid for it\u2014that's what a volunteer means\u2014explicitly means that I *can't* be a shill. I was not asked to do this by anyone and I wouldn't abuse Reddit's rules in that way even if I had been. You are accusing me of being dishonest about who I am and why I'm here on Reddit, and I don't take that lightly. You are wrong, and now you're trying to be sarcastic to mock me for it. I value my integrity.

There's not much point in arguing about it, though. I have told you who I am and the fact that I'm not getting paid. Do we have a rule now that you can't make Reddit posts about politics unless you're an undecided voter? Really? Because that is news to me, if so.This chart only examines each candidate's opening statement. Only one candidate referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement (Jim Webb). Here is the context for that:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."Actually it would hardly change at all. This chart only examines each candidate's opening statement. Only one candidate referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement (Jim Webb). Here is the context for that:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."This chart only examines each candidate's opening statement. Only one candidate referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement (Jim Webb). Here is the context for that:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."I know, but I noticed after I posted it. Thanks though. I'll pay closer attention to that in the future.The transcript is in my first comment, per /r/dataisbeautiful rules, but it got buried. Here's another link:

http://www.nytimes.com/2015/10/14/us/politics/democratic-debate-transcript.htmlThis chart only examines each candidate's opening statement. Only one candidate referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement (Jim Webb). Here is the context for that:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."This chart only examines each candidate's opening statement. Only one candidate referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement (Jim Webb). Here is the context for that:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."This chart only examines each candidate's opening statement. Only one candidate referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement (Jim Webb). Here is the context for that:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."Yes, they are, but what does that have to do with the title of the post? You can't even see the axes until you click on the title.Cute but actually False. Jim Webb talked about himself in the third person in his opening statement:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."

Also this chart is only looking at opening statements, and so it would be zero across the board except for Webb with 1.This chart is only looking at the candidates' opening statements. While not represented in this chart, the only candidate who talked about himself in the third person during his opening statement was Jim Webb:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."Yes, there are significant shortcomings and I appreciate the feedback I've gotten in the comments (well, most of it - some of the comments have been hateful and have even attacked the fact that I'm transgender, which has absolutely nothing to do with this submission).

Aside from the visualization itself, and the error with the axes, it doesn't take into account "me" or "my" or third person references to oneself.

If you take into account "me" and "my," then O'Malley gets +1, Clinton gets +1, and Bernie gets +1.

If you take into account third person mentions, then Webb also gets +1.

Keep in mind that this chart is only looking at each candidate's opening statement. The only candidate who referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement was Jim Webb. Here is the context:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."

Other shortcomings of this chart:

- It only accounts for absolute mentions, not a ratio of "I" words to total words spoken during their opening statements. Although each candidate had the same 2 minutes, they weren't abruptly cut off at 2 minutes, and some candidates didn't use all of their time. In fact the word count varied by about 40% between Sanders (who said the fewest words) and Clinton (who said the most).
- It doesn't take into account context. It's very possible to talk about an issue using "I" and to talk about yourself not using "I."

I will keep the constructive criticism in mind for future submissions.This chart only examined the candidates' opening statements. Third-person references were not included, but if they were, only Jim Webb's mentions would be affected. He is the only candidate who referred to himself in the third person during the opening statements. Here is the context of his mention:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."This chart only looked at the candidates' opening statements. Only one candidate spoke about himself in the third person during his opening statement and that was Jim Webb. Since it was not an "I" mention it is not included in this chart, however, if you wanted to include those mentions, it would only affect Webb's score here.

This is the context for his third person mention:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."This chart only looked at the candidates' opening statements. Only one candidate spoke about himself in the third person during his opening statement and that was Jim Webb. Since it was not an "I" mention it is not included in this chart, however, if you wanted to include those mentions, it would only affect Webb's score here.

This is the context for his third person mention:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."I also posted per word as a comment but it got buried. Here is a chart showing the percentage of total words spoken that were "I" words:

http://i.imgur.com/xMcPlIW.pngThis chart is only looking at each candidates' opening statement, as it says in the post title and at the title in the top of the chart itself.Welcome to Reddit.Keep in mind that this chart is only looking at each candidate's opening statement. The only candidate who referred to himself in the third person during his opening statement was Jim Webb. Here is the context:

&gt;"You may be sure that in a Webb administration, the highest priority will be the working people who every day go out and make this country stronger at home, and who give us the right reputation and security overseas under a common sense foreign policy."Lots of people did the same thing; no worries.Line 6 also has an undeserved reputation among non-pros for making gear that is just OK.

In a blind test, I'm willing to bet you couldn't tell which is which between a real $50,000 Dumble Overdrive Special and a Line 6 Helix model with greater than 50% accuracy (the same as guessing). I've been recording and playing sessions for 15 years and I can't.

I think the reason Line 6 has the reputation they do is that when people think of Line 6 tone, they think of Line 6 technology from the year 2001 - the original kidney bean POD. That was a huge technological breakthrough at the time, but it didn't sound as good, especially the clean tones, as an old Fender, etc. People liked them because they were versatile, lightweight, tough (no tubes), and a good value.

But the truth is, digital modeling tech has advanced a *lot* in the last 15 years. Look at notebooks, for example. Remember the iBook from Apple? In 2001, a top-of-the-line $1500 (in today's dollars) computer had a 600 megahertz processor, 128 megabytes of RAM, and a 20 gigabyte hard drive. You can get a micro SD card with 60% more storage space than that today for under $10. Modeling technology has made similar improvements.

Most modem studios use plugins with good reason. They are faster, easier, cheaper, lower noise, and sound as good or better than a half-million dollars worth of vintage tube amps, and you don't even have to get up from the desk to reamp. Ask any professional producer. They use Universal Audio, Amp Farm, etc because they love it, not because they're cheap or lazy or don't care about tone. These are guys who can afford anything they want and they choose Line 6. It's 2015; guitar amplification has improved since 1955, just like everything else.Others have said it below, but since you asked on my comment, I'll respond, too:

* Thin profile. Anything less than 0.9" deep is considered very thin
* Relatively flat fingerboard radius, or a compound radius. Anything around 12" or so is on the fast side of things. Some guitars have compound radii up to 16" or even 20"
* Big frets. Medium jumbo is about the smallest you will see on these types of guitars
* Fast guitars are generally designed to be set up with low action and lighter strings. For example, Parker guitars come from the factory with the action set at .070" on the bass side. It's rare to see these types of guitars with anything heavier than 0.010" to 0.046" (10-46) strings unless they are extended range guitars and/or long-scale guitars
* Commonly, these types of guitars will have easy access to the upper register. Often they have 2 full octave necks (24 frets), too$1500 is, I think, extremely reasonable considering what you get. Even if you ONLY used it for effects, it's the same price as about 5 boutique pedals ($1000), a multi power supply ($150), a pedal board ($200), and 3 high-quality patch cables ($75).

And that's not even considering the amp modeling, the cab modeling, the mic modeling, the interface functionality for computer-based recording, the integration with Variax guitars, etc.

The Helix technology is also more advanced and newer to market than the Axe FX 2 (which came out 3 years ago) or the Kemper (which came out 2 years ago). Considering that Petrucci actually does have a signature model now, and it's NOT through Ibanez, I would recommend also trying one of his Ernie Ball signature guitars before you buy an Ibanez, to see if you're missing out on anything. There must have been some reason he decided to switch.I strongly disagree. In my line of work I have personally met and talked shop with multiple people who have designed their own signature models through various companies\u2014Joe Bonamassa, B.B. King, Buddy Guy, Bonnie Raitt, Dick Dale, Kenny Wayne Shepherd, Roscoe Beck, and many others. There are certainly ghost builders out there and I'm not denying that this is an issue for some musicians, but the fact is, if your budget allows you to afford any gear you want, and your livelihood depends on your signature tone, you don't sign an endorsement deal for a signature model with a company\u2014agreeing to appear publicly only with their instruments, perform only with their instruments, etc\u2014if you don't think they make the best gear you've ever played.Either "became" or "has become" is grammatically correct. Which one is best for your sentence depends on what you are trying to say.Yes. It's called an introductory clause.My old Crybaby used to do this. It's just interference. It's easy for us to forget sometimes but there are LOTS of signals going through the air constantly. If you have a amp turned on, sometimes you get an unintended radio thing. It's nothing to worry about.What's your budget? That should be your first consideration for microphones.

There are some very classic microphones that are ideal for electric guitar cabs, and some other classic microphones that are ideal for acoustic guitars. There is some overlap but not really at the budget end of things.

A Shure SM57, as others have mentioned, is one of the best-known mics out there. It's versatile. You can use it on snare drums, on toms, on electric guitar speaker cabs... you CAN use it for vocals and for acoustic guitars, but it's not as good for those applications. Lots of producers have done so with good results, though.

An SM57 is a dynamic mic. Generally speaking, a condenser mic is a better option for acoustic guitars and vocals. One of the best known condensers for acoustic guitars is the Shure SM81. It's also great as an overhead mic for a drum kit (for cymbals). 

If you have a decent budget, there are some great mics that are good for electric guitar cabs AND acoustic guitars. For example, the Shure KSM44 is good for just about anything. You can use it for acoustic, electric, vocals, drum overheads, kick drum, bass guitar, you name it. If I could choose only 1 mic, that would probably be it. They are about $1000 new.

If that's out of your budget, another great option is the Blue Baby Bottle. It's about $400 new. It has a little less high-end response than a Shure KSM44, but is equally versatile.

If you are very new to audio recording, you might actually want something completely different. The reason I say this is that if you are using the types of mics mentioned above, you will also need a good preamp, which will add to your expense.

Depending on your budget and application, this might be more what you want. It's kind of an all-in-one field recorder that has mics designed for a wide variety of applications, from whole room recordings to close-up recordings of amps and acoustic guitars and so on. You can plug it directly into your computer and it also has WiFi. Because it has multiple mics already arranged, you don't have to worry about mic placement as much either. 

http://www.sweetwater.com/store/detail/DR44WL

I also strongly recommend learning about mic placement and recording techniques. There are two books I'd recommend: "Behind the Glass" by Howard Massey and "The Yamaha Sound Reinforcement Handbook" by Gary Davis and Ralph Jones.The biggest difference between a 57 and a 58 is the upper-mid hump that helps vocals cut through the mix a little better.

Both have built-in grills. You can also put a windscreen on either of them in addition to that if you are recording outside.Pat Metheny, Bill Frissel, Jim Hall, John Scofield, Barney Kessel, Al Di Meola, Larry Carlton, Allan Holdsworth, Mike Stern, John McLaughlin, Jeff Beck, and Charlie Hunter should be on your list. That oughta keep you busy for the next 50 years or so, LOL.

Edit: You wanted specific albums. Okay, I'd start with Jeff Beck's "Blow by Blow." Jim Hall and Pat Metheny did an album together in '99 so probably that next. "Still Warm" for John Scofield. Mike Stern's "Play." George Benson's "Breezin'" belongs on this list. That should be a good start.There are all-in-one amps that can run both a vocal mic and a guitar input at the same time. Roland is the best known maker of these types of amps. You're not going to find anything like this for $100, but you might be able to find a used multi-channel Roland Cube somewhere in the $200 range if you poke around Reverb.com:

http://www.musiciansfriend.com/amplifiers-effects/roland-cube-street-battery-powered-stereo-guitar-combo-amp

I own two Roland Cube amps and they're really pretty great for what they are: lightweight, versatile, tough, loud, and good for a variety of different situations. I have a Roland Cube 40GX, which is a 40-watt modeling solid state combo, and I also have a Roland Cube Street EX, which is a 4-channel battery powered amp. It can run an acoustic guitar, an electric guitar, a keyboard, and vocals all at the same time, all on a battery (or plugged in), and it sounds great doing it. It was $500. 

http://www.sweetwater.com/store/detail/CubeStEX

Watch some YouTube video reviews and see what you think. It sounds like the standard Cube Street might be what you want (the first link above).I strongly disagree with /u/ChuckEye. If your budget is $1500, *please* spend the bulk of this on your amp. You can get quite a nice bass for $500 used, but if you want to play out a band setting, you are going to need some serious firepower as far as your amp is concerned, much more than $500 worth. Bass amps simply cost more than guitar amps do in order to get the same volume and power, and you have to spend a decent amount of money to get one loud enough to play alongside a drummer.

For $1500, for playing Hendrix and some alt-rock, here's my recommended rig:

Fender Standard Precision Bass, MIM, used, ~$400 on Reverb.com

Markbass 4x10 cab (you can save $200-300 if you find a used one):
http://www.guitarcenter.com/Markbass/Standard-104HF-Front-Ported-Neo-4x10-Bass-Speaker-Cabinet.gc

Markbass Little Mark head (you can save $100-200 if you find a used one):
http://www.guitarcenter.com/Markbass/Little-Mark-III-Bass-Amp-Head.gcIt's arguably jazz. I think it counts as jazz fusion.

I briefly got to play his main Fender Custom Shop 1995 J.W. Black-built white Strat back in 1999. What a resonant guitar! I'm more of a humbucker user but it made me want a Strat.I really don't remember - it was 15 years ago, haha. It vibrated really well in my hands.I'm really lucky; I've gotten to meet a lot of big name people in my life, Fiona Apple, Joe Bonamassa, Buddy Guy, The Avett Brothers, Ryan Adams, BB King, Bonnie Raitt, a bunch of others. I played professionally for a number of years, and these days I'm a civil rights activist, so I run into a lot of people who are well-known just in the course of my work.**The first questions to ask are: What kind of music do you play? and What is your budget?**

The thing with pedals is that there are a whole bunch of different kinds and they all do different things.

A **multi-FX unit** is not a bad idea if you are on a limited budget. The upside is that you get a bunch of different types of effects for a great price. The downside is that if you are new to pedals, you really need the experience of trying out a bunch of different kinds to learn what kinds of effects do what, how they work together, and how adjusting the knobs changes your tone overall.

I would recommend a couple of pedals to get you started:

0) If you don't already have a good **tuner,** that should probably be your top priority. The TC Electronic Polytune is a popular choice. I use a strobe tuner that is more precise than most pedal tuners called a Sonic Research Turbo Tuner ST-200, but is probably overkill unless you are also using it as a bench tuner for guitar repair and setups, and/or doing studio session work.

1) Since neither of your amps has **reverb,** I would start with that. Reverb is an *essential* effect, so essential that it is built into many amps. There are a couple of classic reverb units you might consider. I like the TC Electronic Hall of Fame.

2) **Dirt** is probably the second most-common pedal. There are three different kinds of dirt pedals: Boost/overdrive, distortion, and fuzz. Overdrive pedals come in two varieties: transparent and colored. A boost/overdrive pedal is designed to simulate the sound of a cranked tube amp. It will give you a nice, gritty breakup, ideal for blues or classic rock soloing. Distortion is more of a heavy rock sound and can be used for either crunchy rhythm or bright, heavy lead tones. Fuzz is more of a "noise" type effect and is generally reserved for leads. Jimi Hendrix is a famous fuzz user.

There are are more varieties of these types of pedals than any other kind, so you'll really need to just try a whole bunch of them to see what you like. Everyone has their favorites. Some classics are the Ibanez Tubescreamer for a colored tone and the Klon and its various copies (the Electro Harmonix Soul Food is extremely popular) for a transparent tone. My personal favorites that I use the most are the Wampler Dual Fusion and the JHS Sweet Tea. Both of these are dual effects pedals, meaning they are basically two pedals in a single enclosure. But really, you just need to try a whole bunch and see what you like. For fuzz, again there are a million of them, but the Arbiter Fuzz Face is probably the best known. I use a Way Huge Swollen Pickle fuzz and also a Wampler Velvet Fuzz.

3) I also highly recommend a **compressor** pedal. You probably don't need to use a compressor while you have an overdrive pedal on, but for playing clean, a compressor is really helpful. In my opinion it's one of the most underappreciated types of effects out there. If you want to tell a real professional player from a hobbyist, probably the easiest way to tell is to look at their pedalboard and check to see if they have a compressor. Most pro session guitarist I know use a compressor religiously. It's a subtle difference but an important one. I use a Keeley 4-knob compressor, which is more or less an industry standard.

4) You will probably also want a **delay** pedal. There are a million of them out there and it really just depends on your budget. I recommend getting one with a tap tempo. For something simple that works, check out a TC Electronic Flashback Mini. If your budget allows, my favorite is either the Strymon TimeLine or the Diamond Memory Lane Junior.

Beyond reverb, dirt, a compressor, and a delay, it really just depends on what kinds of music you play and what sounds you want. Other fun effects are a **wah,** an **octave** pedal, and a **tremolo** effect. There are many, many more, but those are probably the most common.Actually the piezo does not work at all, through either amp. I'm not sure if that's related or not. But the magnetic pickups should still work. The jack is a stereo/mono switching jack, meaning that if you have a mono cable plugged in, it automatically switches to a summed mono signal. I am using mono cables. The stereo/mono switch on the guitar doesn't change anything when I push it. It still doesn't work through the Line 6 but does work through the DV Mark. I tried changing the battery and that also had no effect.I am only using mono cables. The jack is a automatic switching jack, meaning that it senses whether you're using a TRS or TS cable and acts accordingly. If you are using a TS cable, it sums the output from the piezo pickup and the magnetic pickups to mono, and just uses the 3-way switch on the guitar (magnetics only, magnetics + piezo, or piezo only) to determine which signal to send to the output. 

I tried switching the stereo/mono switch on the guitar but it had no effect. I also tried changing the battery and it had no effect.I know, right?

Yes, I've tried multiple other guitars, both active and passive. All my other guitars work through the Line 6 totally normally - only the Parker doesn't.

The Fly does not have a coil tap.The guts in mine aren't stock. It has 4 knobs, a 3-way switch, and a 3-way toggle on the top of the guitar, and a mono/stereo switch on the side next to the 9V battery.

The four knobs are:

1) Magnetic volume 

2) Magnetic tone

3) Piezo volume

4) Piezo tone

The 3-way Les Paul style switch is:

1) Neck magnetic pickup only
2) Both magnetic pickups
3) Bridge magnetic pickup only

The 3-way mini toggle is:

1) Magnetic pickups only

2) Magnetic pickups + piezo pickup

3) Piezo pickup onlyHere's a pic:

http://i.imgur.com/DyHIEzO.jpgI haven't, but considering that other guitars work through the same amp and cable, I know that the speaker works properly. I think it must be something about the output of the Parker, or resistance of the input on the Line 6, that together makes the Parker/Line 6 signal chain not work. If there was something wrong with the speaker out, then my other guitars should not work either, but they do.I will post again when I figure it out, haha. *If* I figure it out!It's a recent purchase. I bought it used (it's a 1997 model). It's done this since I bought it, if that helps!The Parker works on my other two tube amps (Fargen Custom Shop Blackbird 30-watter and Fender Super-Sonic 60-watter), although it is a decent bit quieter through those amps than my other guitars. 

Turning the Line 6 up makes no difference. Nothing is coming through with the Parker plugged in. Weird, huh?I don't think it has the ability to click it in different amounts like that. It doesn't feel like it - it's just either plugged in, or it's not plugged in all the way. When it's not plugged in all the way, nothing comes out. I'm using a standard TS guitar cable.I'll try that. I have their email address. I think it's probably something with the amp, though, all that's likely what they will say, since the Parker works as it's supposed to through all my other amps.Also, how do you like your Helix? I'm thinking about getting one. I also have a JTV-69 and the DT25 I mentioned here.It's possible. The jacks on older Parker Flys are, apparently, notorious for failing.woman* :DSnark tuners are totally fine. I have a bunch of them and use them for practicing unplugged, which is usually how I practice. You can skip a tuner pedal for the foreseeable future if you're happy with your Snark.

The two questions that will make it much easier to give specific recommendations are what kind of music do you play? and what is your budget?How do you know that? Is that True?It seems like you are reading into it quite a bit. His EB signature model is quite different from anything Ibanez produces stock. Do you have a link to this interview?Did he say they paid him a bunch of money to switch brands? Did he say "a bunch" or is that your wording? Where did you get that part specifically that he was paid to switch brands? What was the dollar amount? I am skeptical.Okay, that helps a lot!

So for a $300 budget, and the fact that you mentioned Muse specifically, I *highly* recommend a multi-FX unit. I'll start by telling you which units I recommend, and then I'll explain why I recommend one over individual pedals.

My first choice would be a Line 6 M9, which you can find [used for $250](https://reverb.com/marketplace?condition=used&amp;query=line+6+m9).

If you want to spend a bit extra, you can add on a [used Mission Engineering expression pedal controller for another $80](https://reverb.com/marketplace?query=mission+engineering+ep-1+l6+expression+pedal), which will let you also use it as a wah pedal and a volume pedal.

My other recommendation would be a Tech 21 Fly Rig 5. They are $249 new or you can possibly find a used one for less on Reverb.com.

As for why: Matthew Bellamy of Muse uses a LOT of effects. So many, in fact, that he uses a MIDI-based controller rather than actually having his individual pedals all set up on stage. Some of the sounds he's known for using are whammy, chorus, fuzz, octave, drive, flanger, octave, compressor, and an EQ.

For $300, you're going to get, at best, 2-3 effects if you buy individual pedals. I have several individual pedals that were more than $300 each, for example. Don't forget that you will also need patch cables and power supplies for each pedal, which will run you about $30 per pedal together. So, if you buy two $120 pedals, two $15 cables, and two $15 power supplies, that is your entire $300 budget. Alternatively, you could buy three cheaper $70 pedals, three $15 cables, and three $15 power supplies, and that would also be your entire $300 budget.

If you go the multi-FX unit route, all you need to buy is the multi-FX unit and a single guitar cable (to go from the unit to your amp), and you're all set. They come with their own power supplies, and because everything is in one box, you don't need to buy any patch cables. A multi-FX unit lets you use many different effects at once, far more than you could afford with the same budget if you bought individual pedals. 

Each of the units I recommended above has advantages and drawbacks. I'll start with the Line 6.

The Line 6 unit has MANY effects built into it. Like, 70. It has multiple types of overdrives, distortions, fuzzes, delays, reverbs, choruses, flangers, phasers, modulation effects, you name it. Everything you could possible want. The M9 unit is designed to be easy to use as far as multi-FX units go, but the downside is that it is still pretty complicated. If you are new to pedals, it might be confusing and have more options than you want. 

The reason I like the Line 6 is that there is a huge network of people who have programmed famous songs and famous musician's signature tones. You can download these from the Line 6 website (and submit your own). If there is a specific song you like and want to nail that tone, you can request it on their forum and someone will likely be able to tell you how to get it from your unit, if not provide you with a patch you can simply download. The crowdsourcing abilities that come with the Line 6 really cannot be overstated. There is a whole community of people on that forum ready to help you get your ideal tones and you can simply download exactly what you want. It's awesome.

The other reason I like it is that it has a tuner and a looper included. A tuner is handy for obvious reasons, and a looper is a GREAT learning tool for new guitarists. It lets you record a simple rhythm part, and then it plays it back for you so you can practice soloing over it. Since you seem to be saying you are pretty new to the instrument and are intending to mostly play at home and learn how to get better, I would actually change my previous recommendation of a compressor and suggest a looper as one of the first pedals you buy. This unit has one built in.

Another *major* advantage of the Line 6 unit is that it has a global tap tempo. That means you can set your tempo just once, and it will automatically adjust the timed effects (delay, chorus, tremolo, etc) so they all match up. Some people use multi-FX units instead of individual pedals just for this feature alone.

The downside of the Line 6 unit is that it's not as straightforward as individual pedals. It's an important part of the learning process to see all the various knobs laid out in front of you, and to get the hang of turning them and seeing what each knob does and how they work together. You don't quite get that experience with the Line 6 as easily as you do with individual pedals. However, you do get the trade-off of a lot more effects for the same price.

Alternatively, if you want something *much* simpler, there is another type of multi-FX unit, and the Tech 21 Fly Rig 5 is a textbook example. Instead of having programmable/downloadable patches like the Line 6, this one is literally just 5 different effects pedals side by side, but all in a single metal box. None of the knobs do double-duty, unlike the Line 6. What you see is what you get. Dead simple to use. Very easy to learn. Great for people who are new to effects.

The downside is that it only has 5 effects: reverb, delay, overdrive, and distortion, and it also has a way to fake a chorus effect, but it's not the same as an actual chorus pedal. It has no tuner, no looper, no modulation effects, no wah, no fuzz, etc. But depending on how much of a learning curve you want, it may be perfect for you.

Here's a video demo of the Tech 21 unit:
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Y-uz3SAh5Qs

And here is a video demo of the Line 6 unit:
https://youtu.be/xCh8CPbZpbY?t=9s

TL;DR: I recommend a multi-FX unit given your style and budget. My top recommendation is the Line 6 M9, which can be had used for under $300. If you are not the type of person who does well with instruction manuals, my second suggestion would be for the simpler, but less cool, Tech 21 Fly Rig 5, also under $300.

Hope this helps!P.S. Here's a bit more in-depth video of the M9 that explains some of the other features besides the looper:

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=FJfhkBhYOakOne of my favorite guitarists, as far as his tone. I have two custom made Rowan guitars that are similar to his PRS signature model. I also have a hemp speaker in my Fargen like he uses.

http://i.imgur.com/GftvU3r.jpgOkay, I taught at a guitar store for many years, and part of my job was helping newbies pick out their first guitar. Here's my advice.

&gt;"go out and buy a junk guitar"

**Do not do this.** Junk guitars have high action, bad intonation, poor fret dressing and sharp fret ends, shitty tuning machines and just-for-show trem systems that instantly go out of tune as soon as you touch them, and sound like CRAP. You will give up practicing within a matter of hours. **Never spend less than about $300** + the cost of a setup on an electric guitar; anything less than that is a False savings.

&gt;"head to the used section... A few will feel like crap, other will feel good.. you will know what is what"

**No you won't.** You need to be able to play decently before you'll know what to look for in a used guitar and how to tell if one needs serious work before it's playable or not. Some things are easy to fix instantly and some things are not fixable at all.

&gt;"If you need a cheap practice amp I would get a Roland Cube 20GW or the 40 Watt version if you are planning on doing some small performances."

**Do not do this either.**

&gt;"Actually I plan to use headphones all the time for practice."

I actually have a couple of Roland Cubes, including the 40GX as mentioned above, and it's way too complicated for a first amp. For one thing, it's $250. It uses a smartphone interface, it has 11 digital amp models, it has 3 channels, it has built-in effects, and it is designed to use with software for removing center-mixed solos from recordings so you can solo over backing tracks. It is not for beginners.

My #1 recommendation for a new guitarist who primarily plans to practice at home with headphones is the **[Fender Frontman 10G](http://www.musiciansfriend.com/amplifiers-effects/fender-frontman-10g-10w-guitar-combo-amp)** for $60. It has a headphone jack and an aux input (for plugging in an iPod or your computer if you want to play along with recorded songs). It has a very simple 2-band EQ (treble and bass). It's a 2-channel amp: clean and dirty, with an independent gain knob and master volume. It is perfect for your application and the price is unbeatable. It is an ideal first amp and an ideal amp for home practice. A lot of teachers use them for private lessons, too.

If you want to play prog rock, heavier jazz fusion, etc, you will want a **solidbody electric guitar with two humbuckers and a fast neck**. I recommend avoiding trem systems for your first guitar and getting one with a fixed bridge. It will stay in tune better and you won't have to mess around with locking nuts and so on.

My first thought is to go with a Schecter or an Ibanez. Both make underpriced, quality mass-produced guitars well south of $500. For Schecter, **[check out the C-1 Special](http://www.musiciansfriend.com/guitars/schecter-guitar-research-c-1-special)**. It's $300 and has a very simple Volume + Tone + 3-way switch control layout, with two Duncan Designed humbuckers and a 24-fret neck. For Ibanez, **[check out the RG421](http://www.musiciansfriend.com/guitars/ibanez-rg421-electric-guitar)**. It is basically the same as the Schecter, just a different brand. There are other brands you might consider as well like Epiphone, Dean, and LTD. Any of them are fine, just don't spend less than $300.

Regardless of what guitar you get, the **first thing to do is have it set up by a professional**. Most guitar stores have repair techs who are fully capable of doing this in-house, sometimes even while you wait. Tell the tech that you are brand new to guitar and that you want to play complex, technical stuff. They will set it up with relatively light strings (9s or 10s) and low action. Most of these types of guitars come from the factory that way, but will generally need adjustment to the intonation, some filing to the fret ends, some work on the nut, etc. Eventually you should learn how to do these things yourself, but there's nothing wrong with getting a simple setup done by a pro anytime you buy a new guitar.

You will need a couple of other things to get you started:

1) **An electronic tuner.** There are two kinds: the clip-on variety that attaches to your headstock, and the stompbox variety. I recommend the clip-on kind because it's cheaper and you don't have to mess around with patch cables and a power supply, and you can still use it if you're playing unplugged. A popular brand is Snark. They are about $15.

2) **A guitar cable.** Pretty much any cable will do. Get one that's at least 10 feet, but not more than 20. They are about $15.

3) **Guitar picks.** There are a million different kinds. Get a bunch and try them out and see what you like. I use Dunlop Tortex 1.5mm Sharps. The most popular pick in the world is probably the 351 style. Get a few different thicknesses and see what you like. Dunlop Jazz IIIs are also extremely popular. For complex prog stuff, you will probably want a thicker pick (around 1mm or heavier). These are cheap; you can easily get 10 different ones to try for $3 or 4.

4) If you intend to take your guitar anywhere, you will need a **gig bag**. They're about $20 or 30. Get one with a shoulder strap in addition to a carrying handle.

When you get to the point where you're ready to start performing or jamming with others, you'll need a bigger amp, but I recommend against buying one now. Before buying a nicer amp, you need to know what features you want and what kind of sound you prefer, and you'll need to be able to play pretty decently before you will know that information. 

Hope this helps!Yes, it's a $60 amp. It's going to sound like shit, but that's totally fine for this application. I recommend it as a first amp because you don't want to spend hundreds of dollars before you know what kind of amp you want (EL84? 6V6? Hybrid? Blackface circuit? Class A? Spring reverb?.......)

Better to buy a piece of shit that has 1) a useable clean sound and 2) a headphone output, so you can practice your ass off. That's what you should be doing for the first 6 months anyway. Then, once you're ready to upgrade, you've only spent $60 - less than even a cheap pedal - and you are in a much better position to decide what kind of actually decent amp is appropriate for your playing style and what kind of features you need.

Don't plug pedals into a bedroom practice amp. Use it for practicing. Once you are at the point where you're ready to start using pedals, you are also at the point where you're ready to get a decent mid-level amp.

Edit: That said, if you want to spend a *hair* more, this is another great option for a first amp. It has a few built-in effects (reverb, delay) and a bit more usable drive channel. This one also has a headphone jack and an aux input, same as the Fender. It's half again as much as the Fender Frontman 10G, but for $100 it's still not a bad deal:

http://www.musiciansfriend.com/amplifiers-effects/kustom-kg112fx-20w-1x12-guitar-combo-amp-with-digital-effectsIf you buy a guitar under $100, you're pretty much setting up a self-fulfilling prophecy that you won't be playing it 2 months later\u2014and no wonder.

$300 is not that much money if you are serious about learning a new instrument.I agree that if you have a guitarist friend who can come with you, there are great deals to be had buying used. But I *strongly* disagree that a non-guitarist can tell a good used guitar from a shit one just by futzing around on it without any idea of what to look for. Non-guitarists likely won't be able to tell you which is the cheaper guitar and which is the pricier one if you ask them to choose between a pretty flametop Epiphone Les Paul and a solid black Gibson Les Paul Standard, despite the latter costing ten times as much as the former. Considering all the issues that come up with used guitars\u2014wonky truss rods, bad nut work, loose frets, neck bow, even something simple like fret buzz - if you don't know how to check for these things, or have someone with you who can, you are better off buying new.If you really like them then get one with it. I recommend against it for beginners because floating trems (the kind you will generally see on metal guitars) are a PAIN IN THE ASS to keep in tune and also to change strings and do a simple setup. You don't want to be worrying about things like fine tuners or a locking nut or adjusting spring tension when you are still learning the names of the notes on the fingerboard. Almost all guitarists have multiple guitars for a reason. When you're ready to tackle trems, you can always trade it in for a better one, or buy a second guitar with one. To get a guitar with a really workable trem, you will also need to spend more than you will for the same guitar with a fixed bridge. A decent trem is pretty much impossible to find on a guitar under about $600 in my opinion. My main guitar, a Parker Fly Artist, is built around and famous for its very stable, very responsive, very high quality trem system, and they cost $5,400 new partially for that reason. Good trem systems are simply expensive to build and they are also a lot of trouble to maintain and use if you don't know what you're doing.

But if it's something that really appeals to you, then yeah, go for it! I'd recommend not spending less than $500-600 though in that case.That's perfectly reasonable. Generally speaking, for beginners, I strongly recommend learning and practicing clean for at least the first several months if not longer. Many pros, myself include, always practice completely clean/dry. When you're woodshedding, you need to hear everything that you're doing and take care not to cover up mistakes in technique with distortion or other effects. But it certainly is a lot of fun to play with distortion if you like that kind of music, and there's nothing wrong with having it on tap if you feel like playing through it.&gt;"If you really wanna get crazy anything soft and foamy eats sound. Cutrains, rugs, egg cartons, foam, blankets, pillows, towels. You can start some basic soundproofing."

No it doesn't. I'm a former professional musician and recording artist, and additionally, my family used to have a family business that sold &amp; installed home theater equipment and constructed soundproof rooms. I can tell you firsthand that "soundproofing" in this way will not accomplish, even remotely, your goal of lowering *volume.*

What /u/rasdouchin is describing is called deadening. This will reduce reverberation, not volume.

What you are hoping to do is called isolation. Isolation is *extremely* expensive and difficult to accomplish without renovation. Double walls, floors, and ceilings are effective at this; cheap eggcrate foam is near-useless at this. There is nothing you can do (cheaply/easily/reversibly) to the surface of a wall that will do what you want. That is a big part of the reason that recording studios are so expensive to build. Some things that MIGHT help are actually things like bookcases full of books, though. Heavy drapes will help a negligible amount and in my opinion isn't worth even trying.

My advice is simple though. I'm also a former licensed Missouri real estate broker, and as a musician who has lived in many rental properties over the years, I can tell you how I've dealt with this before myself:

Unless your lease says you live in a "quiet building," that is just what your neighbors have decided to call it, and not actually a legal fact. **You have the right as a paying tenant to play music at a reasonable volume at reasonable hours of the day and evening.** You should not be embarrassed about this nor ashamed of this - you are paying for that right. If you are not making excessive noise, and you are not doing it late at night, your neighbors cannot reasonably ask you, nor legally require you, to stop playing your acoustic guitar and singing.

Now, obviously you don't want to piss off your neighbors, but if they are requesting that you play in your bedroom with the door shut, why don't you simply do that, if that's all they're asking you to do and it would make them happy?

I'm not a lawyer and this should not be considered legal advice nor a substitute for competent legal advice. But if I were in your shoes, I would simply go to my room and shut the door to play. If they still complain beyond that, tell them that you've done what they asked and you're playing at a reasonable volume and that you consider the matter closed. 

Hope this helps!Yes, this. Eggcrate foam, even the expensive "acoustic" kind as opposed to the bedding kind, only helps with deadening, not isolation.OP "almost always" plays acoustic guitar.I strongly advise against doing this yourself unless you learn how to do it properly and have the proper tools. A fret dressing is not expensive and any tech can do it for you much better than you'll be able to do it yourself. But, if you insist:

This is the correct tool:
http://www.stewmac.com/Luthier_Tools/Types_of_Tools/Files/Fret_End_Dressing_File.html

This is how to use it:
http://www.liutaiomottola.com/construction/FretDressing.htm#mozTocId262576Former guitar store/Fender dealer employee here. Looks right to me.Those are really for reducing feedback and won't help substantially with the perceived volume. They don't even work that well for reducing feedback, haha.If you want to be a musician, and you have the skill and talent, then go be a musician. Do it for a few years. If you love it and don't want to change, then keep doing it. If you don't love the lifestyle and the work, then go do something else. But if music is in your blood, you won't be happy doing anything else.

That said, being a musician is a JOB. It's work. And if you want to make a living doing it, you must think of it as work. If performing makes your heart melt, do that as much as you can, but most musicians have multiple streams of income for good reason. A lot of musicians combine teaching privately, doing session work, performing as a soloist or with one or multiple bands, AND doing more traditional work such as working as a guitar or amp repair tech and/or working as a guitar salesperson in order to make ends meet, especially seasonally when guitar stores need extra help.

If you like teaching and think you would be good at it, get a degree in music education and consider becoming a music teacher at a school or teaching privately. If you want to teach at the college level, you will need advanced degrees.

Other options are house band positions. For example a friend of mine works on a cruise ship as a full-time musician. Another friend of mine works at a casino hotel playing with the house band. You